United States Department of Agriculture Food Safety and Inspection Service Inspection Operations Regulatory Programs August 1996 With Change 98-01 (September 1996 thru February 1998 Food Standards and Labeling Policy Book Ordering Information: Contact: Superintendent of Documents, PO Box 371954, Pittsburgh, PA 15250-7954.
Phone (202) 512-1800 (8am-4:30pm EST).
INTRODUCTION This Policy Book is assembled in dictionary form and may be used in conjunction with the Meat and Poultry Inspection Regulations and the Meat and Poultry Inspection Manual, Directives and Notices.
It is a composite of policy and day-to-day labeling decision, many of which do not appear in the above publications.
They are subject to change and therefore a periodic updating of this book will take place.
Note: Red Meat Required percentages of meat required for red meat products are shown on the basis of fresh uncooked weight unless otherwise indicated.
For purposes of this Policy Book, whenever the terms beef, pork, lamb, mutton, or veal are used they indicate the use of skeletal muscle tissue from the named species(9CFR 301.2).
Note: Poultry Required percentages for poultry products are based on a cooked deboned basis unless otherwise stated.
When the standards indicate "poultry", the skin and fat are not to exceed natural proportions per(9CFR 381.117(d)).
Applications for label approval should be mailed to: Chief, Labeling Review Branch(LRB), Labeling and Compounds Review Division(LCRD) OPPDE, FSIS P. O. Box 7416 Benjamin Franklin Station Washington, D.C. 20044-7416 Applications sent in should be mailed to: by Federal Express, Express Mail etc.,
Labeling Review Branch OPPDE, FSIS, USDA 300 12TH ST., S.W. ROOM 616-C Washington, D.C. 20250 Product samples (when requested by LRB) should be packed with sufficient refrigerant to last until received.
Shipping should be coordinated with requestor to assure delivery before 4:45 p.m. Friday.
Labeling and Compounds Review Division 300 12th Street, S.W. Room 616-C Washington, D.C. 20250 Update 2/98 (change #1)
ADDED SOLUTIONS(WITH JUICES): Products with added solutions that are cooked in an impervious bag and as a result of the cooking contain free flowing juices that are not drained, should be labeled to reflect the solution and the juices, e.g., ("Roast Beef Contains up to 12% solution with Juices").
ADDED SOLUTIONS (POULTRY) (BONELESS): Boneless poultry products containg solutions can be labeled similarly to the PFF language for cured pork products, that is "Cured Chicken and Water Product X% of Weight is Added Ingredients."
The terms "with natural juices" or "water added" are not permitted since both terms do not adequately convey the amount of solution added to the poultry products.
Additionally, the term "with natural juices" is misleading when a solution is introduced into poultry product by means of marinating, soaking, injecting, tumbling, etc.
ADDRESS (DUAL): When more than one address appears on a label, each address must be complete including city, state, and zip code.
See: 317.2(g)(l) ADDRESSES (DUAL) AND ZIP CODE: When more than one firm's name and address, or one firm's name with a principal address, plus branch address are shown on a label, the principal firm and address shall bear the zip code.
If all names and addresses are given about equal prominence, the zip code should appear with each address.
AGED: The term "Aged" on a label must be qualified, e.g., "Aged 65 days."
"Aged Days" may also be approved and in this case, the blank is filled in by the establishment at the time the product is labeled.
In either case, the company is required to maintain records to verify the claim.
Aging time on cured products such as Ham cannot include the required curing time.
See: Dry Aged
AGNELOTTO (IT): A ravioli dumpling stuffed with at least 10% minced meat.
Labeling must show a true product name, e.g., "Dumpling Stuffed With Meat."
ALBONDIGAS (SP): Spanish term meaning meatball.
The product must meet the meatball standard.
The label must show the true product name in English, i.e.,"Meatball,"except if the product is distributed solely in Puerto Rico.
ALCAPURRIAS (SP): A meat turnover containing at least 8% cooked beef.
Product labeled as "Alcapurrias" must be made only in Puerto Rico.
If pork is used, it must be shown in the product name as "Pork Alcapurrias," or "Alcapurrias de Cerdo." the label must show the true product name in English, e.g., "Beef Filling Wrapped in Dough," except if the product is distributed solely in Puerto Rico.
ALCOHOL PRODUCTS: Alcoholic beverages as: wine, sherry,beer...etc., used as ingredients of meat or poultry products do not require sublisting on the label.
ALESSANDRI (IT): A dry sausage.
The true product name must be shown, i.e., "Alessandri Sausage."
ALFREDO: A sauce rich with cream or sour cream, butter or margarine, and Parmesan or Romano cheese.
"ALL", "PURE", AND "100%" POULTRY: A labeling claim, such as, "meat used is 100% white meat", may only be used when the poultry meat contains no added ingredients.
A labeling claim, such as, "white meat only," is acceptable when white meat is used to the exclusion of dark meat.
In this situation, other ingredients may be present in the poultry portion of the product.
"ALL or 100% BEEF(Patty Mix)": Beef patty mix may be labeled "all," "pure," or "100% beef," when the only added ingredients are partially defatted chopped beef or finely textured beef.
An ingredients statmentent would be required on bulk packed product but not retail packages.
"All," "Pure," or "100%," may not be used if partially defatted beef fatty tissue(PDBFT), is used or mechanically separated species(MSS), are used.
ALPHA CELLULOSE: When used as a carrier of flavoring ingredients, it need not be shown in the ingredients statement, unless it functions as a binder in the meat or poultry product.
ALPINO (IT): See: Apennino AMANDINE (FR): The french term meaning "garnished with almonds."
The product must contain sufficient almonds to characterize.
AMENABILITY: USDA exempts from its inspection foods containing 3 percent or less raw (or less than 2 percent cooked) red meat or other edible portions of a carcass, or products which historically have not been considered by consumers as products of the meat industry.
For poultry products, see 381.15.
These basic guidelines are not intended to be all inclusive.
See: Bases ANDOUILLE (FR): Made with pork and/or pork byproducts stuffed into large intestines.
Product can be sold cooked or uncooked.
Andouille is a coined name and must be accompanied by a true product name, e.g., "sausage" or "pudding" depending on formulation.
If beef is used, it must be shown in the product name, e.g., "Beef Andouille Sausage" or "Beef Andouille Pudding."
AND/OR LABELING: See "composite ingredients statement" and "may contain statement."
See Policy Memo 72 ANNATTO: A natural color agent, may not be declared as "coloring," only as "annatto."
ANTIOXIDANTS: BHA and BHT are permitted in spice mixtures at 0.02% of the essential oil content without declaration on meat or poultry food product labels.
Antioxidants are permitted in cooked fresh sausages and fresh sausage-like products (e.g., a pork, water soy protein product).
BHA and BHT are not permitted in non-specific meat or poultry products.
APENNINO (IT): A dry sausage originating in the Alpine Region of Northern Italy.
The label must show the true product name, e.g., "Alpino Brand Sausage - Made in USA."
APPROXIMATE: The word "approximate" may be used to describe the thickness of bacon and the number of pieces in an institutional package when the actual net weight is declared (e.g., 18 21 pieces).
"Approximately" is acceptable in a containing statement for meat products (e.g., "Containing approximately 6% of a solution of ...", or "Marinated with approximately 3% solution of ...").
The word "approximate" cannot be used in conjunction with the serving size or the required declaration of net weight of contents.
ARKANSAS BACON See: Bacon Arkansas and Arkansas Style Bacon ARLES OR D`ARLES: (FR) The label must show a true product name, e.g., "D'Arles Sausage."
A dry sausage similar to Milano Salami and made of coarsely chopped meat and corded "crisscross style."
ARROZ CON POLLO (SP): The product must contain at least 15% cooked chicken meat.
The label must show, the true product name, in English, i.e., "Rice with Chicken," except if the product is distributed solely in Pureto Rico.
ARTIFICIAL COLORS: When certified colors and their lakes are used in any product they must be declared as such in the list of ingredients statement by name (9CFR 317.2(j)(5) through (10), 318.7(c)(4) and 381.147(f)).
When added to soups, they must be declared in the ingredients statement.
"Artificially Colored" adjacent to the product name is required for product in pickling vinegars, pie crust,etc.
ARTIFICIAL FLAVORS: Artificial flavors are restricted to an ingredient which was manufactured by a process of synthesis or similar process.
The principal components of artificial flavors usually areesters, ketones, and aldehyde groups.
These ingredients are declared in the ingredients statement as "Artificial Flavors" without naming the individual components.
See: 9CFR 317.2(j)(3) and (4) 381.119 ARTIFICIAL MARBLING - RED MEAT PRODUCTS: Fats and oils, e.g., butter, margarine, vegetable oils. etc., may be added to red meat products, e.g., roast beef and steaks.
However, the presence of such substances must be indicated as part of the product name, as a product name qualifier, or in a solution statement, e.g., "Roast Beef and Margarine Product," "Vegetable Oil Added," "Containing 10% of a solution of milk, ...."
All requirements of other applicable policies should be In addition, products that followed for these products.
appear to be of a higher quality must include a statement to indicate this, e.g., "Injected with Beef Fat" or "Product may appear to be of a higher quality than the actual grade."
Samples may be necessary to determine if this requirement applies.
ARTIFICIAL (No Artificial Anything): The statement "no artificial anything" is acceptable on labels provided the product contains nothing artificial.
See: Policy Memo 019B dated August 18, 1994 ARTIFICIAL SWEETENERS: See: Aspartame Saccharin ASPARTAME: Not acceptable as a direct ingredient in meat or poultry products.
Acceptable in breakfast cereals, dry bases in gelatins, puddings, and fillings that may be components of meat or poultry products.
When used, the PDP (Principal Display Panel) of the label must state "Phenylketonurics: contains Phenylalanine."
ASPIC: A cold jelly of meat juices, tomato juices, and similar type products used to mold or garnish meat food products, seafood products, and vegetables.
When aspic is used on a meat or poultry food product, it should be sublisted in the ingredients statement.
AU GRATIN POTATOES AND BACON: At least 8 percent fully cooked bacon (based on 40% yield).
AUTOLYZED YEAST OR AUTOLYZED YEAST EXTRACT: Acceptable flavoring ingredient for a number of meat food products, e.g., stews, soups, baby foods, gravies, and meat bases.
It must be listed in the ingredients statement as Autolyzed Yeast or Autolyzed Yeast Extract.
See: 9CFR 317.2(f)(l)(i) 317.8(b)(7) 318.7(c)(4) 381.118(c) 381.147(f)(4) AWARDS: Replicas of medals or other award designations may not be used on labeling unless the circumstances involved are
plainly evident.
This would include the identification of the kind of award, when received, and where it took place.
BABY BACK RIBS: The portion of the pork ribs removed from the loin dorsal to the scribe line.
BABY FOOD: High Meat Dinner - At least 26% meat.
High Meat Poultry Dinner - At least 18.75% cooked poultry meat, skin, fat and giblets.
Meat and Broth - At least 61% meat.
Vegetable with Meat - At least 8% meat.
Poultry with Broth - At least 43% cooked poultry meat, skin, and giblets.
Poultry and Rice - At least 5% cooked deboned poultry meat.
Note: Wine, Mechanically Separated Species, nitrites, and nitrates are not acceptable in baby and toddler foods.
BABY FOOD WITH FRESH HAM OR BACON: Ham or bacon without nitrates or nitrites must be shown in the ingredients statement as ham or bacon (water, salt, sugar, etc., without nitrates or nitrites).
BACK BACON: Boneless Pork Loin with wide fat back attached.
BACON: The term "bacon" is used to describe the cured belly of a swine carcass.
If meat from other portions of the carcass is used, the product name must be qualified to identify the portions, e.g., "Pork Shoulder Bacon."
"Certified" refers to products that have been treated for trichinae.
See: 318.10 BACON AND HAM AS INGREDIENTS: See: Cured Meats as Ingredients BACON AND PORK SAUSAGE: Product is formulated with a high percentage of bacon (usually bacon ends and pieces) with at least 20% pork.
BACON ARKANSAS AND ARKANSAS STYLE BACON: Product which is identified as Arkansas Bacon or Arkansas Style Bacon is produced from the pork shoulder blade Boston roast.
The pork shoulder blade Boston roast includes the porcine muscle, fat and bone, cut interior of the second or third thoracic vertebrae, and posterior of the atlas joint (first cervical vertebrae), and dorsal of the center of the humerus bone.
For Arkansas Bacon, the neck bones and rib bones are removed by cutting close to the underside of those bones.
The blade bone (scapula) and the dorsal fat covering, including the skin (clear plate), are removed, leaving no more than one-quarter inch of the fat covering the roast.
The meat is then dry cured with salt, sugar, nitrites, and spices, and smoked with natural smoke.
The meat may not be injected or soaked in curing brine, nor may any artificial or liquid smoke be applied to the meat.
Product that is prepared outside the state of Arkansas but in the manner prescribed may be identified as "Arkansas Style Bacon."
The true product name must be shown as "Boneless Cured Pork Shoulder Butt."
BACON BAR: Same requirements as Prefried Bacon but in bar shape.
BACON (Canned - Pasteurized): A shelf stable concentration.
item which must have at least 7% brine
BACON (Canned, Prefried): In "Canned Prefried Bacon," e.g., "Bacon following criteria should be applied: 1.
M/SP Index of 0.4 or more.
Protein).
2.
A Brine Ratio Moisture/Salt. of 9.0 or Crumbles," the
M/SP = Moisture/ (Salt x
less.
Brine
Ratio
=
3.
A Brine concentration of 10% or more.
concentration = Salt/(Moisture + Salt).
4.
Maximum 40% yield.
Brine
BACON (Cooked): Not to yield more than 40% bacon - 60% shrink required.
BHA and BHT may be used as antioxidants in precooked bacon at level of 0.01% individually or 0.02% collectively, based on fat content.
BACON, COUNTRY CURED: A shelf-stable product.
The dry application salt/cure must result in the finished product having an internal salt content of at least 4%.
The dry application of salt without cure must result in a finished product with a brine concentration of not less than 10% or a water activity (Aw) of not more than 0.92.
BACON, COUNTRY STYLE: Product is dry cured.
BACON DRESSING FOR STUFFING: The product must contain at least 8% bacon.
BACON-LIKE PRODUCTS: Bacon-like products, including poultry bacon, labeled with "bacon" in the name must follow the same requirements as those applied to pork bacon.
These requirements include, but are not limited to, limits on restricted ingredients and the requirement that the bacon must return to green weight.
Beef bacon is a cured and smoked beef product sliced to simulate regular bacon.
It is prepared from various beef cuts and offered with a variety of coined names, including "Breakfast Beef," "Beef Bacon," etc.
A common or usual name is required, e.g., "Cured and Smoked Beef Plate," and should be shown contiguous to the coined name.
Poultry bacon products are acceptable and may be designated as (Kind) Bacon.
However, a true descriptive name must appear contiguous to (Kind) Bacon without intervening type or design, in letters at least one-half the size of the letters used in the (Kind) Bacon, and in the same style and color and on the same background.
An example of an acceptable designation is "Turkey Bacon-Cured Turkey Breast Meat-Chopped and Formed."
The descriptive name can serve alone as the product name.
See: Policy Memo 106A dated December 17, 1991
BACON SQUARES: The label must show true product name "Pork Jowl Bacon."
BACON (Thick or Thin Sliced): Slices must be slice, or range inch" or "25 to must be visible qualified by approximately the size of the of slices, e.g., "Sliced approximately 1/8 30 slices," or the thickness of the slice in product stack packed.
BAKING SODA (Bicarbonate of Soda): May be included in tomato sauce at a level of 0.023% without being listed in the ingredients statement.
See: 318.7(c)(4) 381.147(f)(4) BANGERS: A sausage-like product prepared with meat and varying amounts of rusk or other cereals.
The label must show percentage of rusk (or other cereal) adjacent to product name in prominent lettering.
May be labeled British, Scottish or Irish Style.
BARBECUE(BBQ), PRODUCTS: Barbeque(BBQ), products that are composed of uncured red meat products that are injected, massaged, tumbled, etc., and which are cooked back to or below the weight of the raw meat product (green weight), must use the term "seasoned" or "flavored," in conjunction with the meat product in the product name, e.g., "BBQ Seasoned Pork," or "Sliced Seasoned Beef with Barbecue Sauce."
The labeling for uncured red meat products containing some solutions that are used to make BBQ products (9 CFR 319.312 or 319.80) which are not cooked back to green weight or are not in compliance with the cooking yield must have a containing statement on the label.
A containing statement is required in the product name when the cooking yield is not met, e.g., "BBQ Pork Containing up to 15% of a solution."
Similarly, a containing statement is required in the product name when the product does not have sufficient quantities of meat minus the solution to meet the minimum meat requirement.
However, in limited situations when the minimum meat requirement(minus the solution) is met and when cook yield is compensated for by adding additional meat, the
containing statement can either be placed in the product name or attached to the meat component in the ingredients statement, e.g., "Ingredients: Beef Containing up to 25% ..sugar, spices."
Also, see Policy Memo 84A and Policy Memo 102.
Red meat components that contain binders and extenders and do not meet one of the barbecue standards (9 CFR 319.80, 319.312) shall be descriptively labeled to include the extender, nomenclature in the product name, e.g., "BBQ Seasoned Beef, Modified Food Starch and Gelatized Wheat Starch", "Pork and Binder Product with Barbecue Sauce", or "BBQ Cooked Beef and Binder Product" followed by a parenthetical list of all of its ingredients.
Bone-in red meat products do not have to comply with Federal meat regulation, 9 CFR 319.312 or 319.80 with regard to cooking yield and must indicate the presence of bones in product name, e.g., "Seasoned Cooked Pork Ribs with Barbecue Sauce" or "Barbecue Beef Ribs."
When bone-in red meat products are injected, massaged, tumbled, etc., and do not return to green weight after cooking, the containing statement shall appear once on the label in (1) the ingredients statement as part of the red meat component(only if there is enough Beef Ribs without solution to meet the requirement for "Beef Ribs and BBQ Sauce"), or (2) in the product name, e.g., "Beef Ribs, containing 10% of a solution and BBQ Sauce."
BARBECUE (Infrared Cooked): The label must indicate heat source, e.g., "infrared cooked," with lettering no less than one-half the size of the largest letter in the word "barbecue."
BARBECUE SAUCE WITH CHICKEN: The product must contain at least 15% cooked chicken meat.
Changing the size of the term "Chicken" does not change the 15% cooked chicken meat requirement.
BARBECUE SAUCE WITH MEAT: The product must contain at least 35% cooked meat.
When the name of the product shows meat in smaller letters, not more than one-half the size of the largest letter in the product name, 25% cooked meat is required.
BASES: Powdered, semi-solid, viscous, or fluid soup bases, gravy mixes, dehydrated soup mixes, bouillon cubes and granulated bouillon cubes containing meat extract and/or animal fats as the only meat or meat byproduct ingredient will not be regarded as meat food products.
BASTERNA: A cured, dried cut of beef coated with a spice crust.
The label must show the true product name, i.e., "Cured and Dried Beef with Spices."
BATTER: A mixture of flour, liquid, and other ingredients thin enough to pour.
The ingredients statement must show in proper order the batter ingredients (water, flour, etc.), or be included with the breading formula.
The amount of batter used is included in the 30% maximum breading permitted.
BBQ PRODUCTS: When the term "BBQ" or similar terms is used to characterize a product, the product must comply with one of the following standards: 319.312 Pork (or Beef) with Barbecue Sauce; 319.80 Barbecued Meats; 381.164 (Kind) Barbecued; 381.165 (Kind) Barbecued Prepared with Moist Heat, or (Poultry) Barbecue.
BEANS WITH: Bacon in Sauce - At least 12% smoked bacon.
Frankfurters in Sauce - At least 20% franks.
Ham in Sauce - At least 12% ham.
Meatballs in Sauce - At least 20% meatballs.
Meat in Sauce - At least 12% meat.
See: 319.309 319.310 BEANS WITH BARBECUED MEATS AND SAUCE PRODUCTS: Product consisting of a combination of beans and barbecued meats and sauce must not contain less than 8.4% meat in total formula.
The barbecued meat must comply with 319.8.
BEEF A LA DEUTSCH: A product must show and Beef" the proper made with beef, vegetables, and sauce.
The label true product name, e.g., "Gravy with Vegetables or "Beef and Gravy with Vegetables," depending on order of predominance.
BEEF A LA KING: The product must contain at least 20% cooked beef.
BEEF A LA MODE: The product must contain at least 50% beef.
Sliced beef (marinated in wine, cognac, vegetable stock) with carrots, onions, and other ingredients covered with wine sauce.
BEEF ALMONDINE WITH VEGETABLES: The product must contain at least 18% cooked meat on the ready-to-serve basis.
The product must contain almonds.
BEEFALO: The term "beefalo" cannot substitute for beef in labeling.
It can be featured as a further labeling term, such as "beef from beefalo."
Such usage will require that the establishment demonstrate an effective control system, upon request from agency officials, to insure the term is used only with eligible products.
The terms "calf" and "veal" apply to meat from young "beefalo" animals on the same basis as they are used with meat from other young bovines.
BEEF AND DUMPLINGS WITH GRAVY: The product must contain at least 25% meat and not more than 25% water blanched dry dumplings.
BEEF AND GRAVY: The product contains at least 50% cooked beef.
See: Gravy and Beef BEEF BACON: See: Bacon-Like Products
BEEF BILE: Acceptable as an edible meat byproduct.
BEEF BLOOD GLAZE: A coating of beef blood is permitted on cured products (e.g., ham, hamette, etc.) if the product name is prominently qualified to reflect the coating.
Nitrite is not permitted in the glaze.
BEEF BRISKET (Canned): The minimum brine concentration required is 5.5%.
BEEF BURGUNDY OR BOURGUIGNONNE: The product must contain at least 50% beef.
Product contains beef cubes, mushrooms, onions, and red wine or burgundy gravy.
May include other vegetables, e.g., carrots, shallots, tomato paste, or potatoes.
Other acceptable names include "Beouf A La Bourguignonne," "Beef Burgundy Style," "Beef Burgundy," and "Burgundy Beef."
BEEF BURGUNDY WITH NOODLES: The product must contain at least 50% beef in the beef burgundy portion.
Total product should not contain more than 50% cooked noodles.
BEEF CHEEK MEAT AND BEEF HEAD MEAT AND PORK CHEEK MEAT AND PORK HEAD MEAT (USE AND LABELING AS AN INGREDIENT IN MEAT FOOD PRODUCTS): Beef cheek meat and pork cheek meat refer to beef and pork cheeks from which the glandular material has been removed.
Beef head meat and pork head meat refer to muscle tissue remaining on the beef and hog skull after removal of the skin, cheeks, tongue, and lips.
The meat normally attached to and considered as part of the tongue trimmings when detached from the tongue trimmings may also be included as beef head meat or pork head meat although it can be labeled as "beef" or "pork."
When beef cheek meat and/or beef head meat are included in boneless beef, its presence must be specifically declared.
Examples include: "Boneless Beef - Contains Beef Cheek Meat and Beef Head Meat," "Boneless Beef Head Meat," "Boneless Beef - Ingredients: Beef, Beef Head Meat, Beef Cheek Meat," or "Boneless Beef - 20 percent Beef Head Meat, 15 percent Beef Cheek Meat."
Beef cheek meat and/or beef head meat may be used in unlimited quantities and identified as "beef" in meat food products unless restricted by regulatory standards for specific products as indicated in 319.15(a) (Chopped beef, ground beef), 319.15(b) (Hamburger), 319.15(d) (Fabricated steak), 319.81 (Roast Beef parboiled and steam roasted), 319.100 (Corned beef), 319.300 (Chili con carne), 319.301 (Chili con carne with beans), and 319.303 (Corned beef hash).
The presence of pork head meat is not required to be identified on the labeling of boneless pork.
However, pork cheek meat and/or pork head meat may be used in unlimited quantities and identified as "pork" in meat food products, unless restricted by regulatory standards as indicated in 319.300 (Chili con carne) and 319.301 (Chili con carne with beans).
See: Policy Memo 098B dated August 1, 1990 Cheek Meat BEEF CONCENTRATE AND SALT: Broth solids solids level stock total derived from cooking fresh beef containing 3% to 4% is centrifuged and evaporated to approximately 60% under vacuum.
The water fraction is salted to a of 25.5% of the water weight (100 lbs. concentrated at 60% will have 10.2 lbs. of salt added, making a weight of 110.2 lbs.).
There is no need for refrigeration.
BEEF CONSOMME: The standard requires beef as an ingredient and a minimum protein content of at least 3% in the finished product.
"Beef stock" or "beef broth" (or mixture of both) may be used to comprise the beef ingredient.
Additional optional ingredients are gelatin, beef extract, tomato puree, hydrolyzed plant protein, and seasoning.
BEEF, COOKED, (Rare, Medium, Well Done): There is no objective basis for determining particular temperature attainments that will produce products generally considered as properly identified by these terms.
Therefore, if they appear on labels in relation to meats, they should be shown in conjunction with possessive terms to clearly indicate that it is a labeling declaration about "doneness" that is associated with the producer or
distributor.
("Our Rare Beef" or "Jones Packing Company's Medium Cooked Beef.")
See: 318.17 BEEF (Dried or Air Dried): Product name is "Air Dried Beef" or "Dried Beef."
MPR 2.04:1.
It is usually cured by rub and/or stitch pump followed by cover pickle for 4 to 8 weeks with several overhauls (turned over for the application of additional cure), then placed in smokehouse or drying chambers for 3 to 10 days.
BEEF GRAVY MIX: The product must contain at least 15% dried beef.
BEEF GREAVES: This product is usually high temperature rendered beef fat.
However, if partially defatted beef fatty tissue is used, the product cannot be rendered above 120o F.
The label must have a true product name, e.g., "Cooked Beef Tissue Solids."
BEEF HEART: The following terms shall be used to identify product from beef hearts: 1.
"Beef Hearts" shall refer to untrimmed beef hearts with bone intact.
2.
"Beef Hearts - Bone Removed" shall refer to untrimmed beef hearts with bone removed.
3.
"Beef Heart Meat" shall refer to beef auricles (heart cap) and bone removed.
hearts with
BEEF MARSALA: The product must contain at least 50% beef.
Product contains beef cubes, marsala wine sauce, and usually mushrooms and onions.
White wine may be used, but it may not replace marsala wine.
BEEF ORIENTAL OR ORIENTAL BEEF: The product must contain at least 12% meat and oriental style vegetables and sauce.
The label must show true product name, e.g., "Beef Oriental with Vegetables."
BEEF PATTY MIX (BULK): See: All or 100% Beef Patty Mix BEEF ROAST (Beef Fat Added): A beef roast wrapped with Roast, Beef Fat Added" or or similar names.
If the to cover bones, the words product name.
BEEF ROULADE: The product must contain at least 50% cooked meat.
Usually a thin strip of flank meat wrapped around vegetables and cooked.
BEEF SLICES A-LA-PIZZAIOLA: The product must contain at least 50% cooked beef.
The label must show true product name, e.g., "Beef in Pizza Sauce."
BEEF STROGANOFF: A dish with a creamy sauce prepared with beef cut into narrow strips or cubes and sauteed.
Product labeled "Beef Stroganoff" should be prepared with a formula which includes at least 45% beef or 30% cooked beef.
1.
The product must contain at least 10% sour cream, or 2.
7.5% sour cream, and 5% wine, or 3.
9.5% whole milk, 2% sour cream, and 2 1/2% wine.
BEEF STROGANOFF WITH NOODLES: Meat and sauce portion must meet the standard for Beef Stroganoff.
Total product shall contain no more than 50% cooked noodles.
a layer of fat is labeled "Beef "Beef Chuck Roast, Beef Fat Added" fat is placed over bones or tends "Bone-in" must be shown with the
BEEF SUET: Hard fat from kidneys and loin, mainly used for tallow. be labeled as "Beef Fat" or "Beef Suet."
BEEF SUKIYAKI: The product must contain at least 30% meat based on total product.
Consists of thinly sliced beef and various vegetables cooked in a flavored beef stock.
This is not a stew as the vegetables and components are mixed during the cooking process.
Vegetables used with this food are celery, bean sprouts, leeks, onions, mushrooms, chinese cabbage, carrots, spinach, water chestnuts, bamboo shoots, and bean curds.
BEEF TONGUES (Cured and Canned): This product consists of the thoroughly trimmed, short cut tongue (a trimmed tongue with the salivary and lymph glands and hyoid bone removed).
BEEF TRIPE STEW: There are two versions of this product.
One is of Mexican origin and merchandised in association with the term "Menudo."
Corn is a prominent ingredient in its formula.
The standard for an item of this nature requires that it contain not less than 33% beef tripe computed on the basis of the uncooked tripe in relation to total ingredients.
The second product is popular in Puerto Rico.
It is referred to as "Mondungo."
The product is made with 25% raw beef tripe.
The remainder consists principally of potatoes, a squash with pumpkin-like appearance and flavor, and a native vegetable called "Tanier."
When the vegetables are not distinguishable, this product can be labeled as "Dominican Style Mondungo."
BEEF WELLINGTON: It is made with beef tenderloin that is roasted very rare.
It is then spread with a liver pate, covered with pastry, and baked in a hot oven until pastry is brown.
The product must contain at least 50% cooked meat and no more than 30% pastry.
BEERWURST, BIERWURST: A cooked smoked sausage.
Same requirements as beef salami, with the exception that pork may be used.
May
BEET POWDER, BEETS, OR BEET JUICE: When added to statement by products of, uncooked meat BEEVETT: The term "Beevett" used to identify meat of large calves approaching one year of age, labeled as "Beevett Beef."
BENZOIC ACID (Sodium, Potassium, and Calcium Salts): These compounds are not acceptable ingredients in meat or poultry products except in oleomargarine.
Their presence is acceptable when they are in a meat or poultry product as the result of being a functional preservative in a product produced under FDA jurisdiction which is incorporated as a component of a meat or poultry product (e.g., sauces, dairy products, flavoring mixtures).
These compounds are considered incidental additives when present at no more than .01 percent.
If present at greater than .01 percent, their status as incidental additives will be determined on a case by-case basis.
BERLINER: A cooked smoked sausage usually pork in large casings.
When exceed 50% of the meat block.
not permitted.
See: Policy Memo 048 dated May BERLINER BLOOD SAUSAGE: A cooked blood sausage containing diced bacon.
After cooking it is dried and smoked.
Ham fat, snouts, and lips are not permitted.
See: Blood Sausage BHA AND BHT: Butylated Hydroxyanisole (BHA) and Butylated Hydroxytoluene (BHT) may be shown on labels as BHA and BHT. made from coarsely cut cured beef is used, it shall not Pork stomachs or beef tripe 18, 1982 sauces, should be listed in the ingredients their common or usual names.
Beets, or are not an approved ingredient in sausage or products.
BIALY: A Jewish roll or bread.
Bialy."
Approval granted for "Pizza on a
BIER SCHINKEN (GR): The literal translation is "Beer Ham."
If product is made of all pork, it may be labeled "Bier Schinken."
BINDERS IN POULTRY, BONELESS, RAW OR COOKED: Binding agents may be added individually or collectively in amounts not to exceed 3 percent for cooked poultry products and 2 percent for raw poultry products based on total finished product.
When binders are added in excess of these levels, the common or usual name of the binder or the generic term "Binders Added" shall be included in a product name qualifier, e.g., "Turkey Breast-Gelatin Added."
In all cases, the presence of these ingredients must be shown in the ingredients statement.
This policy is intended to apply to binders which are in chopped or chunked poultry products that are formed rolls, loaves, etc., but not to binders added directly whole muscle by injection, massaging, tumbling, etc., then act as extenders.
See: Policy Memo 103 dated February 13, 1987 BINDERS TO SEAL OUTSIDE WRAPPERS: Binders like sodium alginate or egg white (albumin) are acceptable to be used for sealing the outside wrapper, e.g., tortilla, over the meat or poultry filling.
When used, the presence of these ingredients must be disclosed in the ingredients statement.
The amount of the binders used should be a minimum to accomplish the technical affect.
BLINTZES (Jewish): A filled delicate pancake resembling the crepe of France.
The standard for crepes is applied to this product.
BLOCKWURST: A semi-dry type sausage.
The maximum MPR is 3.7:1.
used into into which
BLOOD: See: 318.6(b)(7) 317.8(b)(31) BLOOD AND TONGUE SAUSAGE: Same as blood sausage, except cured and cooked pork or beef tongues are used.
BLOOD PUDDING: A nonspecific product made with livestock blood.
The product name must be followed by an ingredients statement.
BLOOD SAUSAGE: A cooked sausage formulated with blood and some meat.
Usually contains pork skins and/or pork jowls.
May also contain sweet pickled ham fat, snouts, and lips.
If the product does not contain meat, it must be labeled as "Blood Pudding."
BOHEMIAN PEESKY: Made of salt-cured pork trimmings, seasoned with garlic, pepper, and salt.
The label must show true product name, e.g., "Seasoned Salt Cured Pork."
BOINGGHETTI: This label must show a true product name, "Spaghetti with Chicken Sauce."
The product must contain at least 6% cooked chicken meat.
BOLO: Contains beef and pork, water, nonfat dry milk, and flavoring.
The label must show a true product name, i.e., "Beef and Pork, Water and Nonfat Dry Milk Product."
BOLOGNA, LEBANON: See: Lebanon Bologna BOLOGNA: (Cooked Smoked Sausage) 1.
Standard Bologna - Large size 4 to 5 inches in diameter for slicing.
2.
Ring Bologna - About 2 inches in diameter in a casing horseshoe shaped or tied in a ring.
3.
Ham Bologna - May have large chunks of ham mixed in with the standard bologna emulsion.
At least 50% ham required.
Can also be labeled "Ham Bologna" if made with all ham emulsion.
See: 319.180 BOLOGNESE: A ragu meat sauce.
The product may be labeled as "Bolognese Sauce" or "Bolognese Meat Sauce."
BONE-IN MEAT WITH SAUCE: Must have at least 50% meat(cooked basis).
Sauce must comply with 9CFR 319.312.
BONELESS BREAST TRIMMINGS: Boneless breast trimmings (turkey or chicken) are defined as trimmings that are removed from the breast portion only.
When a product is formulated with boneless breast trimmings, the amount of skin should be indicated in order to determine that the meat requirement is met for a standardized product and that the product is properly labeled.
Trimmings from the ribs may be identified as white turkey or white chicken trimmings, or white turkey or white chicken rib meat (excluding skin).
BOUDIN (FR): A meat sausage or pudding usually made with chicken and veal or chicken and pork.
It should be labeled "Boudin Sausage" (if it meets the sausage standard), or "Boudin Pudding."
It may contain byproducts and rice and is usually uncured.
BRAN: See: Cereal Extenders BRATWURST: This sausage may not contain byproducts, eggs, liquid milk, vegetables, or cheese.
It may contain antioxidants.
Product with BBQ
BRATWURST, COOKED: Chicken has been identified in the permitted.
approved in product name.
cooked bratwurst when Antioxidants are not
BRATWURST, CURED: Products that meet the requirement for bratwurst but also contain cures must be labeled as "Cured Bratwurst."
BRATWURST, Poultry: Same requirements as for "BRATWURST."
There is no limitation on beef fat, when properly identified in the product name.
BRAUNSCHWEIGER-LIVER SAUSAGE: The following labeling options may be used: Braunschweiger - A liver sausage (or Liverwurst) Braunschweiger - (Liver Sausage (or Liverwurst)) The second alternative must contain the parentheses.
See: 319.182 BREAD STUFFING: If product contains more than 3% meat, it must be processed under inspection.
Product name should be "Bread Stuffing with Meat" or "Bread Stuffing with Pork," etc.
BREADED AND PRE-BROWNED (BREADING SET IN HOT OIL): Uncooked breaded products with the must state "ready to cook" or some the product is not cooked, or show the label.
These products also instructions.
BREADING MIXTURES (With Paprika): Paprika may be added to breading mixtures for the purpose of enhancing or influencing the color.
However, the statement "Breading Colored with Paprika" need not be shown when paprika is listed in its correct position in the ingredients statement.
breading set in hot oil other term to indicate cooking instructions on require safe handling
BREAKFAST LINK SAUSAGE: Regular fresh sausage which does not have to be made with pork.
BREAKFAST LINKS OR PATTIES: The names "Breakfast Links" and "Breakfast Patties" can be considered fanciful names which must be followed by a descriptive product name.
Such products are acceptable without compliance with the fresh pork sausage or breakfast sausage standard.
If the names "Breakfast Links" or "Breakfast Patties" are used without further qualification, the products must meet either the fresh pork sausage standard or the breakfast sausage standard.
BREAKFASTS (Containing Meat): The product must contain at least 15% cooked meat or poultry or meat or poultry food product based on the total net weight of breakfast.
BRESAOLA: A dry cured beef which is rubbed with spices and wine, similar to Coppa.
BRINE CONCENTRATION IN THE FINISHED PRODUCT: Salt X 100 Salt + Moisture BROCHETTE: Meat or poultry cooked on a skewer.
The term "brochette" does not require further qualification.
A name such as "Beef Brochette" is acceptable.
BROCIOLA (Braciola or Brasiola) (IT): A rolled and tied product formulated from pork, cheese, salt, flavoring, and parsley.
May also be made from beef.
Species must be identified in product name.
BROILED: Permitted labeling when product has been subject to direct heat.
Has no standard regarding the degree of doneness.
BROMELIN: A proteolytic enzyme used to soften tissues.
Solutions consisting of water, salt, monosodium glutamate, and bromelin applied or injected into cuts of beef shall not result in a gain of more than 3% above the weight of the untreated product.
Treated items require a qualifying statement, e.g., "Tenderized in a Solution of Water and Bromelin" to indicate use of the enzyme.
See: 317.8(b)(25) 381.120 BROTH, BEEF OR PORK: No distinction has been made between "broth" and "stock."
They may be used interchangeably as the resulting liquid from simmering meat and/or bones in water with seasonings.
Both products have an MPR of 135.1 or a 67.1 MPR for concentrate.
BROTWURST: A cured and cooked sausage that may be smoked.
BROWN AND SERVE SAUSAGE: The standard is based on one of the four options as listed below: 1.
Moisture Protein Ratio (MPR) is no more than 3.7:1, fat limited to 35%, and 10% water at formulation.
2.
No more than 10% added water at formulation and a yield of no greater than 80%.
3.
No more than 8.8% added water formulation and a yield no greater than 85%.
at
4.
Product must meet fresh sausage standard before cooking.
The label must show true product name, e.g., "Brown and Serve Pork Sausage."
BROWN AND SERVE SAUSAGE (Canned): A cooked sausage, usually without cure, and not more than 8% water.
The weight of the sausage at canning shall not exceed weight of fresh uncured meat ingredients plus weight of curing and seasoning ingredients.
BROWN SUGAR: Brown sugar must be declared in the ingredients statement as "Brown Sugar."
BRUNSWICK STEW: The product must contain at least 25% (fresh basis) of at least two kinds of meat, one of which may be poultry.
Product must contain corn as one of the vegetables.
See: Poultry Brunswick Stew BUFFALO MEAT: See: Game Meat BUFFALO STYLE CHICKEN WINGS: These are chicken wings "hot," or "spicy" sauce.
separate container.
that are coated with a "mild," The sauce is sometimes sold in a
BUFFALO STYLE WINGS OR BUFFALO WINGS: These are fanciful names that require a descriptive name, e.g., "chicken wings coated with sauce."
The sauce may be "mild," "hot," or "spicy."
BUNG: Large intestine used as a casing.
BURGER: Meat or poultry products labeled with the term "burger" must conform to the standard for hamburger (319.15(b)) and poultry burgers (381.160).
BURGOO: A thick meat or Soup," "Burgoo soup or stew that must contain more than one kind of poultry and vegetables.
If it is labeled "Burgoo the meat soup standard is applicable; if labeled Stew," the stew standard is applicable.
BURGUNDY SAUCE WITH BEEF AND NOODLES: The product must contain at least 25% cooked beef in the product, with up to 20% cooked noodles.
Product must contain enough wine to characterize the sauce.
BURRITOS: A Mexican style sandwich-like product consisting of a flour tortilla, various fillings, and at least 15% meat or 10% cooked poultry meat.
The flour tortilla is rolled and may or may not have tucked ends.
Fillings may contain, in addition to meat or poultry meat, such major ingredients as beans, potatoes, cheese, rice, tomatoes, and chilies.
Examples of product names are "BEEF BURRITO," "TURKEY BURRITO," "CHICKEN FAJITA BURRITO," AND "CHILI VERDI WITH BEANS BURRITO."
If ingredients, e.g., rice or beans, are declared in the product name, they must appear in the proper order of predominance.
Ingredients cannot be mentioned in the product name unless all other ingredients present in amounts equal to or above the declared ingredient are included in the name, e.g., "BEANS, BEEF, TOMATO, ONION, AND RICE BURRITO."
The use of "Red Chili" or "Green Chili" or a similar designation of the chili content in a starburst, flag, or similar display, separated from the product name, is acceptable.
If such designations are used as part of the descriptive name, the presence of the chilies must appear in the correct order of predominance, and all other ingredients present in amounts equal to or greater than the chilies must appear in the product name.
A claim or name that identifies the use of shredded meat or shredded poultry meat is permitted.
However, if ground meat or ground poultry meat is also used, its presence must also be identified in the claim or name, e.g., "Shredded Beef and Ground Beef Burrito."
"BURRITO" alone, may be used to name the product without a descriptive name.
However, the ingredients statement must appear directly beneath "burrito."
BURRITOS WITH SAUCE OR GRAVY: Product must contain at least 50% burritos.
BUTIFARRA-SAUSAGE: An uncured sausage.
Labeling that features the "Butifarra" would require an additional product name: term
Pork Sausage - for those products that meet the fresh pork sausage standard.
Fresh Sausage - for those products that include byproduct but do not meet the standard for pork sausage.
Sausage - for those products that fermented.
The term Puerto Rican Style would manufactured in Puerto Rico.
See: Policy Memo 002 dated May 30, 1980 BUTT: The term "Butt" must be used in conjunction with name of the primal part.
BUTTCOLA: Used as a coined name only - must be accompanied by true product name, e.g., "Boneless Cooked Pork Shoulder Butt."
BUTTERMILK (Dried): Dried buttermilk derived from sweet cream is acceptable as an ingredient in meat food products.
Not permitted in sausage.
BYPRODUCTS: The term "byproducts" on meat product labels shall be accompanied by the name of the species from which derived and individually named, e.g., Beef Byproducts (heart, kidney, liver).
They may also be listed by species, e.g., calf liver, beef heart, etc. are be incubated applicable or if
CACCIATORE, CACCIATORA (IT): An Italian term meaning hunter or sportsman.
which must be labeled as "Cacciatore Sausage."
CADDIES: Caddies or display cards used to display fully labeled product shall not bear an inspection legend and, therefore, can be reused.
The caddies or display cards may contain a picture of a product that has a legend on it.
CAJUN: Refers to product made in Louisiana.
CAJUN BRAND MADE IN : Dry Sausage
Refers to any products not required to meet the standards for "Cajun" or "Cajun Style."
CAJUN STYLE/CAJUN RECIPE: Acceptable identification for products containing onion/onion powder/dehydrated onion, garlic/garlic powder/dehydrated garlic, white pepper, red pepper, and black pepper.
CALA, CALLE, CALLIE: Coined names for the lower portion of pork shoulder.
be qualified as "Pork Shoulder Product."
CALABRESE (IT): A salami originating in Southern Italy.
entirely of pork seasoned with hot peppers.
CALCIUM CASEINATE: Acceptable as a binder in nonspecific products.
CALCIUM PROPIONATE, SODIUM PROPIONATE: Used as an ingredient in crust, breading, stuffing, etc., to retard mold growth.
Up to 0.32% permitted alone or in combination based on weight of flour used.
Calcium or sodium propionate must be shown contiguous to the product name, e.g., "Calcium Propionate Added to Retard Spoilage of Crust."
See: 318.7(c)(4) Usually made Must
CALF LIVERS, HEARTS: Large calf livers and hearts may be designated as "beef livers" and "beef hearts."
CALZONE, CALZONI (IT): Turnover-like product made with poultry, cheese, and seasonings 25% meat or 14% poultry meat.
product name, e.g., "Sausage and CANADIAN PRODUCTS: See: Smoke CANADIAN STYLE BACON (Made in USA): The term "Canadian Style Bacon," when featured on the label as a product name or part of a product name (i.e., as a description, etc.), may stand alone without an additional qualifier indicating the true geographical origin of the product.
"Chunked and Formed" and "Water Added" products permitted, provided proper labeling is applied.
are dough stuffed and baked.
It The label must Cheese Filling with meat or must contain show a true in Dough."
Uncooked and/or unsmoked "Canadian Style Bacon" is also permitted, provided labeling describes the product as uncooked and/or unsmoked.
Product which is identified as "Canadian Style Bacon" is made from a trimmed boneless pork loin.
On the shoulder end, the cross section of the longissimus dorsi muscle shall be equal to or larger than the combined cross sectional areas of the splenius and semispinalis capitis muscles.
The ham end shall be removed anterior to the ilium.
The exposed faces shall be approximately perpendicular with the skin surface.
The dorsal and ventral side on each end of the "Canadian Style Bacon" shall not be more than 1.0 inch different in length.
The belly is removed adjacent to the longissimus dorsi muscle.
All bones and cartilage shall be removed.
The tenderloin and the flesh overlying the blade bone are excluded.
The surface fat (and false lean when necessary) shall be trimmed to 0.3 inches thick at any point.
The fat on the ventral and dorsal sides is neatly beveled to meet the lean.
See: Policy Memo 050B dated December 19, 1985
CANADIAN STYLE BACON MADE WITH/FROM PORK SIRLOIN HIPS: The sirloin is obtained by removing a 5- to 7-inch section of the pork loin immediately in front of the hip or pelvic bone.
The sirloin hip is obtained by removing the half of the sirloin which comprises the posterior end of the pork loin.
The tenderloin is not included and surface fat shall be trimmed to 0.3 inches in thickness.
The labeling for these Canadian Style Bacon products must bear a qualifying statement, adjacent to the product name, clarifying that pork sirloin hips are included or that the product is made entirely from pork sirloin hips, e.g., "Canadian Style Bacon--Includes Pork Sirloin Hips" or "Canadian Style Bacon--Made from Pork Sirloin Hips."
The smallest letter in the qualifier should not be less than one-third the size of the largest letter in the product name.
The qualifier must be of equal prominence to the product name.
Chunked (or chopped) and formed varieties and substances controlled by the protein fat free (PFF) regulation for cured pork products 319.104 shall be labeled in accordance with applicable guidelines.
Use of this type of product in a secondary product, e.g., a pizza, requires complete identification only in the ingredients statement; the product name of the secondary product need only refer to Canadian Style Bacon, e.g., Canadian Style Bacon Pizza.
See: Policy Memo 116 dated July 11, 1988 CANNED CHOPPED BEEF OR PORK: Cured product with no more than 3% water in formula.
CANNELLONI (IT): Product must contain at least 10% meat or 7% cooked poultry meat.
Cannelloni is an Italian term referring to a product with the same characteristics as "Ravioli" except Cannelloni has a tubular form.
The label must show a true product name e.g., "Beef Cannelloni."
CANTONESE STYLE POULTRY: Sauteed in soy sauce which, by rapid cooking at a high temperature, gives the product a brownish character.
CAPACOLLO, COOKED (Capicola, Cappicola, Capacolo) (IT):
Capocolla,
Capacola,
Capicollo,
Boneless pork shoulder butts which are cured and then cooked.
The curing process may be dry curing, immersion curing, or pump curing.
The cured product is coated with spices and paprika before cooking.
This product shall always be labeled with "Cooked" as part of the product name.
Water added is permitted.
CAPON: A surgically unsexed male chicken (usually under 8 months of age) that is tender-meated with soft, pliable, smooth-textured skin.
CAPPELLETTI WITH MEAT IN SAUCE: Must contain product).
CARAMEL COLORING: Caramel is considered a natural color.
However, when caramel coloring is added to a product, the product name must be qualified to indicate the presence of artificial coloring, e.g., "Cooked Roast Beef-Caramel Coloring Added" or "Artificially Colored."
This requirement does not apply to gravies, sauces, and similar products where the use of such coloring is customary.
Seasoning mixes containing small quantities of caramel coloring may be used if the caramel coloring does not impart color to the finished product.
Caramel coloring may be used on the surface of raw products, e.g., beef patties, if the name is appropriately qualified.
However, caramel coloring may not be added directly to the formulation of a raw product where the caramel coloring becomes an integral part of the total product.
See: Policy Memo 112 dated June 6, 1988 CARAWAYWURST: See: Kuemmelwurst at least 12% meat (similar to a macaroni
CARBONADE (FR): Product must contain at least 50% meat.
It may contain beef, pork, or mutton, and beer or wine.
Product is slowly cooked, either by braising or stewing.
Label must show a true product name, e.g., "Beef Carbonade."
CARRIERS: Substances, as defined by the Food and Drug Administration, that carry flavoring compounds, e.g., essential oils, on their surface, and are not expected to provide a functional effect, e.g., binding and emulsifying, in the finished food product and are considered incidental.
Some substances, e.g., maltodextrin and modified food starch, are not carriers but actually diluents or bulking agents, and must be declared in the ingredients statement.
Dextrose and/or sugar are commonly used as carriers for spice extracts and resins of spices.
The carrier must be declared in the ingredients statement, except in those cases where a sweetening agent is used separately in formulating the meat or poultry product and the use of the spice mixture will not result in the quantity of the carrier being more than 0.75% of the seasoning mix.
When a determination cannot be made from the information on the label application, declaration is required.
Salt, when used as a carrier, regardless of amount used.
CASING, ARTIFICIAL: Frankfurters packaged in retail containers with the artificial casing left on must bear a prominent statement, e.g., "Remove casing before eating," contiguous to the product name on the label.
CASING (COLLAGEN): Collagen casings are prepared from beef hides specially processed and formed into casings.
For classification purposes, they are edible casings but are not considered natural casings.
CASSEROLE: Product must contain at least 25% meat or 18% cooked meat.
CASSOULET (FR): Product must contain at least 25% meat.
A complex stew consisting of dried white beans and a combination of pork, lamb, game, and sausages.
The ingredients are cooked, then put into a casserole, usually covered with crumbs, and will always be declared
baked.
Label must show true product name, e.g., "Beans and Bacon in Sauce."
CATSUP: Shall be listed in the ingredients statement either as catsup or tomato catsup with a complete sublisting when permitted in meat food products.
Catsup is not permitted in sausage or ground (chopped) beef patties.
When used in fresh meat patties, product name must reflect the use, e.g., "Beef Patties with Catsup."
See: 21 CFR 155.194 CAUL FAT: Is lacy beef fat from the abdominal cavity.
It may be shown on a label as caul fat, beef suet, or beef fat.
CENTER CUT PORK CHOPS: An acceptable name for chops cut from center cut pork loin.
See: Center Cut Pork Loin, Bone-In CENTER CUT PORK LOIN, BONE-IN: This term refers to the pork loin with the blade and the sirloin portions removed by straight cuts made approximately perpendicular to the split surface of the backbone and the length of the loin.
The sirloin is removed anterior to the hip bone cartilage, exposing the gluteus medius.
The blade portion shall be removed to leave no more than 11 ribs present.
CENTER CUT PORK LOIN, BONELESS: This term refers to the center cut pork loin from which the tenderloin, all bones, and cartilages have been removed.
On the blade end, the longissimus dorsi (LD) shall be approximately equal to or larger than the spinalis dorsi, and the rhomboideus shall not be present.
The sirloin is removed anterior to the hip bone cartilage, exposing the gluteus medius.
CENTER SLICE: When the term "Center Slice" is used on labels for slices of ham from smoked and cooked, smoked, or water cooked hams,
product must be sliced from an area of the original ham positioned about 1 inch on each side of a center cut.
CEREAL EXTENDERS: Meal or flour derived from cereal grains may be listed on labels as cereals.
Flour not classed as cereal products, e.g., bean flour, soy flour, and potato flour, shall be declared by their specific name.
Wheat Bran is not acceptable as a cereal where cereals are approved as binders/extenders in meat and poultry products.
Wheat bran is a product resulting from the milling of wheat grain.
CERTIFIED: With the exception of the term "Certified Pork" the term "certified" implies that the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) and the Agriculture Marketing Service (AMS) have officially evaluated a meat product for class, grade, or other quality characteristics.
When used under other circumstances, the term should be closely associated with the name of the organization responsible for the "Certification" process (e.g., "XYZ Company's Certified Meat," or "Our Certified Meat").
See: Certified Pork CERTIFIED PORK: Pork that has been treated for trichinae by one of the approved methods.
See: 318.10 for trichinae treatment requirements CERVELAT: A cured and cooked sausage, often a semi-dry or dry summer sausage.
Hog stomachs, beef tripe and extenders are permitted.
There is no MPR (moisture protein ratio) requirement.
CHAROL, CHAROIL: A natural smoke flavoring.
CHA SHU BOW (CH): A steamed bun with a dry roasted pork filling requiring 15% cooked pork.
Label must show true product name, e.g., "Steamed Bun with a Pork and Cabbage Filling."
CHECK OFF BLOCKS: The use of check off blocks on immediate containers for identifying products that look alike but are different in composition is not permitted.
Examples of products that may look alike but are different in composition follow: 1.
Ground Beef and Beef Patty Mix 2.
Partially Defatted Chopped Defatted Beef Fatty Tissue Beef and Partially
3.
Frankfurters and Frankfurters with Variety Meats 4.
Finely Ground Chicken and Finely Ground Chicken Meat 5.
Comminuted Chicken and Comminuted Kidney and Sex Glands Removed Chicken with
However, exceptions to this policy may be granted by FLD.
Exceptions would require that the establishment operators develop a procedure which can be readily monitored to ensure correct labeling.
See: Policy Memo 083A dated May 12, 1988 CHEEK MEAT, BEEF: Natural proportions are considered to be 2 percent.
See: Policy Memo 098B dated August 1, 1990 CHEESE: 1.
When cheese is declared in the ingredients statement of a fabricated product, cheddar cheese must be used in the product's formulation.
2.
Swiss, Gruyere: The term "Gruyere" pertains to a cheese that closely resembles "Swiss Cheese" both in its appearance and on analysis, although it has smaller holes than Swiss Cheese.
FDA advises that Gruyere Cheese is a suitable substitute for Swiss Cheese and gives the same character to a finished food product, e.g., "Chicken Cordon Bleu." 3.
The term Cheese may appear in the product name, e.g., "Ham and Cheese Loaf," provided the common name is declared in the ingredients statement.
4.
When a cheese product and meat or poultry food product are packaged together, the product name shown on the label must show the name of each component product.
For example, if slices of ham and slices of a cheese product are packaged together, the product name should include "Ham" and the name of the cheese product (e.g., Ham and Pasteurized Processed American Cheese).
Alternatively, the Pasteurized Processed American Cheese could be parenthetically qualified contiguous to the product name (e.g., "Ham and Cheese (Pasteurized Processed American Cheese").
The name "Ham and Cheese" alone would be acceptable if the cheese used was "Cheddar Cheese."
5. Use of substitute or imitation cheese in products where real cheese is expected (e.g., Cordon Bleu) requires the product name be changed or qualified to indicate the presence of the ersatz cheese.
Substitute and imitation cheeses cannot be described as "cheese" in the product name.
There is no limitation on the amount of ersatz cheese used.
6.
Reduced fat cheeses may be identified on the label as "Reduced Fat Cheese."
However, the name of a standardized cheese may not be associated with the phrase "Reduced Fat Cheese" (e.g., Reduced Fat Cheddar Cheese).
See: 21 CFR 133 for a listing of standardized cheeses CHEESE, PASTEURIZED PROCESSED: An acceptable name for pasteurized processed cheddar cheese.
Other types of processed cheeses would have to be listed, e.g., "Pasteurized Processed Swiss Cheese."
CHEESE (PASTEURIZED PROCESSED CHEESE FOOD OR SPREAD): Is a cheese food product with a standard of identity, but is not considered a cheese.
Therefore, it cannot be used in meat food products where cheese is an expected ingredient, e.g., "Cheesefurters" or "Veal Cordon Bleu."
It is acceptable in non-specific loaves, etc.
CHEESE PRODUCTS CONTAINING MEAT: Product must contain more than 50% meat to be amenable.
CHEESE SAUCE: A sauce containing a characterizing cheese ingredient.
All ingredients of the sauce should show in parentheses following "Cheese Sauce."
CHEESE SMOKIES: A cooked smoked "Cheesefurter."
CHEESEFURTER: A meat food product resembling a sausage which consists of a mixture of meat and cheese.
The formula shall contain sufficient cheese to characterize the product so it may be labeled "Cheesefurter."
See: 319.181 CHEESEWURST - CHEDDARWURST: Such names are not considered common or usual names, or descriptive names, and must be accompanied by a true descriptive name, e.g., "Smoked Sausage with Cheese."
CHEVON (FR): Goat meat used for food.
CHICHARRONES (PR): An acceptable fanciful name that must be accompanied by the name "Fried Pork Skins."
CHICHARRONES de POLLO (PR): An acceptable product name for "Marinated Cut-up Fried Chicken" sold in Puerto Rico.
When product is destined for sale only in Puerto Rico, "Chicharrones de Pollo" can be the product name.
When destined for sale in other places, "Chicharrones de Pollo" must be explained with true product name.
CHICKEN, ALOHA: "Aloha Chicken" is acceptable as a coined name which must be followed by a true product name, e.g., "Chicken and Sauce with Rice."
The standard for the product is 22% cooked poultry meat. sausage.
Same cheese requirements as
CHICKEN AND NOODLES AU GRATIN (FR): Product must contain at least 18% cooked chicken meat.
CHICKEN CORDON BLEU (FR): Product must contain not less than: 1.
2.
60% chicken breast meat (sliced).
5% ham or Canadian Style Bacon.
Mozzarella, or
3.
Cheese (either Swiss, Gruyere, Pasteurized Processed Swiss).
4.
Not more than 30% batter and breading (if used).
CHICKEN ENCHILADAS: Product must contain chicken meat.
CHICKEN ENCHILADA SUIZA: The product sauce.
The cream, or characterize name, e.g., CHICKEN FRIED: Any breaded product which has been fried.
consists of chicken enchiladas with a cream sauce used must be made with sour cream, heavy whipping cream in an amount sufficient to the sauce.
The label must show a true product "Chicken Enchilada with Cream Sauce." at least 15% raw or 10.5% cooked
CHICKEN PAPRIKA: Product must contain at least 35% chicken.
A Hungarian dish.
Sauce must contain either sour or sweet cream and enough paprika to give a pink color.
CHILI: 1.
2.
"Brick Chili" or "Condensed Chili" requires 80% meat.
Cereal is limited to 16%.
Chili with reconstitution directions should meet the chili standard when reconstituted.
3.
When beef heart meat, cheek meat, or head meat is used in excess of 25% of the meat block, it must be reflected in the product name, e.g., "Chili with Beef and Beef Heart Meat."
When beef appears in the product name, BEEF MAY BE THE ONLY MEAT SOURCE USED.
Beef Chili may not contain beef fat or other beef byproducts.
"Chili Gravy with Meat" requires at least fresh meat and no more than 8% cereals.
40%
4.
5.
6.
Cured meats are not an expected ingredient in chili; when used, they must be shown as part of the product name.
The terms "Chili" or "Chili con Carne" may be used interchangeably.
7.
See: 319.300 CHILI COLORADO: Product must meet 319.300 requirements.
Chili peppers must be exclusively of the red variety.
If a prepared chili powder is used, it must be prepared exclusively from red chili peppers.
The term "Colorado" is used for red more than "Rojo" in Mexico.
The term "Rojo" is used more in Spain, Puerto Rico, and Cuba.
See: Policy Memo 013 dated September 12, 1980 CHILI-MAC: Product must contain at least 16% meat.
The label requires a true product name, e.g., "Bean, Macaroni and Beef in Sauce".
CHILI PEPPERS - CHILIES: May be listed in the ingredients statement as red pepper, cayenne pepper, or spice.
See: Chili Relleno CHILI PIE: Chili component of the total product must have at least 40% fresh meat, e.g., when product is labeled "Chili Pie with Chili, Onions, Corn Chips, and Cheese."
CHILI PUPS: An emulsion stuffed in casing and smoked.
Label requires a true product name, e.g., "Chili con Carne and Ground Beans Product."
Product must contain at least 60% fresh meat in total formulation.
CHILI RELLENO: Product must contain at least 12% fresh meat and be coated with a batter and then fried.
Sometimes product is called "Chili Pepper Relleno."
Relleno means stuffed.
CHILI SAUCE WITH MEAT: Product must contain at least 6% meat.
CHILI SPAGHETTI: Product must contain at least 16% meat.
Label requires true product name, e.g., "Beans and Spaghetti with Beef in Tomato Sauce."
CHILI VERDE (SP): Product must meet 319.300 requirements.
Chili peppers must be exclusively of the green chili or verde chili pepper varieties.
If a prepared chili powder is used, it must have been prepared exclusively from green chili or verde chili peppers.
Products, e.g., "Chili Verde With Beans" shall comply with 319.301 and the above requirements for "Chili Verde."
See: Policy Memo 013 dated September 12, 1980 CHILI WITH BEANS: 1.
"Brick Chili with Beans" or "Condensed Chili with Beans" requires 50% meat and cereal is limited to 16%.
2.
Chili with Beans with reconstitution directions should meet the Chili with Beans standard when reconstituted.
3.
When beef heart meat, cheek meat, or head meat is used in excess of 25% of the meat block, it must be reflected in the product name, e.g., "Chili with Beef and Beef Heart Meat with Beans".
4.
When beef appears in the product name, beef may be the only meat source used.
Beef Chili with Beans may not contain beef fat or other beef byproducts.
5.
Cured meats are not an expected ingredient in Chili with Beans; when used, they must be shown as part of product name.
6.
"Chili with Beans" formulae usually contain up to 25% of beans in a product.
About one-fourth of these beans may be incorporated in the product as ground beans and should be listed in the ingredients statement as ground beans.
7.
The terms "Chili with Beans" or "Chili con Carne with Beans" may be used interchangeably.
See: 319.301 CHIMICHANGA: Product must contain at least 15% meat or 10% poultry meat.
A Mexican specialty from the State of Sonora.
Like burritos, product is made by wrapping a flour tortilla around a filling; but unlike the burrito, chimichanga is fried until brown and crisp.
CHINESE PEPPER STEAK: A Chinese main dish, usually served with rice, must contain at least 30% cooked beef.
Beef steak is cut into thin strips, browned in fat or oil, and added to a soy flavored sauce.
Vegetables are also added to the sauce.
Green pepper strips are always used and other vegetables may be included.
CHINESE STYLE BEEF: Product must contain grain alcohol and soy sauce.
CHINESE STYLE SAUSAGE: Product must contain grain alcohol and soy sauce.
CHIPPED BEEF: Beef that is dried, chipped, or sliced and may be cured or smoked.
An MPR 2.04:1 is required.
It may be chunked, ground, chopped, and formed.
If so, the product name must be qualified, e.g., "Chipped Beef, Chunked and Formed."
When used as a secondary product e.g., "Creamed Chipped Beef," the product name qualifier is no longer required.
Acceptable fill: 1.
2.
3.
2 oz. in a 4 fluid oz. glass, or 2 1/2 oz. in a 5 fluid oz. glass, or 5 oz. in a 9-5/8 fluid oz. glass.
CHIPPED HAM: An acceptable name for wafer-thin sliced ham.
CHITTERLINGS: Approved label must identify the species of food animal from which the product is derived.
Hog bungs may be labeled "Pork Chitterlings."
The purge under normal conditions should not exceed 20% of the net weight of frozen chitterlings.
See: 317.8(b)(30) CHOHINITA PIBIL (MEX): Product consists of pork filling wrapped in banana leaves and baked.
The leaves are removed prior to serving.
The label requires a true product name, e.g., "Pork Filling Wrapped in Banana Leaves."
CHOICE GRADE, FANCY GRADE POULTRY: "Choice" or "Grade" on "Prime" and that product "Fancy" may not poultry labels.
"Top Quality" on is equal to U.S. be used in conjunction with These terms and others like poultry labels indicate only grade A.
See: FSIS Directive 6810.1 dated April 15, 1986 See: Poultry Chop Suey 319.311 CHOPETTE: May be used as part of the product name, e.g., "Pork Chopette," but the product must conform to the standard for Fabricated Steak described in 319.15(d).
CHOPPED BEEF PATTIES: Product meets chopped beef standard but is in patty form.
CHOPPED BEEF, VEAL, PORK, LAMB: See: Ground Beef 319.15(a) CHOPPED CHICKEN LIVERS: Total product must contain at least 50% cooked chicken livers.
Wheat flour and similar ingredients are acceptable.
CHOPPED CHICKEN COMPONENTS: LIVERS COMBINED WITH OTHER CHARACTERIZING
Product must contain at least 30% cooked livers, "Chopped Chicken Livers with Eggs and Onions".
CHOPPED HAM:
e.g.,
A total of 15% shank meat is permitted.
This is 3% above the normal proportion of 12% shank meat found in a whole ham.
See: 319.105 See: Green Weight CHOP SUEY, AMERICAN: Product must contain at least 25% fresh meat in total formulation.
A stew-like dish prepared with beef, pork, or veal.
Vegetables include onion and celery.
Macaroni, noodles, or rice are usually incorporated in the product, although recipes suggest serving chop suey over one of these.
CHOP SUEY (VEGETABLES WITH MEAT): Product must contain at least 12% fresh meat.
CHORIZO (SP): The product name "Chorizo" can be used for any type of chorizo sausage that is cooked, dry, semi-dry, cured and fresh without further product name qualification.
Other requirements for various types of chorizo apply, including the sausage standard.
It is seasoned with Spanish pimento
and red pepper.
Partially defatted pork fatty tissue is acceptable in Chorizo.
CHORIZO, FRESH: These products may contain vinegar.
The vinegar used must have a strength of no less than 4 grams of acetic acid per 100 cubic centimeters (20o C.).
See: 318.7(c)(1) Policy Memo 034 dated October 1, 1981 CHORIZO IN LARD: Product must contain at least 55% chorizo.
CHORIZO IN LARD, CANNED: Canned chorizos that are packed hot, usually in lard, and are not thermally processed must have a moisture protein ratio of 1.8:1 and a pH of not more than 5.5.
An alternative standard is a water activity (Aw) of 0.92.
CHORON SAUCE (FR): Is a bearnaise sauce containing tomato puree or paste and is served with grilled meat or poultry.
CHOURICO: Is Portuguese for sausage, and is an acceptable product name.
CHOW MEIN WITH MEAT: Product must contain at least 12% fresh meat.
CHUB: An acceptable name to denote a short, usually plump meat food product, unsliced in casing.
See: Bologna CHULENT (CHOLENT): Product must contain at least 25% fresh meat.
A meal-in-one dish of Jewish cuisine made in various ways.
The product name can stand without qualification.
CITRIC ACID: Citric acid and salts of citric acid, when used alone or in combination with other chemical preservatives, e.g., BHA and BHT in fresh meat products, have several functions.
It is used to help retain fresh meat color, to prolong shelf lifewithout preventing deterioration or spoilage, and to increase the activity of BHA and BHT.
As such, where its use is permitted, it must be declared by its common or usual name.
Its purpose must be indicated in the product name, e.g., "to help protect flavor."
See: 318.7(c)(4) CLUB STEAK OR DELMONICO: These terms are restricted to meat from the anterior portion of the beef short loin extending from the T-bone area up to and including the 13th rib.
COARSE GROUND MEAT TRIMMINGS: Coarse ground trimmings may be shipped from an establishment without meeting the 30% fat limitation if a specific fat content is declared, e.g., "Coarse Ground Beef Trimmings-40% fat beef."
If the labeling terminology is "Coarse Ground Beef" or "Ground Beef", the 30% fat limitation shall apply.
COATED WITH: Meat/poultry and meat/poultry food products that have a coating of spices, etc., shall be labeled to show the coating with the product name, e.g., "Coated With Spices" or "Rubbed With ."
COCKTAIL FRANKFURTERS: A small frankfurter diameter.
See: 319.180 COINED NAMES: Words, e.g., "Daintee," "Cola," "Picnic," etc., have been approved for labels, provided product label contains the true product name ("Pork Shoulder").
See: 317.2(e) normally about 2" long and 1/2" in
COLD SMOKE: Product that is smoked without the use of heat.
COLOR ADDED: Where approved colors are permitted to surface and the coloring changes the product, the product name shall be Added" or "Artificial Color Added" as See: 317.2(j)(5) COLORED CASING: Colored casings on meat and poultry products which do not transfer color to the product, but which change and give a false impression of the true color of the products, must be labeled to indicate the presence of the casings.
Acceptable terminology includes "Casing Colored" or "Artificially Colored."
These phrases must appear contiguous to the product name.
Casings which are the same color as the product and not misleading or deceptive, e.g., a white opaque casing on a summer sausage, do not have to be so labeled.
Also, products consisting of whole muscle bundles, e.g., hams, pork butts, etc., packaged in colored wrappings where a cut surface is not visible through the casing are exempt.
See: Policy Memo 095 dated February 27, 1986 COMITROL PROCESSED MEAT PRODUCTS: The use of the term "sliced" is no longer acceptable on labeling to describe meat which has been processed through an Urschel Comitrol.
Terms which are acceptable include flaked, chopped, shredded, or ground.
Mechanical operations, e.g., the use of a hydroflaker or a hydroslicer to break up frozen blocks of meat which are then processed through a Comitrol shall not appear as part of the product name.
However, if the processor would like to demonstrate that the product is sliced after being processed through the Comitrol, a sample must be submitted to the Product Assessment Division before a determination can be made.
See: 319.15(d) be added to product's natural color of the qualified as "Color the case may be.
COMMINUTED STEAK PRODUCT: Product shall be labeled to show the processing procedure contiguous to the product name, e.g., "Beef Sirloin Steak, Chopped and Shaped."
See: 319.15(d) COMPLETELY COOKED: This term has been approved for use on labels identifying ham commodities reaching an internal temperature of 158-162o F. during processing.
This heat results in a product that is relatively dry, quite pliable with the tissues separating readily, and the fat is rendered to a marked extent.
COMPOSITE INGREDIENTS STATEMENT: Processors who use a multi-ingredient product, e.g., pepperoni from various sources, as an ingredient, may identify all the ingredients that may be present from all the various formulations (i.e., a composite ingredients statement).
However, the ingredients identified as those that may be present can only be those ingredients that are minor in nature and cannot include ingredients, e.g., the meat component that have a bearing on the overall characteristics or value of the product.
The minor ingredients must be identified using one of the following examples of acceptable formats: 1.
pepperoni (pork, beef, water, salt, spices, sodium nitrite.
May also contain lactic acid starter culture, sugar, and sodium ascorbate). bacon bits (cured with water, and/or sugar, sodium nitrite). salt, dextrose
2.
3.
pepperoni, pork, beef, water, sweeteners (contains one or more of the following: sugar, dextrose, fructose, corn syrup), salt, spices, sodium nitrite).
Labeling records must identify all the ingredients of each type of component that is used so the accuracy of the composite ingredients statement can be determined.
All labeling for meat and poultry products must either comply with this type of format or, alternatively, accurately list all ingredients used in the product.
See: Policy Memo 072 dated May 18, 1984
CONEY OR CONEY ISLAND: Pertains to a frankfurter in a bun with meat sauce and is not considered a geographic term.
CONEY SAUCE OR CONEY ISLAND SAUCE: A coined name for hot dog chili sauce with meat, which is not considered a geographic term.
Coined name must be accompanied by a true product name, e.g., "Hot Dog Chili Sauce with Meat."
CONTINUOUS PROCESS LARD: Is an acceptable temperature process by means of heat describe method of COOKBOOKS: Cookbooks, recipes, and menus are used to substantiate styles of cookery, including methods of preparation and common ingredients.
These references exist as resources to the culinary arts and are used to define typical meat and poultry dishes.
COOKED BEEF, EQUIVALENCY: In lieu of fresh beef.
A 70% yield figure is used if no yield information is provided.
See: FSIS Directive 7124.1 Table 2 COOKED RED MEAT PRODUCTS CONTAINING ADDED SUBSTANCES: Cooked corned beef products and cooked cured pork products not addressed by the cured pork products regulation (9 CFR 319.104), that weigh more than the weight of the fresh uncured article, may be prepared if they are descriptively labeled to indicate the presence and amount of the additional substances.
Acceptable product names include: "Cooked Corned Beef and X% Water" or "Cooked Cured Pork and Water Product, X% of Weight is Added Ingredients," and "Cooked Pastrami and Up to 20% of a Solution."
The ingredients of the solution may accompany the product name or appear in locations prescribed for ingredient statements.
Product name prominence guidelines are found in Policy Memo 087A and Policy Memo 109.
If product name qualifiers, such as "X% of Weight is Added Ingredients," are used, the name for lard, rendered by a low separating the oil from the fatty tissue and centrifugal force.
Label records preparation.
labeling prominence guidelines used for cured pork products as found in 9 CFR 319.104(b) apply.
Uncured red meat products that weigh more than the weight of the fresh article after cooking should be labeled with a qualifying statement indicating the amount of solution remaining after cooking, e.g., "After cooking, contains X% of a seasoning solution of . . . ."
The ingredients of the solution may accompany the qualifying statement or appear in locations prescribed for ingredient statements.
The qualifying statement must be one-fourth the size of the largest letter in the product name.
If the ingredients of the solution accompany the qualifier, they must appear in print one-eighth the size of the most prominent letter in the product name.
Other labeling prominence guidelines are found in Policy Memo 087A.
If cooked, uncured red meat products that contain added solutions/substances prior to cooking are cooked back to or below the weight of the fresh (green weight) article, words, such as "seasoned" and "flavored," are to be used to reflect the addition of the added substances, e.g., "Seasoned Cooked Beef."
For cooked products, the percent added substances for the label statement is determined by subtracting the fresh (green) weight of the article from the weight of the finished cooked product, (i.e., after injecting, marinating, etc., and cooking), dividing by the weight of the finished product, and multiplying by 100.
This policy is intended to apply to solutions that impart favorable flavor and other sensory characteristics, but not to solutions containing ingredients used to extend a product, such as isolated soy protein and carrageenan.
A prerequisite for use of labels for these products is a partial quality control (PQC) program approved by the Food Safety and Inspection Service, as described in section 318.4 of the Federal meat inspection regulations.
Uncooked red meat products containing added substances are addressed in Policy Memo 066C.
See Policy Memo 084A dated November 30, 1994 COPPA (IT) PORK SHOULDER BUTTS, UNCOOKED, DRY CURED: See: 318.10(c)(3)(iii)
CORN DOG OR KORN DOG: A coined name which must be accompanied by a true product name, e.g., "Batter Wrapped Franks on a Stick."
Product is limited to 65% batter and a minimum of 35% frankfurter.
CORN DOG OR KORN DOG (POULTRY): "Corn Dogs" made from poultry cooked sausage, e.g., poultry franks or poultry frankfurters, must show the "kind" of poultry used in conjunction with the coined name "Corn Dogs," e.g., "Chicken (or Turkey) Corn Dogs."
The "kind" name should be shown in type size at least one-third the size of the largest letter of the coined name.
A descriptive name, e.g., "Batter Wrapped Chicken Frank on a Stick," must accompany the coined name.
If the descriptive name is at least one-third the size of the coined name, the "kind" name need not precede the coined name.
See: Policy Memo 061A dated September 16, 1985 CORN FLAKE CRUMBS: Ingredients statement Flake Crumbs."
CORN MEAL MUSH WITH BACON: Product must contain at least 15% cooked bacon.
CORN SYRUP SOLIDS OR CORN SYRUP: Either name is acceptable in the ingredients statement.
The maximum amount permitted in meat food products is 2% calculated on a dry basis.
Corn Syrup Solids may contain up to 2% vegetable oil as an anticaking agent without being declared in the ingredients statement of a meat product.
See: 318.7(c)(4) CORNED BEEF AND CABBAGE: Product must contain at least 25% cooked corned beef.
CORNED BEEF (Canned, Cooked with Natural Juices): Canned product labeled "Cooked Corned Beef with Natural Juices," is limited to 10% added solution before cooking.
If the added solution is greater than 10%, the label must must reflect ingredients of "Corn
indicate the total added solution, e.g., "Cooked Corned Beef and Water product-x% of weight is added ingredients."
See: Cooked Corned Beef Products With Added Substances CORNED BEEF (FAMILY STYLE): The term "Family Style" has been accepted for display bags or like devices used to identify chunks of "Corned Beef Brisket" or like products.
The pieces weigh individually from 3 to 4 pounds.
The term "Family Style" is related to the size or weight of the package and is intended to convey that the piece is suitable (from an amount standpoint) for usage by an average or larger-sized family.
CORNED BEEF, GRAY: Gray corned beef is not a cured product but one that contains water, salt, sugar, flavorings, etc.
It should be labeled as "Gray Corned Beef," "Gray Corned Beef Rounds," etc.
The label must show an ingredients statement rather than a curing statement as shown on other corned beef labels.
CORNED BEEF HASH: When canned corned beef is used as an ingredient of corned beef hash, it should be identified in the ingredients statement as cooked corned beef.
Nonfat Dry Milk or cereal is not permitted.
See: 319.303 CORNED BEEF, WAFER THIN SLICED (Chopped, Pressed, and Cooked): It is permissible for this product to be ground prior to the application of the curing ingredients, then pressed and cooked.
CORNISH STYLE PASTY: Product must contain at least 25% beef.
Product consists of a round or square of pie crust with a filling of chopped beef, potatoes, and onions.
COTEHINO: An acceptable name for a Portuguese sausage.
The meat block is formulated with pork, pork byproducts and/or pork skins, and cured.
Binders are permitted.
COTTAGE BUTT (Coined name): Product name must be qualified as a "pork shoulder butt."
COTTO SALAMI: A cooked salami.
See: Salami, Cotto COTTONSEED FLOUR, DEGLANDED: Is an approved extender and binder in meat food products, e.g., soups, stews, loaves (other than "meat loaf"), and sausages as described in 319.180.
It is also acceptable in batters, breading, gravies, and sauces.
It must be labeled in the same manner as other extenders and binders and identified as "Deglanded Cottonseed Flour."
COUNT: The word "approximate" is not acceptable in reference to count.
See: Manual 18.64(a) through (e) COUNTRY BRAND: Product name must be followed by "Made in City and State."
COUNTRY FRIED: Refers to a fried product that is usually breaded.
not considered a geographical term.
COUNTRY STYLE CHICKEN: Cut up chicken in which the wishbone is left whole.
COUNTRY STYLE (FARM STYLE) SAUSAGE: When sausage products are labeled "farm style" or "country style," they must be prepared with natural spices with the exclusion of oleoresins, essential oils, or other spice extractives.
Sugar is the sweetening agent for "farm style" or "country style."
HVP, MSG, and antioxidants are permitted ingredients.
See: 317.8(b)(2) Manual 19.3(a) It is
COUNTRY STYLE PUDDING: There is no recognizable style for this product; therefore, the name is not acceptable.
See: MPI Regulation 317.8(b)(1) COUPONS: When enclosed in consumer packages, they shall not contain an expiration date, or shall allow purchasers at least six months for redemption from date of first sale.
If the label states a coupon is enclosed inside a consumer sized package, the label must clearly and conspicuously disclose its presence, conditions, and limitations of the coupon.
CRACKER MEAL: It is a manufactured product not considered a cereal and is not permitted in sausage.
It is permitted in meat loaves and nonspecific meat food products.
CRACKLINGS: See: Pork Cracklings CREAMED BEEF (Chipped or Dried): Product must contain at least 18% dried beef.
CREAMED CHEESE WITH CHIPPED BEEF: Product consists of cream cheese, chipped beef, cream and chopped onions.
The meat component must be at least 12% of the total formulation.
CREAMED SAUCE WITH MEAT OR CREAMED MEAT PRODUCTS (Chipped Beef, Cooked Beef, Sausage, Ham, Franks, Meatballs, Etc.): Product must contain at least 18% meat or meat products (on a cooked basis).
The kind of meat product used should be reflected in the product name (e.g., "Creamed Cured Beef, Chopped, Pressed, Cooked").
CREOLE (FR): Product must contain at least 25% fresh meat.
Term applies to many dishes made with tomatoes, spices, and green peppers.
CREOLE SAUCE: Product must contain green peppers, tomatoes, and spices.
CREPE FILLING: Must contain at least 40% cooked meat or 20% cooked meat if filling has one other characterizing ingredient, e.g., cheese, and at least 14% cooked meat when the filling has two other characterizing ingredients, e.g., cheese and mushrooms.
This is based on the total weight of the filling.
CREPES: Product must contain: 1.
At least 20% cooked meat when the filling contains no other major characterizing component.
2.
At least 10% cooked meat when the filling contains one other major characterizing component (e.g., cheese).
3.
At least 7% cooked meat when the filling contains two or more other major characterizing components (e.g., cheese and mushrooms).
These percentages product.
CROISSANT: A crescent shaped roll requiring 18% cooked meat.
Label must show a true product name, e.g., "Croissant with a ham and cheese sauce filling."
CROQUETTE: Product must contain at least 35% cooked meat, based on total formulation.
Beef, ham, etc., must appear as part of the product name.
CROUTE (FR): Is enclosed in a pastry shell or covered with crust.
CUBE: Is meat cut into uniform squares, e.g., "Beef Cubes for Stew." are based on the total weight of the
CUBED: Is acceptable on labels of meat products, e.g., steaks or patties that have been cubed in a cubing machine.
The word "Cube" is not acceptable.
CURED BEEF PATTIES: A cured beef pattie which was ground and then cured.
"Corned Beef Seasoned" may qualify "Cured Beef Pattie" in smaller letters.
CURED MEAT PRODUCTS - Labeling of Mechanically Reduced: The traditional names of cured meat products, e.g., bacon, may be used even though mechanical reduction-like chopping or chunking has taken place before the product has acquired the characteristics expected of the product, provided the finished product acquires the characteristics expected.
Furthermore, the mechanical reduction must be noted in the product name or in a qualifier to the product name (e.g., chopped bacon or bacon-chopped and formed).
See: Policy Memo 033 dated September 4, 1981 CURED MEAT PRODUCTS - Packed in Brine: Cured meat products, e.g., pork tails, pork snouts, and cured boneless beef brisket, that contain 120-200 PPM nitrite and are packed and sold in brine solution, do not require a handling statement, e.g., "Keep Refrigerated," provided the finished product has at least 10% brine concentration, and the packing medium contains a sufficient quantity of salt to maintain the 10% brine concentration in the product.
CURED PORK: Cured pork that is not applicable to PFF (Protein Fat Free) standards (319.104, and 319.105) must be labeled according to Policy Memo 084A.
CURED SMOKED STIX: An acceptable name if followed immediately by an ingredients statement.
If product meets the sausage standard it may be identified as "Smoked Sausage."
See: Sticks
CURED UNCOOKED BEEF: Cured uncooked unsmoked beef tongues and cured unsmoked beef, other than corned beef briskets, may be labeled as such if they contain no more than 10% added substance.
Corned beef brisket may be labeled as such if it contains no more than 20% added substance.
See: 319 Subpart D Policy Memo 066C for the labeling of these products when they contain more than these levels of added substances CURED UNSKINNED PORK FAT: Is not acceptable in products listed in 319.180.
See: Pork Skins CURRIED SAUCE WITH MEAT (POULTRY) AND RICE CASSEROLE: Product must contain at least 35% cooked meat or poultry meat based on the sauce and meat portion only.
CURRY POWDER: Is a mixture of spices and other ingredients, including turmeric.
Curry powder must be sublisted in the ingredients statement.
CURRY PRODUCT: 1.
Meat Curry: Must contain at least 50% meat (lamb, beef, etc.) 2.
Poultry Curry: poultry meat.
CUSHION (Ham): The posterior, rounded, and more fleshy side of the ham.
CUTLET, PORK: "Pork Cutlet" may consist of pork temple meat, inside masseter muscles, and small pieces of lean from the tip of pork jaws.
These are flattened and knitted together in "cutlet" size products by means of "cubing" or "Frenching" machines, or by hand pounding with "cubing hammers."
The term "cutlet" relates to thin slices of meat.
They can be Must contain at least 35% cooked
identified as sliced pork meat product when the designation clearly states the specific part of the carcass from which the meat in the product is derived (e.g., "Pork Loin Cutlets").
All of the terms should be conspicuously displayed on labels.
CUTLET, POULTRY: Poultry cutlets may be fabricated as opposed to using whole pieces of poultry meat.
However, the term "cutlet" must be properly and distinctly qualified to describe the product, e.g.: "Turkey Cutlet From a Turkey Loaf" "Chicken Cutlet From Chicken Roll" "Turkey Cutlet, Chopped and Formed"
DAISY: The term "Daisy" must be accompanied by true product name, e.g., "Cured Pork Shoulder Butt."
DEER MEAT: See: Game Meat DEHYDRATED MEAT CALCULATION FACTOR: The fresh meat equivalent based on a given amount of dehydrated meat can be found by multiplying the weight of the dehydrated beef by the factor 2.8.
This factor was derived as follows: Assuming canners and cutters grade beef was used, the composition of meat would be approximately 12% fat, 18% protein, 69% water, and 1% ash.
Then 100 pounds of beef, when dehydrated to 5% moisture, would be 100 less 64 or 36 pounds dehydrated meat.
Thus, 100 divided by 36 equals 2.8.
Assuming that the amount 100 pounds of fresh beef pounds of protein, then protein found by analysis amount of dehydrated beef meat.
of dehydrated beef equivalent of is that quantity containing 18 18 divided by the percentage of of dehydrated beef would be the equivalent to 100 pounds of fresh
DEHYDRATED POULTRY CALCULATION FACTOR: The moist deboned based on a given meat which can be dehydrated poultry cooked poultry or poultry meat equivalent amount of dehydrated poultry or poultry found by multiplying the weight of the or poultry meat by the factor of 4.0.
DEHYDRATED PRODUCTS WHEN WATER IS ADDED: Three methods are acceptable for listing dehydrated products.
Listing of the ingredients (1) As "water, dehydrated potatoes" or "dehydrated potatoes, water," whichever is the proper order, (2) As "reconstituted potatoes," or (3) As "rehydrated potatoes."
If the reference was to meat instead of potatoes, the word beef, pork, or whatever was appropriate would be substituted for the word "potatoes."
DEHYDRATED SOUR CREAM: The use of 3.9% dehydrated sour cream is equal to 10% sour cream.
DEHYDRATED VEGETABLES: Dehydrated onions (chips) and dehydrated potatoes used as a component, rather than as a seasoning agent, should be listed as dehydrated onions, and dehydrated potatoes.
DEHYDROFROZEN VEGETABLES: May be labeled potatoes.
by the vegetable name, e.g., carrots,
DELI OR DELICATESSEN STYLE: This terminology has been permitted on labeling for ready-to-eat meat food products that consumers would normally expect to find in a delicatessen.
DELMONICO BEEF STEAK: "Boneless Club Steak."
See: Club Steak DERMA: When the term "derma" is used in the product name, only natural casing or skin must be used.
DETACHED SKIN: Not permitted in bologna, frankfurters, braunschweiger, or similar sausages.
See: MPI Manual 17.13(j)(3) 319.180 and 319.182 Also See: Pork Skins DEVILED MEAT FOOD PRODUCT OR POTTED MEAT FOOD PRODUCT: Product is made from mostly meat byproducts with some meat.
The product name, "Deviled Meat Food Product," need not appear all on one line.
However, the name must be displayed in a prominent manner and must be featured in the same size, style, and color print on the same background.
See: 319.761
DEVILED POULTRY: Is a semiplastic cured poultry food product made from finely comminuted poultry in natural proportions and containing condiments.
Deviled poultry may contain poultry fat, provided that the total fat content shall not exceed 35% of the finished product and the moisture content shall not exceed that of the fresh unprocessed poultry.
When skin is in excess of natural proportions, skin must be included in the product name (e.g. "Deviled (Kind) with (Kind) Skin Added").
DEXTROSE: See: Carriers DIAPHRAGM: See: Steak, Beef Skirt DIGLYCERIDES, MONOGLYCERIDES: Emulsifying agents for rendered fats.
Show contiguous to product name as "Mono and diglycerides Added."
DINNER DOG: A coined name - must show true product name, e.g., and Soy Protein Concentrate Product."
DINNERS AND SUPPERS, FROZEN: Frozen products labeled as "dinner" or "supper" must weigh at least 10 ounces and shall contain at least 3 components consisting of the following: meat, poultry, cheese, eggs, vegetables, fruit, potatoes, rice or other cereal-based products (other than bread or rolls).
This is not intended to include products like casseroles and stews that have all of the components combined.
Sauces and gravies are not considered one of the components.
They may also contain other servings of food, e.g., soup, bread or rolls, appetizer, beverage, and dessert, and these components may be included in the minimum 10-ounce net weight requirement.
If meat is featured in the product name, e.g., Beef Dinner, the requirement is 25% or 2.5 ounces cooked meat.
If a meat food product is featured in the product name, e.g., Beef Burgundy Dinner, then 25% or 2.5 ounces of meat food product If poultry is featured in the name, e.g., is needed.
Chicken Dinner, the standard is 18% or 2 ounces cooked deboned poultry meat, whichever is greater.
However, if a poultry food product is featured in the product name, e.g., "A Meat
Chicken a La King Dinner, the 25% or 2.5 ounces of poultry food product, whichever is greater, is needed.
The meat requirement for products with net weights greater than 10 ounces may be established exclusive of the appetizer, bread, and dessert, provided the remaining components weigh not less than 10 ounces.
The name for dinner and supper products shall consist of or include a listing of each of the dish components in descending order of predominance by weight, for example, Fried Chicken Dinner - Fried Chicken, Mashed Potatoes, Peas and Carrots.
Dinner or supper identification may appear on side panels without the complete product name shown, for example, "Fried Chicken Dinner" or "Beef Dinner."
When a dessert is one of the components of a frozen dinner or supper, i.e., a multicomponent item, it may appear out of the order of predominance in the product name and appear as the last component in the product name.
DIPPED IN A SOLUTION OF PAPAIN: When steaks or other meat cuts are dipped in approved proteolytic enzymes, a prominent statement like "Tenderized in a Solution of Water and Papain" shall show contiguous to the product name.
See: 317.8(b)(25) 381.120 DIPPED IN HOT VEGETABLE OIL, ETC.: Product name to Cottonseed Oil."
be qualified, OR e.g., "Browned TO in Hot MOLD
DIPPED IN POTASSIUM SORBATE GROWTH: See: Potassium Sorbate DIPPED STEAKS:
PROPYLPARABEN
RETARD
Steaks made from a solid piece of meat may be dipped in a solution of water and flavoring.
The result in gain shall not be more than 3% above the weight of the untreated product.
A prominent statement, like "Dipped in a Solution of ," shall show contiguous to the product name.
DISODIUM INOSINATE 
must be identified on labels by these
DIXIE BACON: True product name, e.g., "Pork Jowl Dixie Bacon, Cured and Smoked" shall appear on the label.
DIXIE SQUARE: Same as for Dixie Bacon.
DOG FOOD: See: 355.29 DOUGH CONDITIONER: A generic or class name that cannot stand alone in the ingredients statement.
The term "Dough Conditioner" must be followed immediately by the common or usual name of all ingredients present.
DRIED EGG WHITE ADDED: See: Wheat Gluten DRIED SOUP MIXES (MEAT): Dried meat soups are not amenable.
Poultry - See: 381.15 DRY AGED: Fresh Meat periods of controlled airflow to tenderness, is held (without vacuum packing) for various time (usually 10 days to 6 weeks) under temperatures (34o F to 38o F), humidity, and avoid spoilage and ensure flavor enhancement, and palatability.
There is a difference of opinion regarding the best coolerhumidity.
Some prefer low humidity of from 70 to 75% so that exposed surfaces of meat remain dry.
Others use humidities up to 85 to 90% in order to purposely develop a mold growth on the outside of the meat and reduce evaporation losses.
Ultraviolet light may be used to reduce microbial load in the aging room.
The number of days aged does not have to appear on the label when the product is identified as "Dry Aged" (e.g., "Dry Aged Beef.")
DRY CURED: Product labeled as "dry cured" shall not be injected with a curing solution or processed by immersion in a curing solution.
DRY MILK PRODUCTS: Approved dry milk items milk, calcium-reduced lactose-reduced dried reconstituted prior to declared on the label as DRY SALT CURED: Dry salt cured product may contain a curing solution injected directly into the tissue but not through the circulatory system before it is covered with a dry curing mixture.
It may be momentarily moistened to facilitate initial salt penetration but shall not be immersed in a curing solution.
DUAL WEIGHT REQUIREMENT FOR STUFFED POULTRY LABELS: Poultry products that consist solely of poultry and stuffing, e.g., a "Stuffed Turkey" and "Stuffed Turkey Breast," shall bear weight statements on the label indicating the total net weight of the product and a statement indicating the minimum weight of the poultry in the product.
When a stuffed poultry product is a component of a dinner or an entree, only the total net weight needs to be shown on the label.
See: Policy Memo 018A dated December 26, 1985 DUCK, SALTED: This product should reach an internal temperature of 155o F. DUMPLINGS WITH BEEF: The product must formulation.
DUTCH BRAND LOAF: A nonspecific loaf that must be qualified as "Made in USA." contain at least 18% meat in total include whole dry milk, nonfat dried skim milk, dried whey whey.
If nonfat dry milk addition to product, it would "Reconstituted Skim Milk." dry and is be
EASTER NOLA: Salami that is made with pork that is coarsely chopped and mildly seasoned with black pepper and garlic.
EGG BARLEY: Ingredients must be sublisted in the ingredients statement.
EGG, DRIED EGG WHITE ADDED: See: Wheat Gluten EGG FOO YOUNG WITH MEAT: The product must contain at least 12% meat.
EGG FOO YOUNG WITH POULTRY: The product must contain at least 3% poultry meat.
EGG ROLL: Acceptable crunchy vegetables are bamboo shoots, bean sprouts, cabbage, carrots, celery, green peppers, snow peas, and water chestnuts.
EGG ROLL, VIETNAMESE STYLE: The product must contain soy bean noodles or cellophane noodles, and fish sauce or anchovy extract.
They are usually rolled in a thin spring roll skin or a dry rice paper skin.
EGG ROLL WITH MEAT: The product must contain at least 10% meat.
EGG ROLL WITH POULTRY: The product must contain at least 2% poultry meat.
EGG WASH: See: Glazing of Bakery Items
EGGS BENEDICT: The product must contain at least 18% cured smoked ham.
A poached egg on a toasted English Muffin, topped with a slice of ham, and covered with hollandaise sauce.
EGGS, FRESH: For breakfast-type foods the egg portions may be referred to in the product name and the ingredients statement as "Fresh U.S. Grade A Large."
The eggs must be received in shells or broken and blended and not in dry or frozen form.
ELK MEAT: See: Game Meats EMBLEM: See: Awards EMPANADILLAS (SP): A turnover containing 25% fresh meat or poultry (raw basis).
The species or kind is part of the product name, e.g., "Beef Empanadillas".
The product may vary in size from large to hors d'oeuvre size.
EMPANADILLAS CHORIZO: An empanadilla that contains at least 25% fresh chorizo or 17% dry chorizo.
ENCHILADA (SP): The product must contain at least 15% meat or 10.5% poultry meat.
A Mexican type food consisting of a "tortilla" which has been filled with a variety of fillings and then rolled.
The species must appear in the product name, e.g., "Beef Enchilada."
ENCHILADA WITH BEEF CHILI GRAVY OR ENCHILADA PREPARED WITH MEAT AND SAUCE: The product must contain at least 50% Enchilada.
ENCHILADA - Sonora Style: The product consists of two or more tortillas stacked "pancake style" with filling spread between each tortilla.
Cheese may be mixed into the tortilla dough prior to frying.
ENTREE (Principal Dish or Main Course): Product labeled entree should fall into one of the following categories: 1.
All meat or meat food product - 100% meat or meat food product.
2.
Meat or meat food product and one vegetable; or meat or meat food product and gravy - 50% cooked meat or meat food product.
3.
Meat and Vegetable with Gravy - 30% cooked meat portion; meat and gravy portion at least 50%, (e.g., Salisbury Steak with Potatoes and Gravy").
4.
Meat or Entree portion of products - 25% cooked meat product, (e.g., Meat Loaf require 25% meat loaf).
ENZYME TREATED PRODUCT: Product from carcasses of animals injected with papain; liver, heart, tongue, cheek and head meat, trimmings, boneless beef, tenderloin, tails, tripe and cuts of meat not showing an imprint of the roller brand reading, "tenderized with papain," shall be properly identified and kept separate from other product.
Kidneys must be segregated and properly labeled.
When such product leaves an official establishment, the immediate container shall bear a label showing, in addition to the other required labeling, a statement like "tenderized with papain" prominently displayed contiguous to the product name.
The establishment will furnish retail dealers handling such product with labels bearing the statement, "tenderized with papain" prominently displayed contiguous to the product name for use by such dealers on consumer packages or on product prepared from carcasses of animals injected with papain.
Inspection personnel visiting retail markets should observe the effectiveness of this requirement.
When retail outlets a meal type or meat food Dinner would
do not follow this identification, these facts should be immediately reported to the Food Labeling Division.
ENZYME TRIMMINGS FROM ANTE-MORTEM INJECTED BEEF: Beef trimming from this operation may be used in fresh meat products without label declaration.
ENZYMES - PROTEOLYTIC: A 3% limit permitted pickup on dipped items, e.g., steak and solid pieces of meat.
The label must declare the presence of the enzyme, e.g., "Tenderized with Papain."
Trimmings from this method may be used in fresh meat products up to 25% of the formula, provided the finished product is immediately frozen and that distribution is limited to institutional use only.
The labeling record should state the conditions and means of inspection control.
Meat from this method may be used in cooked ground beef products up to 25% of the formula without showing the ingredients of the solution.
See: 317.8(b)(25) 318.7(a)(1) 381.120 EXPERIMENTAL/SAMPLE (E/S) PRODUCTS, LABELING: IICs may approve labels for E/S products which are prepared in official establishments and distributed to one or more locations for the purpose of consumer sampling and/or pre-market evaluation.
Specific requirements for IIC approval of E/S product labels are as follows: 1.
All ingredients must be approved for use in the meat and poultry inspection regulations.
Use of such ingredients must conform to the conditions and restrictions listed in the regulations.
2.
Labels must bear all mandatory labeling features required by the meat and poultry inspection regulations.
3.
The phrase "Not For Sale" displayed on the label.
must be prominently
4.
A statement of intended distribution must be included on the label, e.g., "For Test Purposes Only, Experimental Product," "Consumer Samples."
5.
Products labeled with a conform to the standard.
standardized
name
must
See: Policy Memo 096 dated May 6, 1986 EXTRA AND MORE THAN: The terms "extra" or "more (component) than" may be used provided the following guidelines are followed: (1) There is at least a 10% increase in the particular component of interest over the amount that is found in the usual or "regular" formulation.
(2) Information must be provided with the label application that compares the product formulation containing the "extra" amount of the component to the regular formulation of the same product to establish that at least a 10% increase in the component has occurred.
Therefore, the usual or "regular" component claims at the time of label review must be presented so that the necessary comparison of formulations can be made.
(3) In the situation where production of the "regular" product formulation ceases, the "extra" or "more (component) than" product labels would be given a 6-months temporary approval.
(4) A comparison to a similar product on the market may be made to support the "extra" or "more/than" type claim, provided suitable market basket data are submitted with the label application that establish the similarity of formulations and show the increased amount of the component over the "usual" amount.
See: Policy Memo 118 dated October 31, 1988
FAGGOTS: A combination of beef, veal, and pork cured with salt, nitrates, and sugar.
Sheep or hog casings are used and sausage is linked in pairs, each about 6 inches long.
Classed as cooked smoked sausage.
FAJITAS: The Spanish translation is "little belts" or strips of meat.
Fajitas are strips of seasoned or marinated red meat or poultry meat which have been cooked.
Red Meat Fajitas require labeling in accordance with the current policy memo on added solutions.
Fajitas may also be sandwich-like product, requiring 15% strips of cooked meat or poultry meat (excluding the marinade), topped with onions, peppers, and sauce, and rolled in a flour tortilla.
Fajita, including the name of the meat or poultry, may stand alone, e.g., "Beef Fajita," "Chicken Fajita."
FAMILY PAK: Acceptable, provided weight statement.
the term does not qualify the net
FAMILY STYLE CORNED BEEF BRISKET: See: Corned Beef (Family Style) FARM STYLE SAUSAGE: See: Country Style (Farm Style) Sausage FARMER SAUSAGE CERVELAT: Is usually a semi-dry sausage; but may be made in dry form.
Usually made of equal parts of pork and beef delicately seasoned without garlic.
FARMER SUMMER SAUSAGE: This is a special type of sausage made of beef and pork, salt, spices, nitrite or nitrate, and heavily smoked.
It is classed as "Cervelat," and no extenders are permitted.
It is dry with an MPR of 1.9:1.
The word "Farmer" is considered a generic term, and labels can be approved without any qualifying words like "Style" or "Brand."
Such labels are not required to bear a statement identifying the place of manufacture.
The Product must be trichina-treated.
FATS AND OILS IN RED MEAT PRODUCTS: See: Artificial Marbling - Red Meat Products FENUGREEK: Classified as an herb.
It is used in some curry powder formulae.
Available as "Fenugreek Seed."
May be declared as a spice.
FILET MIGNON: Beef tenderloin cut into steaks against the grain.
Sometimes wrapped in certified bacon strips in which case the product name must be qualified, e.g., "bacon wrapped."
FLANKEN IN THE POT: The product must contain at least 25% beef.
Product is made from beef plates and may contain such components as Matzo Balls, Noodles, and Vegetables.
True product name, e.g., "Flanken in the Pot with Matzo Balls, Noodles and Vegetables" must be used.
FLANK STEAK: See: Steak, Flank FLAT: "Beef Flats" or "Large Flats" are considered acceptable fanciful names for the Beef Outside Round (biceps femoris muscle), prepared by removing the Beef Eye Round (semitendinous muscle) along the natural seam from a Beef Round, Bottom (Gooseneck) untrimmed, heel out.
These fanciful names must be accompanied by the true product name, e.g., "Beef Outside Round."
FLAVORED WITH --: Any product with a standard in Section 319 of the regulations must meet that standard and may not be designated "flavored with."
If a product does not meet the standard as it appears in the Policy Book it can be labeled "Flavored with."
"Flavored with" can be anything from over 3% fresh meat or 2% cooked meat to below the standard for the product.
FLAVORING: Ingredients, e.g., thiamine hydrochloride, monosodium glutamate, disodium inosinate, disodium guanylate, hydrogenated vegetable oil, and other commonly used materials must be listed separately.
Such ingredients as diacetyl, hexanal, ethyl alcohol, dimethyl sulfide, diallyl sulfide, and furfuryl mercaptan may be declared as artificial flavors or artificial flavorings without naming each.
See: 317.2(f)(l)(i) 317.8(b)(7) 381.118(c) FLEISCHKAESE: Acceptable name for a cured, cooked sausage in loaf form.
FLOUR: See: Cereal Extenders FOIE GRAS PRODUCTS, DUCK LIVER AND/OR GOOSE LIVER: Goose liver and duck liver foie gras (fat liver) are obtained exclusively from specially fed and fattened geese and ducks.
Products in which foie gras is used are classified into the following three groups based on the minimum duck liver or goose liver foie gras content: (A) FRENCH PRODUCT NAME Foie Gras d'Oie Entier Foie Gras de Canard Entier ACCEPTABLE ENGLISH PRODUCT NAME Whole Goose Foie Gras Whole Duck Foie Gras
These are products in which goose liver or duck liver foie gras are the only animal tissues present.
They may contain added substances, e.g., seasonings and cures and when truffles are featured in the product name, they are required at a minimum 3% level.
(B) FRENCH PRODUCT NAME Foie Gras D'Oie Foie Gras de Canard Bloc de Foie Gras D'Oie ACCEPTABLE ENGLISH PRODUCT NAME Goose Foie Gras Duck Foie Gras Block of Goose Foie Gras
Block of Duck Foie Gras Parfait de Foie Gras D'Oie Parfait of Goose Foie Gras Parfait de Foie Gras de Canard Parfait of Duck Foie Gras These products are composed of a minimum 85% goose liver or duck liver foie gras, although "parfaits" may contain mixtures of goose liver and/or duck liver foie gras.
These products may also contain a wrapping or stuffing consisting of the lean or fat of pork, veal, or poultry, pork liver, and/or aspic jelly.
When these ingredients are used, their presence must be indicated in a product name qualifier.
Truffles, when featured in the product name, are required at a minimum 3% level.
(C) FRENCH PRODUCT NAME Pate de Foie Pate de Foie Galantine de Galantine de Puree de Foie Puree de Foie D'Oie de Canard Foie D'Oie Foie de Canard D'Oie de Canard ACCEPTABLE ENGLISH PRODUCT NAME Pate of Goose Liver Pate of Duck Liver Galantine of Goose Liver Galantine of Duck Liver Puree of Goose Liver Puree of Duck Liver
Bloc de Foie Gras de Canard
These products must contain a minimum of 50% duck liver and/or goose liver foie gras and may also contain a wrapping or stuffing of the lean or fat of pork, veal, or poultry, pork liver, aspic jelly, extenders, and/or binders.
When these ingredients are used, their presence must be indicated in a product name qualifier.
Truffles, when featured in the product name, are required at a minimum 1% level.
In all groups, an English translation of the term "foie gras" is not required, although all other product name terms must be translated into English.
The kinds of poultry liver(s) used must be indicated in the product name.
Also, other species and/or binders used must be indicated in a product name qualifier immediately following the product name, while the ingredients statement must follow the product name or qualifier as the case may be.
See: Policy Memo 076 dated September 21, 1984 FOR FURTHER PROCESSING: Products which require further processing at another federally inspected plant may leave a federally inspected plant under one of the following two conditions:
1.
With the name of the finished product qualified by a "For Further Processing" statement (e.g. Turkey Ham For Further Processing); or With a fully descriptive name (e.g. uncooked ham contains up to 30% of a solution).
2.
FOREIGN MEAT AND SOLID INTACT LABELS: Meat/Poultry products imported into the USA must be identified so they are not represented as being of American origin.
Accordingly, they are required to carry labels naming the country of origin.
This is done through wording like "Product of Argentina," shown immediately under product name.
See: 327.14(b)(1) 381.206 FOREIGN NAMES: Foreign names for most meat food products are permitted, provided wording appears which gives the common or English name of the product.
FRESH KIELBASA: Acceptable name for "kielbasa" when made without cures.
FRESH," "NOT FROZEN" AND SIMILAR TERMS WHEN LABELING POULTRY PRODUCTS: The word "fresh" may not be used in conjunction with the product name of: 1.
2.
3.
Any cured product, e.g., corned cured turkey, and prosciutto. beef, smoked stable,
Any canned, hermetically sealed shelf dried, or chemically preserved product.
Any raw poultry, poultry part, or any edible portion thereof whose internal temperature has been below 26 degrees Fahrenheit.
Generally, trademarks, company names, fanciful names, etc., containing the word "fresh" are acceptable, even on products produced in a manner described in 1., 2., and 3.
above, provided the term is used in such a manner that it remains clear to the purchaser that the product is not fresh.
Further processed meat and poultry products, e.g., nuggets, dinners, etc., sold in the refrigerated state, may be labeled as "fresh" even when made from components processed in a manner described in 1., 2., and 3.
above.
See: FSIS Directive 7270.1 dated December 18, 1997.
This entry cancels Policy Memo 022C dated January 11, 1989.
Policy Memo 022C is being canceled and replaced by this entry to reflect the recent regulation on the use of the term "fresh" on the labeling of raw poultry products (9 CFR 381.129 (B) (6)).
This regulation allows the use of the term "fresh" on raw poultry products whose internal temperature has never been below 26 degrees Fahrenheit.
Raw poultry products whose internal temperature has been at or below 0 degrees Fahrenheit must still be labeled with the term "frozen."
Raw poultry products whose internal temperature has ever been below 26 degrees Fahenheit, but is above 0 degrees Fahrenheit, is not required to bear any specific descriptive term.
FRESH THURINGER: Not an acceptable name.
FRIED NOODLES WITH PORK: The product must contain at least 12% fresh pork in total formulation.
FRIED PRODUCTS: Frying medium need not be shown on the label.
FRIED RICE: The term "Fried Rice" has a long association with a rice commodity in which the rice component is boiled.
Accordingly, the term "Fried" in the designation has been considered as acceptable.
FRIED RICE WITH MEAT: The product must contain at least 10% meat; may contain eggs and vegetables.
FRIES: Beef testicles may be labeled as "Beef Fries."
They are not permitted to be used as an ingredient in meat food products.
FRITTERS: The product must contain at least 35% raw red meat/poultry or red meat/poultry food product in the total formulation depending on the name, i.e., "Beef Fritter" must contain 35% beef and a "Chicken Patty Fritter" must contain 35% chicken patty.
Fritters can contain up to 65% batter/breading (coating).
If "breaded" is included in the product name, the batter/breading is limited to 30%.
See: FRIZZES: An acceptable name.
MPR of 1.6:1.
FRONT QUARTER, CHICKEN: The "Chicken Front Quarter" is the same cut as a "breast quarter."
Section 381.170(b)(13) (Standards for kinds and classes, and cuts of raw poultry) in the regulations explains this cut in more detail.
Similar to pepperoni but not smoked.
Policy Memo 089 dated May 29, 1985
GALANTINE OR GALATINE: A molded roll or shape of meat, poultry, or game with forcemeat (finely ground meat or poultry, containing binders) and coated with aspic jelly.
served cold.
When wrapped in pork caul fat, the name should be qualified with "Wrapped in pork caul GALICIAN SAUSAGE: Cured beef and pork is seasoned and stuffed into beef rounds.
It is then smoked at a high temperature.
Cooling is done in a blast of air which produces a wrinkled appearance which is characteristic of Galician sausage.
GAME MEATS: A. Amenability.
Game meat products containing over 3% raw meat (cattle, sheep, swine, goat, horses or other equine) are subject to inspection.
The game meat used in these products must be derived from carcasses slaughtered under the Food Safety and Inspection Service.
The following products composed of meat from game animals are nonamenable to the Federal Meat Inspection Act: 1.
Products made entirely with meat from game animals, or animals other than cattle, sheep, swine, goat, or horse, or other equine.
2.
Products made with meat from game animals with 3% or less of meat or edible portion from cattle, sheep, swine, goat, or up to 30% meat fats provided the only reference to meat or meat byproduct on the labeling is in the statement of ingredients or referred to as "flavored with."
3.
Custom prepared products composed of meat from game animals and up to 30% animal fat.
Labeling "Not For Sale" applies.
See: 303.1(a)(2) B. Inspection Requirements 1.
Buffalo and venison must be federally or State inspected, however, venison may also be produced under the supervision of inspection officials of a country approved to export meat products into the United States.
All other game meat used must be derived from carcasses slaughtered under the Food Safety and Inspection Service.
stuffed usually It is product fat."
GELATIN: It is not permitted in products like sausages, luncheon meat, and meat loaves.
Gelatin is an acceptable ingredient in souse, jellied beef loaf, head cheese canned whole hams, requires qualifier if gelatin is added.
See: MPI Manual 18.19 (b)(2) GELATIN IN POULTRY ROLLS: If gelatin or some other binder comprises more than 3% of the formula, the name of the product must be qualified by wording, e.g., "Gelatin Added."
See: MPI Manual 18.19 (b)(2) GELBWURST: See: German Sausages with Milk GENOA OR GENOA SALAMI: Is a dry sausage product with an MPR not in excess of 2.3:1.
It is prepared with all pork or with a mixture of pork and a small amount of beef.
The meat is given a coarse grind and enclosed in a natural casing.
No smoke is used in its preparation.
GEOGRAPHIC AND RELATED TERMS (REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE ON PRODUCT LABELS): Any label representation that expresses or implies a particular geographical origin of the product, or any ingredient of the product, shall not be used except when such representation is: 1.
A truthful representation of geographical origin, e.g., "Virginia Ham" for a ham produced in the State of Virginia; or 2.
A trademark or trade name which: a. has been so long and exclusively used by a manufacturer or distributor that it is generally understood by consumers to mean the product of the particular manufacturer or distributor, e.g., "Swiss Chalet;" or
b. is so arbitrary or fanciful that it is generally understood by the consumer not to suggest geographical origin, e.g., "Moon Sausage;" or 2.
A part of the name required or allowed by an applicable Federal law, regulation or standard, e.g., "Frankfurter," "Vienna;" or 3.
A name whose market significance is generally understood by consumers to connote a particular class, kind, type or style of product, or preparation rather than to indicate geographical origin of the product, e.g., "Mexican Style Dinner," "Italian Style Pizza."
Such terms must be qualified with the word "style" or "type," unless specifically approved by the Administrator as a generic term, e.g., "Lebanon Bologna," "Genoa Salami," Milan Salami."
Any geographical representation that does not meet the aforementioned guidelines should be qualified by the word "brand," provided that the word "brand" is not used in such a way as to be false or misleading.
A qualifying statement identifying the place where the product was actually made is required in proximity to the brand name, e.g., "Milwaukee Brand Bacon, Made in Chicago, Illinois."
The word "Brand" must be in the same size and style of type as the geographical term.
If the product has a foreign brand name, it may be identified as having been made in this country, e.g., "Scandinavian Brand Bacon, Made in U.S.A.".
See: Policy Memo 068 dated February 9, 1984 GEOGRAPHIC TERMS: (1) Country, Ranch, and Farm in Trade, Branch and Fanciful Names: Trade names, brand names, or fanciful names that include the words country, ranch, or farm, e.g., "Country Kitchen," "Ranch House," "Hickory Farms," or "Carabeef Ranch Brand" do not invoke section 317.8 of the regulations regarding the use of the term "Country" or "Farm".
However, if the terms are used alone in conjunction with the product name, e.g., "Country Stew," then such products must be prepared in the country or on the ranch or farm and meet any other requirements prescribed.
(2) Southern: The term only in areas south of the Mississippi River and Missouri, which states.
"Southern" is restricted to use the Mason-Dixon Line and east of as well as Arkansas, Louisiana, are also considered southern
GERMAN POTATO SALAD: See: Salad-German Potato Salad GERMAN POTATO SALAD WITH BACON: The product must contain at least 14% cooked bacon in total formulation.
See: Salad-German Potato Salad GERMAN SAUSAGES WITH MILK: Whole milk is a permitted ingredient in the following meat food products when the ingredients statement is shown immediately under the name of the product or the milk is shown in a qualifying statement contiguous to the product name: Speckblutwurst, Kalbsbratwurst, Langblutwurst, Blutwurst, Gelbwurst, Zengenwurst, Brand Tongue and Blood pudding kalbslebenwurst.
(Swiss Liver Sausage, kalbslebenwurst should be considered on the same basis as Bockwurst (e.g., no limit on water or milk)).
Milk is a characterizing ingredient in German sausages and not an extender.
Products which contain milk should be called by their proper names.
GIBLET GRAVY (Kind): Requires 7.25% giblets.
The product must contain an equal number of livers, hearts, and gizzards.
GIBLETS: The liver, heart, and gizzard of a poultry carcass.
Although often packaged with them, the neck of a bird is not a giblet.
GLAZING OF BAKERY ITEMS: The glazing or coating of bakery items, e.g., croissants or biscuits with eggs, butter, or milk, is a common practice and does not require a product name qualifier.
The ingredients, however, must appear in the list of ingredients.
GLUCOSE: Not an acceptable name for sugar.
GLYCERIN: May not be added to any product as such; may be used in proprietary mixes.
GNOCCHI (IT): Italian term for dumplings made of wheat or potato flour rolled into rope-like strips about three-quarters of an inch thick and cut into pieces three-quarters of an inch long.
GOETTA: An oatmeal product similar to scrapple.
Goetta is prepared with a formula containing not less than 50% meat and meat byproducts.
The cereal component should consist of oats or oat products and just enough water to prevent product from sticking and burning during the preparation process.
The term "Old Fashioned" when noted on a label for "Goetta" refers to the round shape.
GOETTINGER CERVELAT: A dry cervelat with no byproducts or binders.
GOOSE BREAST UNCOOKED, SMOKED: The product is cold smoked; therefore, the 155o F. requirement is waived since product is labeled "uncooked."
GOOSE LIVER OR GOOSE LIVER SAUSAGE: At least 30% cooked goose liver.
When pistachio nuts are added, product name must be qualified, i.e., "pistachio nuts added."
GORDITAS, MEAT AND POTATO GORDITAS, MEAT/POULTRY: The product must contain at least 15% cooked meat/poultry based on the weight of the total product.
The "species" or "kind" gorditas name (Beef Gordita, Chicken Gordita) may stand alone.
If other characterizing ingredients such as potatoes, rice, beans, etc, are included in the name, they must be reflected in their order of predominance, e.g., Beef and Potato Gorditas, Rice and Chicken Gorditas, as determined by the formula.
GOTEBORG: A Swedish dry sausage made of coarsely chopped beef and sometimes pork.
Mildly seasoned with thyme.
It has a somewhat salty flavor and is heavily smoked, usually in long casings and air dried.
GOTHAER CERVELAT: Originated in Gotha, Germany.
pork finely chopped and cured.
GOULASH: A stew-like product with at least 25% meat or 12% poultry meat.
Unless designated "Hungarian," generally means stew, whether veal, pork, beef, turkey, etc., are used.
Product may be just meat and gravy or meat and gravy with vegetables served with or without rice, potatoes, or noodles.
GOULASH, HUNGARIAN STYLE: The product must contain paprika and at least 25% meat or 12% poultry meat.
May not contain noodles, potatoes or dumplings.
GRADE MARK FOR POULTRY: See: Poultry Grading GRAVIES: The product must contain at least 25% meat stock or broth, or 6% meat.
Mono and diglycerides allowed in amount of 1% in gravies.
GRAVY AND BEEF: The product must contain at least 35% cooked beef (beef same size lettering as gravy).
For 25% cooked beef (beef lettering no larger than one-half size gravy).
GRAVY AND DRESSING WITH PORK OR GRAVY AND PORK WITH DRESSING: The product must contain at least 14% cooked pork.
GRAVY AND POULTRY SALISBURY STEAK: Not more than 65% gravy and at least 35% poultry salisbury steak.
Usually made of very lean
GRAVY AND SWISS STEAK: The product must contain at least 35% cooked meat.
GRAVY AND YANKEE POT ROAST: The product must contain at least 35% cooked beef. cooked with or without vegetables.
GREEK SAUSAGE: The product must contain orange peel.
GREEN WEIGHT: Weight of the raw article substances or before cooking.
GROUND (Species): The product must comply with 319.15(a).
GROUND BEEF: May not contain added fat.
Maximum total fat 30%.
Cheek meat is permitted up to 25% and must be declared in the ingredients statement.
For more than 25%, show as "Ground Beef and Cheek Meat," all the same size.
Beef of skeletal origin, or from the diaphragm or esophagus (weasand) may be used in the preparation of chopped beef, ground beef, or hamburger.
Heart meat and tongue meat as organ meats are not acceptable ingredients in chopped beef, ground beef, or hamburger.
See: Policy Memo 027 dated June 15, 1981 GROUND BEEF AND PORK: The product must be treated for possible live trichinae.
Mixtures of fresh ground pork and beef should not be distributed from official establishments unless the pork is trichinae-treated.
See: 318.10 GROUND BEEF CHUCK AND ROUND: Product to be labeled "Ground Beef Chuck" or "Ground Beef Round" must comply with the following guidelines: before addition of added Beef is
1.
"Ground Beef Chuck" must be derived from all or part the primal part of the beef carcass commonly referred as the "Beef Chuck," except as provided for in 3.
product must comply with the fat requirements 319.15(a).
2.
"Ground Beef Round" must be the primal part of the beef as the "Beef Round," except product must comply with 319.15(a). derived from all or part carcass commonly referred as provided for in 3.
the fat requirements
of to The of of to The of
3.
Generally, shank meat may be added but may not exceed the natural proportion of the beef carcass, which is considered to average 6%.
Higher quantities of shank meat may be used if the shank meat remains attached during the cutting and boning of the boneless chuck or round, or if the processor can demonstrate that a higher percentage is applicable.
4.
The products must be produced under a partial quality control program.
See: Policy Memo 091 dated September 16, 1985 GROUND BEEF PATTIES: The product must meet Ground Beef standard.
GROUND BEEF - Hamburger and Soy Products: Combinations of ground beef or hamburger and soy products may be descriptively labeled, e.g., "Hamburger and Textured Vegetable Protein Product" or "Ground Beef and Isolated Soy Protein Product" if the combination product is not nutritionally inferior to hamburger or ground beef.
If the combination products are nutritionally inferior, they are to be labeled as Imitation Ground Beef (or Imitation Hamburger) or Beef Patty or Beef Patty Mix in accordance with Section 317.2(j)(1) and Section 319.15(c) respectively.
See: Policy Memo 016B dated August 18, 1994 GROUND BEEF - Seasoned: Ground Beef or chopped beef may contain seasoning substances, e.g., salt, sweetening agents, flavorings, spices, MSG, and HVP, provided in condimental proportions.
Paprika or other such substances which might influence the coloration of the product are not permitted.
GROUND MEAT: No water, cereal, permitted.
GUM ARABIC: May be used up to 2% in breading and batter mixes.
GUM TRAGACANTH: A carrier and stabilizer in liquid spice extractives not to exceed 0.1% in finished product.
Not permitted in sausage products.
GUM-Vegetable: Spice extractive products which employ vegetable gums as emulsifiers have been approved.
The addition of vegetable gum is limited to no more than 15% in the seasoning blend emulsion.
GUMBO: A Creole word for okra.
It is now recognized as meaning a dish or a soup thickened with okra.
To qualify, the dish must have okra as an ingredient.
Either the soup or the stew standard would apply, depending on product name ("Chicken Gumbo").
Product identified as "Creole Style Gumbo" does not contain okra, however, it must contain a roux (flour, milk, or water, etc.) or gumbo file (dried powder young leaves and leaf buds of sassafras). soy derivatives, or other extenders
HAGGIS, SCOTTISH: Made of grated liver and heart of a sheep combined with oatmeal, suet, and seasoning, usually stuffed into a pig's or sheep's stomach and boiled.
A meat pudding, formed like a sausage.
HALAL AND ZABIAH HALAL Products prepared by federally inspected meat packing plants identified with labels bearing references to "Halal" or "Zabiah Halal" must be handled according to Islamic law.
The federal meat and poultry inspection program does not certify to the "Halal" or "Zabiah Halal" preparation of products, but rather accepts the statements and markings in this regard offered and applied under the supervision of any Islamic organization.
The words "Halal" or "Zabiah Halal" may be used only on the labeling of meat and poultry products prepared under such Islamic authority.
The identity of the Islamic organization should be available upon request by agency oficial.
Qualification of the words "Halal" or "Zabiah Halal" by such terms as "style" or "brand" does not negate these requirements.
HAM: All tissues the lumbar the method hock, feet, HAM A LA KING: Must contain at least 20% ham (cooked basis).
HAM AND CHEESE LOAF: Nonspecific loaf.
Cheese is chopped into small cubes and combined with finely ground ham.
HAM AND CHEESE SALAD: Product must contain at least 25% ham (cooked basis).
See: Salads HAM AND CHEESE SPREAD: Product must contain at least 25% ham (cooked basis). posterior to vertebrae may of separating skin, and fat the junction of the tuber coxae and be classified as ham regardless of the ham from the carcass.
Detached cannot be so classified.
HAM AND DUMPLINGS AND SAUCE OR GRAVY: Product must contain at least 18% cooked ham.
HAM, BAKED: See: 317.8(b)(10) HAM, BOILED: A fully cooked, boneless product which must be cooked in water and may be processed in a casing or can.
The product may be of various shapes and may be partially cooked in boiling water.
HAM BOLOGNA: See: Bologna HAMBURGER: If fat is added, product must have an ingredients statement.
See: 319.15(b) HAMBURGER PATTIES: Product must comply with 319.15(b).
HAMBURGER STEAKS: Product must comply with 319.15(b).
HAMCOLA: Not an acceptable product name; should be accompanied by true product name, i.e., "Boneless Cooked Ham Coated with Spices."
HAM CAPACOLLA: Product made with ham instead of pork shoulder butts and meets the rest of the requirements of 318.10(c)(3)(ii).
It shall be labeled "Ham Capacolla."
HAM CAPACOLLA, COOKED: Ham that has been cured and then cooked.
HAM, CENTER SLICE: See: Center Slice
HAM, CHOPPED: Shank meat permitted to the extent of not more than 25% over that normally present in the boneless ham.
See: 319.105 HAM - Chopped - Pressed - Cooked - Smoked or Sliced: See: Ham, Chopped HAM CHOWDER - CONDENSED: Product must contain at least 10% cooked ham.
HAM, COOKED: Product cooked in conventional manner which, if labeled "Completely Cooked," should reach an internal temperature of 158o F. HAM-COOKED-SECTIONED AND FORMED: The qualifying phrase "sectioned and formed" is no longer required on boneless ham products, e.g., "ham" and "ham-water added."
The addition of small amounts of ground ham added as a binder to such products may be used without declaration.
The amount of ground ham that may be used can represent nomore than 15% of the weight of the ham ingredients at the time of formulation.
Products containing more than 15% ground ham trimmings must be labeled to indicate the presence of the ground ham, e.g., "a portion of ground ham added."
Policies regarding the required use of terminology such as "chunked and formed" and "ground and formed" will continue.
See: Policy Memo 023 dated February 10, 1981 Policy Memo 041B dated February 15, 1991 HAM CROQUETTES: Product must contain at least 35% cooked ham.
If chopped ham is used, the product name must be "Chopped Ham Croquettes."
HAM, FRESH (or uncured): Ham that does not contain a cure must be labeled either "Fresh" or, if the ham meets the requirements of 319.2,
"Uncured."
This also applies to cooked product, and must be labeled cooked product "Cooked Uncured Ham".
HAM HALF: "Half Ham" is permitted on labels for semi- boneless ham products which during their processing have had the shank muscles removed.
The two halves of the finished product have approximately an equal amount of bone.
The term "No Slices Removed" has also been deemed suitable for use with a ham item referred to as "Half Ham."
HAM-GELATIN ADDED: Show "Gelatin Added".
See: Policy Memo 014 dated September 12, 1980 Keep Frozen HAM LOAF: Meat loaf standard in 319.261 applies.
HAM OMELET: Product must contain at least 18% cooked ham. HAM/PARMA HAM/PROSCIUTTO DI PARMA: Ham, when labeled "Parma Ham" and/or "Prosciutto di Parma," would have to be produced in the region of Parma, Italy, in accordance with Italian Law, which defines the denomination of origin, the territorial limits of production, characteristics of the product, and the method of manufacture.
HAM PEPPERAM: A peppered ham that is coated with spices.
HAM, PIT: Pit Ham is an acceptable product name.
Brand are equally acceptable.
HAM PRESSED: Same as chopped ham.
Pit Style and Pit
HAM PROSCIUTTO (TYPES): See: Prosciutto Prosciutto Cooked Prosciutto Cotto, Cooked Ham HAM, QUARTER, SEMI-BONELESS (No Slices Removed): The product consists of a ham prepared as a "Regular Semi-Boneless, Half Ham" which is sectioned again to result in four pieces just about equal not only in weight but also in content of bone.
HAM ROLL SAUSAGE: Ham trimmings and ham shank meat are permitted.
HAM SALAD: Product must contain at least 35% cooked ham.
Chopped ham may be used without it appearing in the product name.
See: Salads HAM, SCOTCH STYLE: A cured, uncooked, boned, and rolled whole ham either tied or in a casing.
HAM, SHANKLESS: When the term, "shankless" is used in reference to a ham, it indicates that the shank has been removed by a cut through the joint at a right angle to the femur bone.
The distal tip of the semitendinous muscle may be severed above its tendinous attachment, leaving an extension approximately 2 inches long.
The extension is considered an integral part of the ham's body and is usually folded over the femur's end.
HAM, SHANKMEAT IN: See: Chopped Ham HAM SHORTCAKE: Product must contain at least 25% cooked ham.
HAM SLICED COOKED: When product is derived from canned hams with gelatin added, the label shall read "Gelatin Added."
HAM, SMITHFIELD: This is an aged, dry cured ham made exclusively in Smithfield, Virginia.
The use of the words "brand" or "style," e.g., "Smithfield Brand Ham," "Smithfield Style Ham," does not eliminate this requirement.
HAM TRIMMINGS: Ham trimmings, to be labeled as ham, cannot contain excess shank meat.
The fat content will not exceed 35%.
It will consist of at least 65% lean meat as determined by chemical analysis.
HAM, VIRGINIA: Product must either be processed in Virginia or labeled as "Virginia Brand, made in (city and state)."
HAM, WESTPHALIAN OR WESTPHALIAN STYLE HAM: Ham is cut with bone in, the hip bone cut out, cured in a combination of dry and pickle cure but not a pickle alone.
It is smoked in a medium warm (no greater than 100o F.) smokehouse until a shining red brown or chestnut color is acquired.
Beechwood may be used and will impart the characteristic Westphalian flavor.
Other hard woods are also acceptable.
Juniper berries are permitted.
HANDLING STATEMENTS: Acceptable handling statements, in addition to those required in sections 317.2(k) and 381.125, include "Keep Refrigerated - May be Frozen" or "Keep Refrigerated-Can be Frozen."
HANDLING STATEMENTS ON RETORTED PRODUCTS: Handling statements may appear on labels for shelf stable product, even though such product does not have to be refrigerated or frozen, and provided the statement will accurately reflect conditions of distribution and sale.
These products are to be handled in the plant as shelf stable items including incubation and condition-of-container examinations.
Once the product is refrigerated or frozen
for shipment, distribution, and display for sale it is to be handled as a refrigerated or frozen item.
See: Policy Memo 104 dated February 13, 1987 HANGING TENDER: Acceptable name on wholesales container to designate pillars of the diaphragm.
Species must be shown as part of product name.
HARDENED LARD: A fully hydrogenated flaked lard used for blending with other lard to raise smoke point and increase the stability and resistance to oxidation or development of rancidity.
HEAD MEAT: After removal of the cheeks, lips, snout, skin, and tongue from the head there remains small pockets and areas on the skull to which muscle tissue is attached.
This muscle may be removed and used in product and declared on labeling as beef or pork as the case may be.
However, there are a few standardized products in which the regulations limit theamount of this meat that may be used and require that it be specifically declared on the label (e.g., chili, chili with beans, and corned beef hash).
See: Beef Cheek Meat and Beef Headmeat (use and labeling as an ingredient in meat Food Products) HEADCHEESE: A jellied product consisting predominantly of pork byproducts and seasoning ingredients.
It must contain some product from the head.
Extenders like cereal, soy derivatives, nonfat dry milk, etc., are not permitted ingredients of headcheese.
Headcheese in natural casings should be brought to an internal temperature of at least For cooking temperature exception, see Manual 150o F. 18.24(b).
HEART BREADS: That portion of the thymus gland or sweetbread that lies in the chest cavity.
Less desirable than the portion in the neck.
HEART CAP: Blood vessels and auricles at the top of an untrimmed heart.
HEARTS/HEART MEAT: Hearts/heart meat may not be labeled as "beef," "pork," etc. in the ingredients statement.
When used in a product, they must be identified by species, e.g., "Beef Hearts."
Hearts/Heart Meat, including the heart cap, may be considered meat for calculating the meat to textured vegetable protein ratios.
See: MPI Manual 17.3(h)(1) HEAT AND EAT SAUSAGE: Not the same as Brown and Serve Sausage.
When the "heat and eat" term is used, product must comply with cooked sausage regulations, e.g., limitation of 10% added water and not more than 3 1/2% binder.
HICKORY SMOKED: Product labeled exclusively.
"Hickory Smoked" must use hickory wood
HIGH FRUCTOSE CORN SYRUP (HFCS): HFCS may be used to flavor meat or poultry products in amounts sufficient for its intended purpose, provided the following conditions are met: 1.
2.
3.
4.
HFCS must contain not less than 40 % fructose on a solids basis.
HFCS must have a dextrose equivalence (D.E.) of not less than 93.
HFCS must have a sweetening power greater than or equal to sugar (sucrose).
HFCS must be identified on the label as High Fructose Corn Syrup in the ingredients statement, curing statement, etc.
See: Policy Memo 035 dated October 27, 1981
HOG STOMACHS: Hog stomachs must bear the mark of inspection regardless of intended use.
HOLSTEIN OR HOLSTEINER: Product is the same as FARM STYLE SAUSAGE, except that it is stuffed into wide casings and heavily smoked, usually in long casings, and air dried.
No extenders permitted.
HONEY CLAIM IN PRODUCT: A honey claim may be made or implied on a product label if: 1.
2.
3.
The product contains at least 3% honey.
Honey contains at least 80% solids, U.S. grade C or above.
When other sweeteners, (sugar, dextrose, maltose, invert sugar, corn syrup solids, and similar ingredients) are used, the quantity may not exceed one-half that of the honey, e.g..
If 3% honey is used, then no more than 1 1/2% of all other sweeteners may be used.
Product to be identified as "Honey Glaze" must contain honey to other sweeteners at a ratio no less than 2:1.
If dried honey is used, the ratio is to be no less than 1.6:1.
When honey is included in a breading, a honey claim may be made regardless of the quantity of honey used.
4.
5.
HONEY CURED OR SUGAR CURED: "Honey Cured" product if: may be shown on the labeling of a cured
(1) the honey used contains at least 80% solids or is U.S. grade C or above; (2) honey is the only sweetening ingredient or when other sweetening ingredients are used in combination with honey, they do not exceed one-half the amount of honey used; and (3) honey is used in an amount sufficient to flavor and/or affect the appearance of the finished product.
Traditionally, cured products which are labeled to indicate the presence of honey, e.g. Honey ham, must meet the parameters prescribed herein.
"Sugar Cured" may be used on the labeling of a cured product if: (1) the sugar used is cane sugar or beet sugar;
(2) sugar is the only sweetening ingredient or when other sweetening ingredients are used in combination with sugar, they do not exceed one-half the amount of sugar used; and (3) sugar is used in an amount sufficient to flavor and/or affect the appearance of the finished product.
"Honey and Sugar Cured" or "Sugar and Honey Cured" may also be used on labeling if: (1) the honey and sugar are of the nature described above;
(2) the honey and sugar are the only sweetening agents or when other sweetening ingredients are used in combination with the honey and sugar, they do not individually exceed either the amount of honey or sugar used and collectively do not exceed one-half the total amount of honey and sugar; and (3) the honey and sugar are used in amounts sufficient to flavor and/or affect the appearance of the finished product.
See: Policy Memo 038 dated December 16, 1981 HORS D'OEUVRE (Snack): Product must contain at least 15% cooked meat or 10% bacon (cooked basis).
True product name must be shown, e.g., "Puffed Pastry Wrapped Frank."
HOT DOG CHILI SAUCE WITH MEAT: Product must contain at least 6% meat.
HOT DOG CHILI WITH MEAT: Product must contain at least bologna rework not permitted.
40% meat.
Sausages and
HYDROLYZED BEEF STOCK: A beef stock which has been treated with acid, alkali, or enzymes to digest the protein.
The protein molecules are broken down into amino acids, peptides, polypeptides, and peptones.
As the digestion is carried out for longer periods of time, more and more of the larger molecules are broken down into amino acids, with free alpha-amino groups.
By analyzing these alpha-amino nitrogens one can determine the degree of hydrolysis.
100% hydrolysis would mean that all the nitrogen (protein) is in the form of amino acids.
10% of hydrolysis would mean that only 10% of the nitrogen is in the form of free amino acids, while the rest is still present in polymeric form.
The label should indicate the degree of hydrolysis.
This is determined from the ratio of amino nitrogen to total nitrogen.
amino nitrogen = % hydrolysis total nitrogen A product labeled 50% Hydrolyzed Beef Stock must, therefore, have 50% of the total nitrogen present as amino nitrogen.
Adding percent solids is optional.
The percent solids would not necessarily be the same percent as hydrolysis depending on the thickness (consistency) of product.
HYDROXYPROPYL METHYLCELLULOSE (HPMC): Emulsifying agent, binder, thickener, and a stabilizer.
This is accepted for its emulsifying qualities when prepared as a solution and applied as a dip.
1.
Not more than 2% in solution.
2.
Not more than 4% weight gained in product.
3.
Not more than .08% hydroxypropyl methylcellulose in finished product.
4.
Must be identified in the ingredients statement for purpose.
5.
Approved on individual basis only.
ICE-GLAZED MEAT AND POULTRY PRODUCTS: See: Water-Misted And Ice-Glazed Meat And Poultry Products IMITATION: A label for a product which is an imitation of another food shall bear the word "Imitation" immediately preceding the name of the food imitated and in the same size and style of lettering as the name, and immediately thereafter the word "Ingredients" followed by the names of the ingredients arranged in descending order of predominance.
Cuts of meat in its natural form containing excess moisture cannot be labeled "imitation", (e.g., ham, corned beef brisket, tongue).
See: 316.11(a) 317.2(j)(1) 381.1(b)(31)(iii) IMITATION FLAVORS: Imitation beef flavor, imitation mushroom flavor, flavor base for gravies and similar substances which enhance, fortify, or help to simulate a flavor are usually composed of food additives and, as such, are not "artificial flavors" for labeling purposes.
This class of imitation flavors can be composed of such ingredients as flour, fats, oils, salt, hydrolyzed vegetable protein, vegetable gums, thiamine hydrochloride, beta alanine, disodium inosinate, glutamic acid, and a host of other ingredients.
These flavorings must be identified on labels by showing each individual ingredient by its common name.
Class names, e.g., amino acids are not acceptable.
Each specific amino acid must be listed.
IMITATION STICKERS: Temporary approvals may be given for "Imitation" stickers to be used on approved labels with the understanding that: 1.
2.
3.
The word "Imitation" is as large or larger than product name.
The word "Imitation" is contiguous to product name.
Stickers must be self-destructive so they cannot be peeled off.
See: 316.11
IMMEDIATE CONTAINERS: See: Check Off Blocks INCIDENTAL ADDITIVES: As defined in the Food and Drug Administration regulations (21 CFR 101.100(a)(3)), incidental additives are substances present in foods at insignificant levels and that do not serve a technical or functional effect in that food.
In determining whether a substance is an incidental additive, the following criteria may be applied: 1.
Substances that are present in a food as a result of having been present in an ingredient added to the food and have a technical or functional effect on the ingredient but not on the finished food, or Substances that are processing aids, defined as: a. substances added during processing but removed before the food is packaged in its finished form, or b. substances added during processing but that are converted to constituents normally present in the food, and do not significantly increase the amount of those constituents naturally found in the food, or c. substances that are added to technical or functional processing but are present food at insignificant levels any technical or functional food.
INGREDIENT LABELING: 1.
All ingredients in FDA standardized products, e.g., Cheddar Cheese (Water, salt, cheddar ....etc.), and on standardized products, e.g., Soy sauce, Worcestershire sauce, require complete disclosure of all ingredients on the labels of meat and poultry products.
2.
Protein hydrolysates must identify the common and usual names and identify the source from which the protein is derived, e.g., "hydrolyzed vegetable protein" would be declared as "hydrolyzed corn protein."
a food effect in the and do effect for their in the finished not have in that
2.
3.
FDA certified color additives require the listing of the common or usual names, e.g., FD
Color additives not subject to certification may be declared as "artificial color," "artificial color added," or "color added."
Alternatively, color additives not subject to certification may be declared as "colored with _______," or "________ color," with blank space filled in with the name of the color additive listed in 21 CFR 73, e.g., "colored with annatto" or "caramel color."
4.
Cured meat products used as ingredients, regardless of their level of use, require complete disclosure of all ingredients in the formulation of meat and poultry products.
See: FSIS Directive 7237.1, Rev. 1, "Labeling of Ingredients" FSIS Directive 7140.1, Rev. 1, "Questions and Answers Relating to Ingredients" INGREDIENT LISTING Common Name Declaration Autolyzed Yeast Extract Purpose Declaration Any Preferred Acceptable
Autolyzed Yeast Extract
Autolyzed Yeast Extract Celery Dehydrated Celery Celery Flavoring Celery Celery
Celery, Dehydrated " "
Seasoning Dehydrated Celery Component " Any Any Celery Celery Powder "
Celery, Fresh Celery Powder Powder or Powdered Celery Seed Dried Whole Eggs Dried Whey
Any Any Any
Celery Seed
Flavoring or Spice
Dried Whole Eggs Eggs Dried Whey Dried
Whey Dried Yeast Garlic, Dehydrated Garlic, Dehydrated Dehydrated Garlic, Fresh Garlic Powder Powder or Powdered Garlic Any Any Seasoning Dried Yeast Dehydrated Garlic Component Garlic Garlic Garlic Powder Dried Yeast Garlic Dehydrated Garlic Garlic Flavoring Garlic
Hydrolyzed Vegetable or Or Plant Source) Protein Milk Protein Hydrolysate Hydrolysate
Any
Hydrolyzed Hydrolyzed (Vegetable or Vegetable (Plant Source) (Plant Source) Protein Protein Milk Protein Monosodium Glutamate Natural Flavoring
Flavoring
Milk Protein Hydrolysate Monosodium Glutamate Oleoresin (Spice) or Flavoring
Monosodium Glutamate Oleoresin of (Spices)
Any Any
Oleoresin of Spices that are also colorings
Any
Oleoresin of (Turmeric, or Saffron, or Paprika, or Flavoring, and Coloring) Dehydrated Onion (only
Onion, Dehydrated Onion
Seasoning
because of Manual entry) Onion, Fresh Onion Powder Powder Onion Powder or Powdered Onion Paprika Parsley, Dehydrated Any Any Onion Onion Onion Flavoring
Any Seasoning
Paprika "Spice and Coloring" Dehydrated Parsley Parsley, Flavorings Spice, Powdered Parsley Saffron "Spice and Coloring" Smoked Yeast
Saffron Smoked Torula Yeast Turmeric "Spice and Coloring" INGREDIENTS STATEMENT:
Any Any
Yeast Any
Smoked Torula Torula
Turmeric
The order of predominance shall be based on the amounts of ingredients used in product preparation rather than the amounts residing in the finished product.
Ingredients statements consisting of a component listing must have the components listed in order of predominance.
See: 317.2 INGREDIENTS STATEMENT - CURED WITH: A "cured with" statement followed by a list of all non-meat or poultry ingredients in order of predominance, e.g., Ham - Water Added (cured with: water, sodium phosphate, sodium erythorbate and sodium nitrite.), is an acceptable
alternative to an ingredients statement.
It can be located in those locations allowed for ingredients statements.
INSERT LABELS FOR USE AT RETAIL STORES: No inspection legend is permitted on insert labels.
INSPECTION MARK ON WING TAG: When the inspection mark is shown on a wing tag, either the plant number or the firm's name and address must also appear.
INSTANT MASHED POTATOES: The product shall be labeled "Instant Mashed Potatoes" followed by the list of ingredients in parentheses.
INTESTINES: Intestines can be prepared as edible product and bear the mark of inspection.
INVERT SUGAR: "Invert sugar" is an acceptable name.
IRISH STEW: Product does not require a geographical qualifying statement nor the words, "Style," "Type," or "Brand."
Usually it contains lamb or mutton but beef may be used.
It must meet the stew standard.
Vegetables include onions, carrots, potatoes, and turnips.
Dumplings are often used.
Beans are not acceptable in "Irish Stew."
ISOLATED SOY PROTEIN: This food ingredient is similar to soy protein concentrate except that additional extraction has removed more of the non-protein fraction, thereby increasing its protein content.
It is prepared by alkaline solubilization of the soy protein and then precipitation of same in an acid bath.
It may be powdered, extruded, or spun into fibrils and has a protein content of 90 to 95%.
Products of spun fibrils may be referred to as "Textured Soy Protein Isolate," "Isolated Soy Protein Fibers," or "Spun Isolated Soy Protein."
The PER of isolated soy protein is about 1.9 and indicates a poorer quality protein than that of soy flour or soy protein concentrate (PER 2.2).
When hydrated textured (structured) protein isolate is added to meat food products, the
ingredients statement should read (Structured) Isolated Soy Protein."
ITALIAN RECIPE:
"Hydrated
Textured
Verification of authenticity of phrase "Italian Recipe" must accompany submittals for approval.
ITALIAN SAUSAGE: Red pepper permitted under 319.145(b)(1).
See: 319.145 ITALIAN STYLE: Acceptable term for products containing anise or fennel or Italian type cheese (e.g., Mozzarella, Parmesan, Provolone, Ricotta, Romano) or at least three of the following: basil, garlic, marjoram, olive oil, or oregano.
Sausage products must meet the Italian Sausage requirements as per Regulation 319.145.
JAGWURST: The product is the same as yachtwurst (The Americanized name for the item).
It is a cooked sausage made from a fine emulsion with cubes of lean meat rather than fat (as in mortadella).
JALAPENO LOAF: Term for a nonspecific loaf containing sufficient jalapenos to characterize the product.
Jalapeno is a variety of Mexican Chili Pepper.
JAMAICAN STYLE: Term may be used to identify meat and poultry food products made with allspice, garlic, onion, red pepper, and thyme.
The name of the product must be further qualified with a statement, like "with Jamaican Style Seasoning," e.g., "Jamaican Style Chicken Wings-with Jamaican Style Seasonings."
JAMAICAN STYLE PATTIES: Product has at least 25% meat enclosed in a crust.
The label must show true product name, e.g., "Beef Turnover."
JAMBALAYA: Product must contain at least 25% cooked ham and one other meat or seafood must be included.
A New Orleans dish involving rice and ham and usually tomatoes (shrimp or other shellfish, other meat or poultry), together with seasonings.
Must show true product name, e.g., "Ham and Shrimp Jambalaya."
JAMON: Spanish word for "ham."
In the usage of Spanish-speaking people outside Spain, it has come to mean cured pork.
"Jamon di Cocinar" is cured pork for cooking as opposed to slicing.
When the term "Jamon" appears before the name of a limb, it means the product is cured.
Examples of acceptable product names are: Jamon de Paleta - Cured Pork Shoulder Jamon de Pierna - Cured Pork Leg
JARDINIERE (FR): Must contain at least 50% cooked meat based on total product.
It means "in the manner of the gardener."
The term applies to dishes made with diced garden vegetables which have been cooked with meat.
Jardiniere should be followed by a true product name, e.g., "Beef with Vegetables."
JELLIED BEEF OR PORK LOAF: When gelatin is added to beef or pork loaf type product, the product name should reflect this (e.g., "Jellied, Cooked, Beef Loaf").
JELLIED CHICKEN LOAF: Product is made of seasoned chopped chicken and cooked to at least 160o F. and mixed with gelatin.
JELLIED CORNED BEEF LOAF: Cooked corned beef is chopped, seasoned, and mixed with gelatin and then molded.
JERK OR JERK STYLE: The terms "JERK" or "JERK STYLE" can be used to describe red meat or poultry whole muscle, fabricated products, and other meat poultry food products, that are mixed or placed in a "spicy seasoning."
The seasoning usually contains scallion, onion, thyme, allspice (pimento), hot peppers, and usually contains at least one or more of the following: nutmeg, cinnamon, sugar, brown sugar, garlic, and rice or wine vinegar.
The seasoning may be in the form of paste, marinade, sauce, or dry seasoning mixture.
The product is mixed or placed in the spicy hot seasoning raw or the product may be grilled, cooked, or smoked.
Examples of acceptable product names are, e.g., "Oven Roasted Jerk Chicken", "Jerk Pork Sausage" or "Jerk Style Smoked Beef Sausage."
JERKY: All Jerky products must have a MPR of 0.75:1 or less; "species" or "kind" must be in the name.
Products may be cured or uncured, dried, and may be smoked or unsmoked, air or oven dried.
A reference to the particular type of drying method is not a labeling requirement.
1.
"Beef Jerky" - Produced from a single piece of beef.
May also be classified as "Natural Style Beef Jerky" provided this product name is accompanied by the explanatory statement "made from solid pieces of beef" or comparable terminology.
When a "Natural" claim (not natural style) is made, the policies as outlined in Policy Memo 055 are to be applied.
"Beef Jerky Chunked and Formed" - Produced from chunks which are molded and formed and cut into strips.
"Beef Jerky Ground and Formed or Chopped and Formed" - Produced as described, molded and formed and cut into strips.
Jerky products that contain over 3% binders (2% ISP)must reflect the binder in the product name, i.e., "Beef Soy Protein Concentrate jerky, ground and formed.
Jerky products that contain binders at levels below 3% should express the binder in a qualifying statement, e.g., beef jerky - soy protein added.
2.
3.
4.
5.
"Species (or Kind) Jerky Sausage."
The word "Jerky" can appear on labels for product in which the "species" or "kind" has been processed by chopping or grinding and stuffed into casings under the following conditions only: a.
The word "Sausage" must appear immediately contiguous to "Jerky" whenever it is shown.
"Sausage" must be in type at least one-third as high as "Jerky" in the same color ink and on the same background.
The words "stick," "piece" etc. cannot be used as substitutes for "sausage" in the product name.
"Sausage" means that the product has been chopped. b.
The product process.
JUMBO: The term "Jumbo" may be used if the product is of large size or quantity.
When used on frankfurter labels, no more then 8 franks to the pound may be present.
The term "Jumbo" may not be used to qualify the net weight statement.
JUNIOR MEAT SNACKS: Product must conform to the sausage standards going into the jar before processing.
Limited to 3 1/2% extenders.
may be dried at any stage of the
JUNIPER BERRIES: Juniper berries and twigs are normally thrown on the fire from which dry cured hams are smoked.
Juniper berries have been approved in the curing ingredients of Westphalian Ham.
KABOBS: Product consists of chunks of red meat or poultry and vegetables placed on a metal or wooden skewer.
"Kabob" may be included in the descriptive name, e.g., "Beef, Mushrooms, and Onion Kabob."
KALBERWURST: Product is similar to Bockwurst with no limit on water or milk.
KASSLER: Product is from cubed and smoked pork loin.
Must be labeled with a true product name, e.g., "Smoked Pork Chop."
KATRIFITAS: A coined word used to describe a type of empanadillas.
The product consists of dough containing yucca made to resemble a meat turnover and has a special meat filling.
Labeling requirements are: 1.
2.
Must contain at least 25% raw meat (beef) in total formulation.
Label must include a true product name in conjunction with "Katrifitas," e.g., "Katrifitas, Beef Turnover made with Yucca Shell," or similar wording.
KEEP FROZEN: Phrases such as "Do Not Thaw" synonymous to "Keep Frozen."
KELCO-GEL: A thickening agent used in alginate, calcium carbonate, amount of disodium phosphate approximately 0.099%.
Its individual basis.
KEMEX STRIPS: A kind of label made from vegetable parchment.
Kemex strips may be placed over "jet netting," provided they adhere to the product.
sauces.
It contains sodium and disodium phosphate.
The in the finished product is use should be judged on an or "Do Not Defrost" are
KIDNEYS FROM ENZYME INJECTED BEEF: Product may be exported to other countries.
They must be labeled "Beef Kidneys, Tendered with Papain - For Export Only."
KIELBASA: A sausage that is cured, cooked, and usually smoked.
Kolbassy is Czechoslovakian spelling; other variations include Kielbassy, Kolbasa and Kolbase.
Kielbasa is made from coarsely ground pork or coarsely ground pork with added beef or mutton.
"Hungarian Style Kolbase" is finely ground product, seasoned and stuffed into casings.
The 70/30 rule can be used, however, pork must always be the predominant meat ingredient.
"Beef Kielbasa" is prepared with only beef as the meat ingredient.
Byproducts are not permitted ingredients in these sausages.
An uncured (fresh), uncooked variety, with no more than 3 % water exists.
"Fresh" shall be used in the name when the product is uncured.
When fresh Kielbasa is cooked or smoked, then cooked or smoked is required in the product name.
The requirements of Policy Memo 110 apply when these perishable, cooked, uncured products are packaged in hermetically sealed containers.
KIELBASA, FRESH: See: Kielbasa KIPPERED BEEF: A cured dry product similar to beef jerky but not as dry.
MPR of 2.03:1 is applied to product.
KISKA; Kisba, Kishka, or Stuffed Derma.
Ingredients statement is part of the product name.
food product prepared two ways: 1.
A meat
Prepared with meat byproducts, including beef blood, pork snouts, pork livers, pork cheeks, etc.
Packaged in fully labeled retail size packages or individually banded.
When beef blood is used, it must be shown as part of product name.
Prepared with no more than farinaceous (consisting of materials containing no ordinarily stuffed into 30% animal fat, mixed with or made of flour or meal) other meat byproducts and beef casings and cooked.
2.
Product containing 30% or less fat is not considered amenable to the Federal Meat Inspection Act.
KNACKWURST, KNOCKWURST OR KNOBLOUCH: Oversize frankfurters.
See: 319.180 KNISHES: Product must contain at least 15% cooked meat or poultry or 10% bacon (cooked basis).
Same as snack standard.
The type of meat or poultry should be identified in a true product name, e.g., "Chicken Knishes."
KOLBASE, HUNGARIAN STYLE: Finely ground cured beef and pork seasoned and stuffed into casings and smoked.
Classed as a cooked, smoked sausage.
KONJAC FLOUR: Food ingredient that provides the effects of thickening, gelling, texturizing, and water-binding, e.g.,"binder," similar to that of starch vegetable flours, such as potato flour.
Konjac flour can be used in meat and poultry products in which starch vegetable flours are permitted, e.g., 3.5 percent in cooked sausage products such as frankfurters and bologna.
KOSHER AND KOSHER STYLE Products prepared by federally inspected meat packing plants identified with labels bearing references to "Kosher" or Rabbinical markings must be handled under Rabbinical supervision.
The Federal meat and poultry inspection program does not certify to kosher preparation of products, but rather accepts the statements and markings in this regard offered and applied under the supervision of the Rabbinical authority.
The word "Kosher" may be used only on the labeling of meat and poultry products prepared under Rabbinical supervision.
The identity of the Rabbinical authority must be made available upon request from agency official.
Qualification of the word by such terms as "Style" or "Brand" does not negate the requirement.
KOSHER (Product Containers): Containers must be labeled "Kosher tags attached" when used for hearts, livers, and other products or tissues with attached metal tags indicating kosher inspection.
KRAKOW: Acceptable name for a cooked sausage similar to "Berliner."
KREPLACH: Product must contain at least 20% meat.
The type of kreplach should be identified in a true product name, e.g., "Beef Kreplach."
KUBBEE: Other acceptable names are: Kubbe, Kibbe, Kabeda, Kilin, Kibbes, Kibby, Kabbo, or Kabe."
A product popular in Syria and Lebanon.
It must contain at least 25% meat based on total formulation; it must contain soaked cracked wheat and show the true product name, e.g., "Fried Cracked Wheat and Beef Balls," "Baked Stuffed Wheat and Beef Patty."
Products may be shaped like a hamburger and fried or shaped into balls and fried.
KUEMMELWURST: An acceptable name.
The product is the same as Carawaywurst and is a cooked sausage of the ring variety, with whole caraway seeds.
Usual ingredients are beef, pork, salt, caraway, flavorings, and cure.
KURMA: Product must contain at least 50% meat or at least 35% poultry meat.
LABEL REQUIREMENTS: See: 317.2
LABELING, CHECK-OFF BLOCKS ON: The use of check-off blocks on immediate containers for identifying products that look alike but are different in composition is not permitted.
Examples of product that may look alike but are different in composition are as follows: Ground Beef and Beef Patty Mix Partially Defatted Chopped Beef and Partially Defatted Beef Fatty Tissue Frankfurters and Frankfurters with Variety Meats Finely Ground Chicken and Finely Ground Chicken Meat Comminuted Chicken and Comminuted Chicken With Kidney and Sex Glands Removed However, exceptions to this policy may be granted.
Exceptions would require that the establishment operators develop a procedure which the assigned inspector can readily monitor to ensure correct labeling.
Such procedures, accompanied by written comments from the assigned inspector and where possible, the circuit supervisor, must be forwarded to the area supervisor for review and approval.
Approved procedures must be attached to the label records accompanying new or modified labels submitted for approval.
See: Policy Memo 083A dated May 12, 1988
LABELING FOR SUBSTITUTE PRODUCTS: If a product fails to comply with a standard only because the meat or poultry content is lower than required and the product has generic identity as a nonmeat product (e.g., pizza, stew, pies), then the product may be designated by the nonmeat terminology in the standardized name (e.g., "PIZZA," "STEW," "PIE"), provided the meat/poultry content of the product is conspicuously disclosed contiguous to the product name along with a statement of the amount of meat/poultry in the standardized product.
(For example, PIZZA (contains 5% sausage; SAUSAGE PIZZA contains 12% sausage.)
Such product may not be nutritionally inferior to the standardized product it resembles.
For this purpose,
nutritional inferiority is defined, consistent with the requirement of 21 CFR 101.3(e)(4), as any reduction in the content of an essential nutrient that is present at 2% or more of the U.S. RDA per serving of protein or any of the vitamins or minerals for which U.S. RDAs are established.
A quality control procedure must be approved for such products by the Processed Products Inspection Division before the label can be used.
If a product is nutritionally inferior to the standardized product it resembles, it must be labeled "imitation" in accordance with 317.2(j) and 381.1(b).
See: Policy Memo 069 dated March 23, 1984 LABELING OF INSTITUTIONAL AND WHOLESALE TYPE, LARGE IMMEDIATE CONTAINERS: On institutional and wholesale type, large immediate containers, all mandatory information must appear on the principal display panel except that the first usable panel to the right of the principal display panel may be used for the firm's name and address and the ingredients statement.
See: Policy Memo 082 dated May 5, 1985 LABELING OF MODIFIED BREAKFAST SAUSAGE, COOKED SAUSAGE, AND FERMENTED SAUSAGE PRODUCTS IDENTIFIED BY A NUTRIENT CONTENT CLAIM: Modified breakfast sausage, cooked sausage, and fermented sausage products are substitute versions of the standardized or traditional products that have been formulated and processed to reduce the fat contents to qualify for use of nutrient content claims, but do not comply with the standard of identity or composition as described in the meat and poultry regulations or the Standards and Labeling Policy Book (Policy Book) because of the use of ingredients used for fat replacement which are precluded or restricted by these standards.
The deviation from the standard or the traditional, i.e., "regular product," is conveyed by associating an expressed nutrient content claim for the appropriate reduction in fat content and the standardized or traditional product name, e.g., "Reduced Fat Frankfurter" or "Low Fat Pepperoni."
The nutrient content claims that may be used are those related to a reduction in fat contents that are identified in the regulations for meat products in 9 CFR Part 317 and for poultry products in 9 CFR part 381.
Maintaining Product Integrity: The following guidelines must be applied to assure that the modified versions of the
subject meat and poultry sausage products do not violate the integrity of the standardized or traditional product for which they purport to be substitutes: (1) the product must be similar in shape, flavor, consistency, and general appearance to the product as prepared according to the regulatory or traditional standard, (2) the meat or poultry used to formulate the modified product must come from the same anatomical location when the standardized term is related to an anatomical region on an animal, e.g., "ham" is expected to be from the hind leg of the hog and cured; thus, "lean smoked ham sausage" would be comprised of meat from the hind leg of a hog that has been smoked and cured, (3) the modified sausage product must result from the same processing procedures as those specified for the subject sausage products described by regulatory or Policy Book standards, (4) there must not be deviations from product safety criteria (e.g., salt content, curing agents, pH, water activity and/or moisture/protein ratio) that are provided in the regulatory or Policy Book standards for sausages, and (5) the modified product must achieve the appropriate reduction in fat content to be eligible to use a nutrient content claim in conjunction with the standardized or traditional product name.
Performance Characteristics: In producing modified, substitute versions of sausages, the deviations from ingredient provisions of the regulatory and Policy Book standards should be the minimum necessary to qualify for the nutrient content claim while maintaining the performance characteristics similar to the standardized or traditional product, i.e., similar preparation, cooking, and handling characteristics.
If a modified version of the standardized or traditional sausage does not perform in substantially the same way as the standardized or traditional item, the label must include a prominent statement informing the consumer of such differences.
For example, a "low fat frankfurter" that essentially has all of the characteristics of a frankfurter, but cannot be grilled, would indicate "not recommended for grilling."
A "reduced fat pepperoni" that displays essentially all the characteristics of pepperoni, but cannot be cooked, would , for example, indicate "not recommended for cooking" or "do not cook."
Safe and Suitable Ingredients: A modified, substitute sausage product must be formulated with approved safe and suitable ingredients, e.g., those identified in 9 CFR 318.7(c)(4) and 381.147(f)(4), and those determined to be safe and suitable by the Food Standards and Ingredients Branch, Product Assessment Division.
Such ingredients are to be used at the lowest level necessary to achieve the intended effect of reducing fat as compared to the standardized or traditional product.
Safe and suitable
ingredients are those used to replace fat, improve texture, and prevent syneresis.
An ingredient or component of an ingredient that is specifically required by the regulatory or Policy Book standard for characterizing purposes, e.g., cheese in a cheesefurter, fresh livers in liver sausage, cured ham in a ham sausage, and fennel or anise in an Italian sausage, shall be present in the required amount, if applicable, or otherwise in a significant amount to provide a characterizing identity to the product.
Moreover, an ingredient or component of an ingredient that is not permitted by regulations for use in any meat or poultry sausage product, e.g., sodium benzoate, shall not be added to a modified, substitute product.
Product Identity: The name of the modified version of the standardized or traditional product that complies with all parts of the policy prescribed herein is the appropriate expressed nutrient content claim for the meat and/or poultry product with a reduction in fat content and the applicable standardized or traditional term, e.g., "Lean Sausage," "97% Fat-Free (or "Low Fat") Kielbasa," "Low-Fat Frankfurter Made with Beef, Pork and Turkey," "Reduced Fat Pepperoni," "Extra Lean Turkey Italian Sausage," and "Lite Genoa Salami."
The size and style of type must conform to the nutrition labeling regulations.
Ingredients Statement: To assist the consumer in differentiating between the standardized or traditional sausage product and the modified, substitute version, ingredients that are not provided for by regulatory or Policy Book standards, or used in excess of the allowable levels specified, must be appropriately identified with an asterisk in the ingredients statement.
The statement(s) defining the asterisk(s), e.g., "*Ingredient(s) not in regular " (fill in name of the standardized or traditional product), or "*Ingredients(s) in excess of amount permitted in regular " (fill in name of the product), or both as standardized or traditional appropriate, must be legible and conspicuous, and shall immediately follow the ingredients statement in the same size and style of type.
See: Policy Memo 123 dated January 20, 1995 LABELING OF MEAT AND POULTRY STICK ITEMS: Stick items such as beef jerky, pepperoni sticks, and beef sticks must be labeled (i.e., contain the required label
features as outlined in 317 and 381, Subpart N) according to the following guidelines: (1) If sold in fully labeled bulk containers, i.e., canisters, caddies, or similar containers, stick items do not have to be fully labeled unless they are individually wrapped.
This type of container cannot be reused.
(2) If sold in bulk containers, i.e., canisters, caddies, or similar containers that are not fully labeled, stick items must be fully labeled.
Bulk containers such as these may only be refilled with fully labeled product.
(3) If sold in small, fully labeled cartons, boxes, or similar containers (e.g., 3 oz., net weight) that are only intended for retail sale intact, stick items may be individually wrapped and unlabeled.
See: Policy Memo 111 dated June 6, 1988 LABELING OF MODIFIED SUBSTITUTE VERSIONS OF SAUSAGE, HAMBURGER OR GROUND BEEF PRODUCTS: FRESH (SPECIES)
This policy allows modified versions of fresh (species) sausages, ground beef, or hamburger to contain non-meat or poultry, "fat-replacing ingredients" (e.g., binders such as carrageenan, modified food starch) and to be identified by certain nutrient content claims in accordance with nutrition labeling regulations effective on August 8, 1994, in conjunction with descriptive labeling, e.g., "Lean Pork Sausage with a X% Solution of ...," or "Low Fat Ground Beef, Water, and Carrageenan Product."
This policy allows for the use of terms defined in regulations, e.g., "Lean," "Reduced Fat," "Low Fat," etc., to be used to describe fresh (species) sausage, ground beef, or hamburger products with a reduction in fat content resulting from the use of added ingredients (i.e., "fat replacers" such as carrageenan and isolated soy protein).
These products must meet the criteria for use of the nutrient content claim associated with the fat reduction.
The nutrient content claim may be used in conjunction with the standardized name provided the consumer is informed of the actual components of the product through labeling, i.e., descriptive product name, ingredients statement, and Nutrition Facts.
Meat products, including those that meet the criteria established for claims, such as "Lean," "Low Fat," "Lower Fat," "Reduced Fat," etc., that combine fresh (species)
sausage, ground beef, or hamburger, and other safe and suitable ingredients, for the principal purpose of replacing fat, may be descriptively labeled.
Examples of such products are "Lean Ground Beef, Water, and Carrageenan Product," "Low Fat Ground Beef With a X% Solution of ...," "Lean Beef Sausage, Water, and Carrageenan Product," or "Reduced Fat Pork Sausage, Water, and Binders Product," provided conditions prescribed in the regulations, viz., 9 CFR 317, for use of the nutrient content claim are satisfied.
In contrast, modified versions of fresh (species) sausage, ground beef or hamburger product containing added ingredients that do not qualify for use of a nutrient content claim prescribed in the nutrition labeling regulations must be labeled as Imitation Pork Sausage, Imitation Beef Sausage, Imitation Ground Beef, Imitation Hamburger, Beef Patty or Beef Patty Mix in accordance with 9 CFR Section 317.2(j)(1) and Sections 319.141 (Fresh pork sausage), 319.142 (Fresh beef sausage), and 319.15 (Miscellaneous beef products), respectively.
Descriptively labeled, modified, substitute versions of fresh (species) sausage, ground beef, or hamburger product with a reduction in fat content must comply with the following guidelines: (1) The descriptive name of a modified, substitute product with a reduction in fat content is the applicable nutrient content claim used in conjunction with the appropriate standardized name and fat-replacing ingredients, e.g., "Low Fat Ground Beef, Water and Carrageenan Product," or "Lean Pork Sausage With a X% Solution of Water, Modified Food Starch, Spices, and Salt."
Words in the descriptive name may be of a different size, style, color, or type but, in all cases, the words must be prominent, conspicuous, and legible.
Moreover, no word in the descriptive name should be printed in letters that are less than one third the size of the largest letter used in any other word in the descriptive name.
The solution statement, when used, is considered to be part of the descriptive product name and must comply with descriptive name sizing requirements.
(2) Fat-replacing ingredients (e.g., binders and water) and fat in the finished product may not exceed 30 percent of the product as formulated for the modified, substitute ground beef, hamburger, or fresh beef sausage product, and no more than 40 percent of the product formulation for the substitute fresh pork sausage.
The fat content must be in accordance with
requirements for content claim.
use
of
the
applicable
nutrient
(3) The product includes mandatory nutrition labeling prescribed in the meat inspection regulations, viz., 9 CFR 317.
(4) The product is formulated with approved safe and suitable ingredients, e.g., those identified in 9 CFR 318.7(c)(4), and which are determined to be safe and suitable by the Food Standards and Ingredients Branch, Product Assessment Division, that are used at the lowest level necessary to achieve the intended effect as a fat-replacing ingredient (i.e., binder).
(5) If percentage labeling is included as part of the product name, e.g., "Extra Lean Ground Beef With a X% Solution of ...," a Partial Quality Control (PQC) program for the addition of solutions must be approved before the label can be used.
See: Policy Memo 121B dated January 20, 1995 LABELING OF PRODUCT NAMES, FANCIFUL NAMES, WORD SIZE: Words in product names or fanciful names may be a different size, style, color, or type, but in all cases, the words must be prominent, conspicuous, and legible.
Moreover, no word in a product name, i.e., a common or usual name, a standardized name, or a descriptive name should be printed in letters that are less than one-third the size of the largest letter used in any other words of the product name.
The same guidelines apply to letters of words in fanciful names that may accompany the product name.
For example, for a product labeled Chili Mac--Beans, Macaroni and Beef in Sauce, "Chili Mac" is the fanciful name and "Beans, Macaroni and Beef in Sauce" is the product name.
No letter in "Chili Mac" may be smaller than one-third the size of the largest letter in "Chili Mac."
Similarly, no letter in the descriptive name may be smaller than one-third the size of the largest letter in the descriptive name.
This policy is not intended to address the relative size of words in fanciful names versus product names.
The size of words in qualifying statements, e.g., "Water Added," "Contains up to ...," "Smoke Flavoring Added," etc., are not affected by this policy memo.Labeling not in compliance with these guidelines may be used until present supplies are exhausted.
Inspectors in charge shall determine the amount of present supplies.
See: Policy Memo 087A dated September 16, 1985 LABELING OF PRODUCTS CONTAINING MEAT WITH ADDED SOLUTIONS OR OTHER NONMEAT INGREDIENTS IN SECONDARY PRODUCTS: In those situations where meat containing an added solution or other nonmeat ingredients, e.g., Ham-Water Added, Corned Beef and Water Products, Beef-Containing up to 10% of a solution, are used in secondary products in sufficient quantities to meet the minimum meat requirement without including the added solution, or nonmeat ingredients, the product name need not include any reference to the added solution or nonmeat ingredients; e.g., Corned Beef and Cabbage would be an acceptable name for a product if the corned beef portion of the corned beef and water product was present in a sufficient quantity to satisfy the 25% cooked corned beef requirement.
The ingredients statement, however, must include nomenclature as required by the regulations or policy (see also Policy Memos 066C and 084A).
In this example, the ingredients statement would list "Corned Beef and Water Product-X percent of added ingredients are . . . ."
For products in which the added solution ingredient as a whole is used to meet the minimum meat requirement, the product name must include nomenclature required for the component, e.g., Beef (containing up to 10 % of a flavoring solution) Burgundy.
The ingredients statement must also include the same nomenclature for the meat ingredient.
See: Policy Memo 102 dated January 6, 1987 LABELING OF PRODUCTS WHICH ARE ARTIFICIALLY COLORED: Labels of products which are artificially colored either by artificial colors or natural colors must bear a statement to indicate the presence of the coloring, e.g., "artificially colored" or "colored with annatto."
Products whose true color is disguised by packing media, e.g., colored pickling solutions, must also have labels that include a statement that indicates the presence of the color.
The statement must appear in a prominent and conspicuous manner contiguous to the product name.
When a component within a product is artificially colored, e.g., breading, sauce, and sausage, a qualifying statement is necessary.
However, in all cases, the presence of the coloring must appear in the ingredients statement.
Whenever FD
Some products, e.g., chorizos and some of the sausages of the longaniza variety, are expected to be characterized by coloring.
In these situations, the
presence of the coloring ingredients statement.
need
only
be
indicated
in
the
See: Policy Memo 112 on caramel coloring Policy Memo 095 on colored casings Policy Memo 113 dated June 24, 1988 LABELING OF PRODUCTS WHICH INCLUDE PACKETS OF OTHER COMPONENTS: Wording indicating that the product contains, in addition to the meat or poultry product, another component, e.g., a gravy, sauce, or seasoning packet must appear in conjunction with the name of the product in such a manner that it is obvious to the purchaser that he or she is also purchasing that packet along with the meat and/or poultry product.
The wording must be shown in print no smaller than one-third the size of the largest letter in the rest of the product name, of such color that will insure it not being overlooked at point of purchase, and positioned contiguous to the rest of the product name, so as not to appear in whole or part on any panel except the main display panel.
The net weight individual components may be shown but are not required.
See: Policy Memo 099 dated September 2, 1986 LABELING OF SAFE THAWING INSTRUCTIONS ON CONSUMER PACKAGES: Thawing instructions which appear on the label of a frozen meat or poultry product must be given in accordance with FSIS' recommendations for safe thawing procedures.
These procedures are as follows: 1.
Thawing product in the refrigerator.
2.
Thawing product in cold water, changing water every 30 minutes until product is thawed.
3.
Thawing product in a microwave oven for less than 2 hours.
Cook immediately.
Upon request, alternative thawing procedures may be considered.
However, scientific evidence which thoroughly establishes the safety of an alternative thawing procedure must be presented with the procedure when it is submitted for review.
See: Policy Memo 119 dated September 28, 1989 LABELING PROMINENCE GUIDELINES FOR CURED, COOKED PRODUCTS WITH ADDED SUBSTANCES THAT DO NOT RETURN TO GREEN WEIGHT:
The cured, cooked products covered by sections 319.100 ("corned beef"), 319.101 ("corned beef brisket"), 319.102 ("corned beef round and other corned beef cuts"), and 319.104(a) ("cured pork products" under PFF) of the Federal meat inspection regulations; and by Policy Memos 057A ("Labeling Turkey Ham Products Containing Added Water") and 084A ("Cooked Corned Beef Products and Cured Pork Products with Added Substances"), whose weights after cooking exceed the weight of the fresh uncured article, shall bear the product name and qualifying statements on the principal display panel using the following guidelines: (1) The product name and the qualifying statements must be prominent and conspicuous.
(2) The label will bear the product name on the principal display panel in lettering not less than one-third the size of the largest letter in terms commonly associated with the product name, e.g., cooked, boneless, chopped, pressed, smoked, or words which could be a part of the product name, e.g., steak, butt portion, shank portion.
(3) The product name will be judged prominent if the lettering is of the same style and color, and on the same color background as that which is used for the terms commonly associated with the product name or words which could be a part of the product name (see guidelines (2)).
If other styles, colors, and/or backgrounds are used, the prominence must be judged equal to those terms and words which could be associated with or part of the product name.
(4) The product name must be distinct and separate from other label information.
Thus, the product name should not be part of or embedded in qualifying phrases or descriptions that include a list of added solution ingredients.
Examples of acceptable terminology are "Corned Beef and Water Product" and "Cured Pork and X% of a Solution."
(5) The label for the products covered by this policy memo must also bear qualifying statements that conform to established policies on the size of the lettering in these statements in relation to product name (as outlined in Policy Memo 087A, FSIS Directive 7110.2, and Policy Memo 057A).
See: Policy Memo 109 dated October 8, 1987
LABELING REQUIREMENTS FOR PUMP-CURED BACON PRODUCTS TREATED WITH D- OR D1-ALPHA-TOCOPHEROL IN SURFACE APPLICATIONS: Pump-cured bacon treated on the surface with d- or d1-alpha-tocopherol must be labeled with a product name qualifier which identifies the substances involved and the method of application.
The qualifier must identify both the carrier and active substance in their order of predominance.
The specific names, d- or d1-alpha-tocopherol, or the term, Vitamin E, may be used in the name qualifier.
Examples of acceptable name qualifiers are "Sprayed with a solution of vegetable oil and Vitamin E" or "Dipped in a solution of corn oil and d-alpha-tocopherol."
The name qualifier must be contiguous to the product name and printed in a style as prominent as the product name.
The type used for the statement must be at least one-fourth the size of the most prominent letter in the product name, except that the ingredients of the mixture may be in print not less than one-eighth the size of the most prominent letter in the product name.
The specific name of the ingredients, d-alpha-tocopherol or dl-alpha-tocopherol, and of the carrier must be listed as such in the ingredients statement or curing statement, as required by 317.2(f)(1).
See: Policy Memo 105 dated April 13, 1987 LACTOSE: A milk sugar that must be listed as Lactose.
LAMB CURRY: Product must contain at least 50% fresh meat.
LAMB, SPRING: See: 317.8(b)(4) LANDJAEGER CERVELAT: A semi-dry sausage that originated in Switzerland.
It is about the size of a large frankfurter but pressed flat, smoked and dried giving it a black appearance.
LARD CONTINUOUS PROCESS: This nomenclature identifies the commodity produced from clean and sound edible tissues of swine by a low-temperature separation process in which the oil is separated from the fatty tissue by means of a combination of heat and
centrifugal force.
Labeling records containing the above designation should identify in detail the process and equipment used in producing the commodity.
LARD - CURED PORK TISSUE USE: Cured pork trimmings may be rendered to produce manufactured in compliance with the lard and leaf standard.
Rendered bacon is not acceptable in lard.
See: Policy Memo 052 dated September 15, 1982 LARD, LEAF: See: 317.8(b)(18) 319.702 LARD REFINED: This term is applied to open-kettle rendered, prime steam, or dry-rendered lard put through a filter press, with or without bleaching agent.
LASAGNA: Sauce is an expected ingredient of lasagna products and its declaration in the product name is optional.
Cheese Lasagna with meat: 12% meat Lasagna with Meat and Sauce: 12% meat Lasagna with Meat Sauce: 6% meat in total product Lasagna with Poultry: 8% poultry meat Lasagna with pepperoni Tomato Sauce, Cheese, and Pepperoni: 8% lard lard
Meat Lasagna: 12% meat Poultry Lasagna: 8% poultry meat LAU - LAU: Product must contain at least 25% meat.
A Hawaiian dish made with pork and fish, wrapped in taro leaves.
Label must have a true product name, e.g., "Pork and Fish Stuffed Taro Leaves."
LEAVENING: Identify the common or usual name of each substance used in the ingredients statement.
LEBANON BOLOGNA: A coarse ground, fermented, semi-dry sausage.
If the product has a MPR of 3.1:1 or less and a ph of 5.0 or less, no refrigeration is required.
It is made with beef.
No extenders or hearts are permitted in the product.
This is not a 319.180 product.
LECITHIN: An emulsifier.
See: 318.7(c)(4) LEGENDS: Products consisting of mixed meat and poultry ingredients shall bear either the official meat inspection legend or poultry legend, depending on which ingredients are present in the greater amounts.
If meat or poultry ingredients exist in equal proportions, either official legend may be used.
If meat and poultry ingredients exist in exact proportions and both appear in the product name, the official legend must reflect the ingredient appearing first in the product name.
LEGENDS, DUAL INSPECTION: Containers of products intended for sale to household consumers can bear only the official mark of inspection of the product enclosed.
Containers of products intended for distribution to other than the retail trade may bear both the official meat inspection legend and the official poultry products inspection legend.
See: Policy Memo 075 dated August 14, 1984 LEMON JUICE CONCENTRATE: "Lemon Juice Concentrate" must be declared as such.
LENTIL SOUP WITH BACON - German Style:
Acceptable name for a lentil soup containing only bacon.
The bacon requirement is 4.0% for condensed and 2.0% for ready to eat.
LEONA: An acceptable name.
A coarse ground cooked sausage.
LIMA BEANS WITH HAM OR BACON IN SAUCE: Product must contain at least 12% ham or bacon.
See: 319.310 LINGUICA: A Portuguese type sausage containing pork and excluding other meat and meat byproducts.
Usually contains nonfat dry milk and condiments, e.g., vinegar, cinnamon, cumin seed, garlic, red pepper, salt, and sugar.
Paprika and cures are acceptable in this product.
See: Policy Memo 015A dated June 22, 1981 LINKS: This designation falls into four categories: 1.
2.
"Links" without further qualification refers to an all pork fresh sausage in links.
"Links Sausage" can be used to designate any sausage type formulation usually cured and smoked in links, except for those formulations containing poultry.
(See Policy Memo 030A.)
"Links cereal and nonfat dry milk added" usually formulated with meat and meat byproducts cured and smoked, and approved with the understanding each link is banded with an approved band label.
"Links, A pork and textured vegetable protein product" followed immediately by the ingredients statement is acceptable.
"Links," "Top's Links," "Joe's Links" are coined names and must be followed immediately by true product name.
3.
4.
LITTLE SMOKIES: A smoked small variety sausage link made with beef and pork.
LIVER: Products with liver in the name must contain a minimum of 30% liver.
LIVER AND ONIONS: Product must contain at least 45% liver.
LIVER, CHOPPED: Product must contain at least 50% liver.
LIVER, ONIONS AND EGGS: Product must contain at least 40% liver.
LIVER SPREAD (STREICH LEBERWURST): The product name "Liver Spread (Streich Leberwurst)" is acceptable.
Product must contain at least 30% liver in total formulation.
LIVERWURST OR "PATE DE FOIE - STYLE LIVERWURST": Product must meet liver sausage requirements.
LOAF: A "Loaf" (other than meat loaf) consists of meat in combination with any of a wide range of nonmeat ingredients.
These products are not identified with the term "Meat Loaf,""Beef Loaf," or the like but with designations, e.g., "Olive Loaf," "Pickle and Pimiento Loaf," "Honey Loaf," "Luxury Loaf," and others that are descriptive.
LOAF, CANNED, PERISHABLE: Canned perishable products in the loaf category 1.
Meet the perishable requirements.
must:
(See 317.2(k).)
2.
Show a brine concentration of not less than 3.5% in finished product.
Show a brine concentration of not less than 6.0% when the products contain cereal, starch, or other extenders.
3.
Be cooked to a minimum internal temperature of at least than 150o F.
4.
When extenders are added the product name qualified, e.g., "(Name of extender) added."
LOBSTER SAUCE:
must
be
May refer to an Oriental style sauce originally intended to be served with lobster.
The sauce so used contains no lobster, but the characterizing ingredients include ground pork, soy sauce, garlic, and scallions.
May also refer to a sauce that contains lobster.
LOLA AND LOLITA (IT): Dry sausage products of Italian origin.
Consists of mildly seasoned pork and contains garlic.
Lolita comes in 14 oz. links, while Lola comes in 2 1/2 lb. links.
LONDON BROIL: Name can only be applied to a cooked product.
Products including the expression "London Broil" on labels must be prepared with beef flank steak.
Uncooked product must be labeled to indicate this, e.g., "Beef Flank Steak for London Broil."
If prepared from another cut, the identity of that cut must accompany the term "London Broil," e.g., "Sirloin Tip London Broil."
LONG ISLAND STYLE OR TYPE: Not acceptable for poultry products.
LONGANIZA: Longaniza is a fresh sausage product.
If it is prepared otherwise, the product name must indicate its nature, e.g., "Cured Longaniza."
Paprika is an acceptable ingredient because it is expected.
LONGANIZA AND PUERTO RICAN STYLE LONGANIZA: Longaniza is an acceptable name for Puerto Rican sausage made from pork which may contain beef but does not contain annatto.
Added fat is not permitted.
Puerto Rican Style Longaniza is acceptable labeling for sausage made from pork which may contain beef and does contain annatto.
Added fat is not permitted, although up to 3% lard may be used as a carrier for annatto.
When annatto is used, it should be included in the ingredients statement as "annatto" in accordance with section 317.2(j)(5) of the meat inspection regulations.
See: Policy Memo 021 dated February 9, 1981 LOUKANIKA: An acceptable name for cooked fresh Greek sausage.
It is usually made with lamb and pork, oranges, allspice, whole pepper, and salt.
LOWFAT MILK: When used as an ingredient, the product must be labeled by its standardized name "Lowfat Milk (____% Milkfat)."
The percentage of fat is either 1/2, 1, 1 1/2, or 2.
LUMPIA or LOOMPYA A Philippine style or Filipino style eggroll.
There are no special ingredient requirements, it refers to a shape of the eggroll.
Lumpia or Loompya are generally longer and thinner than traditional eggrolls.
LUNCHEON MEAT: 1.
"Luncheon Meat" cannot contain livers, kidneys, blood, detached skin, partially defatted pork or beef tissue, or stomachs.
On the label the meat components of "Luncheon Meat" are identified in the ingredients statement as "beef," "pork," "beef tongue meat," "pork tongue meat," "beef heart meat," and "pork heart meat."
In the ingredients statement "Beef" and "Pork" means lean meat with overlying fat and the portions of sinew, nerve, and the blood vessels which normally accompany muscle tissue and which are not separated in the process of dressing but not including bone and skin.
Up to 10% of the meat portion of the formula can consist of cured and smoked meat trimmings which does not require special declaration in the ingredients statement except included under "pork" and "beef."
Heart or heart muscle, tongues, or tongue meat and cheek meat can be included in "Luncheon Meat" under the following restrictions: a.
Hearts or heart meat or tongues or tongue meat must be declared individually by species in the ingredients statement on the label.
2.
3.
4.
b.
No restriction on the percentage limits of hearts, heart meats, tongues, and tongue meats in the formulation.
The terms "heart meat" and "tongue meat" refer to the muscle tissue remaining after heart caps, glands, nodes, connective tissue, etc. are trimmed away.
c.
5.
Water added to "Luncheon Meat" during manufacture cannot exceed 3% by weight of the total ingredients, this is controlled by weighing ingredients and not by analysis.
Care must be used to see that water is not added indirectly through the use of undrained hearts and tongues.
The only ingredients permitted in "Luncheon Meat" are curing ingredients, sweetening agents, spices, and flavoring.
All of these substances must be declared in the ingredients statement by name, except the various "flavorings" and "spices" which need not be named individually.
"Spices" refer to natural spices and not to extracts.
6.
LYONS SAUSAGE (FR): A dry sausage made exclusively of pork (four parts finely chopped lean and one or two parts small diced fat) with spices and garlic which is stuffed into large casings, cured and air-dried.
MACARONI AND BEEF IN SAUCE: Product must contain at least 12% beef.
MACARONI AND CHEESE WITH HAM: Product must contain at least 12% cooked ham.
MACARONI AND NOODLE TYPE PRODUCTS: A pasta product conforming to either the standard of identity contained in 21 CFR Part 139.110 or to the standard of identity in 139.150.
It may be declared in the ingredients statement by one of the following specific names if it meets the applicable size and shape requirements specified below: Ingredient Name Macaroni Shape Size 0.11 to 0.27 inch diameter 0.06 to
Tube-shaped
Spaghetti Cord-shaped (not tubular) Vermicelli
Tube-shaped or 0.11 inch diameter Cord-shaped (not tubular)
Not more than 0.06 inch diameter
Noodles
Ribbon-shaped declared in the ingredients "Macaroni Product" if it does shape and size requirements meets the standard in 21 CFR
A macaroni product should be statement by the generic name not conform to any of the specified above but otherwise 139.110.
The noodle product should be declared by the generic name "Noodle Product" if it is made with eggs and/or egg yolks and does not conform to the shape and size requirements specified above but otherwise meets the standard in 21 CFR 139.150.
Other standardized macaroni and noodle type products specified in 21 CFR 139, e.g., milk macaroni products, may also include the above specific names in their product names if the size and shape requirements outlined above are met.
MACARONI SALAD WITH (Meat or Poultry): Product contain at least 12% cooked meat or poultry meat.
MANICOTTI (IT): Product must contain at least 10% fresh meat.
An Italian main dish consisting of rectangular-shaped pasta spread with a filling of meat (e.g., sausage, ground beef, or chopped prosciutto) and/or cheeses (e.g., ricotta and mozzarella).
The pasta is rolled, edges pressed to seal, and covered with grated parmesan cheese and tomato sauce.
A true product name must be shown, e.g., "Beef Manicotti in Sauce."
MANTECA, MANTECA PURA (SP): The Spanish translation for "Manteca" is "lard", "Manteca Pura" is "rendered pork fat," "Pomade" is "butter", and "Como Manteca" means "smooth as butter."
When "Manteca" or "Manteca Pura" is used as a product name, the appropriate English designation, "lard" or "rendered Pork Fat," must follow in close proximity in the same size and style of type.
See: 317.8(b)(18) 317.8(b)(19) MARASCHINO CHERRIES: The correct terminology when this type of food is used is "Maraschino Cherries, Artificially Colored and Artificially Flavored."
MARGARINE SUBSTITUTES: Meat food products that are substitutes for margarine because they contain less than 80 % fat and/or oil need not be labeled "imitation" if the product has a fully descriptive name and the finished product contains 15,000 international units of Vitamin A per pound.
The descriptive name of the product may include the term "Spread" (or "Spred"), which has been widely adopted as a generic fanciful name for this class of product.
The following guidelines shall be used in selecting the appropriate descriptive product name: 1.
"Animal Fat Spread (or Spred)" is an acceptable product name for a product prepared from animal fat as the sole source of fat.
2.
"Animal Fat and Vegetable Oil Spread (or Spred)" is an acceptable product name for a product prepared with a combination of animal fat(s) and vegetable oil(s) in which the vegetable oil(s) content is greater than 20 % of the total of the fat(s) and oil(s) used but less than 50 % of the total.
3.
"Animal Fat Spread (or Spred) - Vegetable Oil Added" is an acceptable product name for a product prepared with a combination of animal fat(s) and vegetable oil(s) in which the vegetable oil(s) content is 20 % or less of the total of the fat(s) and oil(s) used but greater than 2 % of the total.
4.
The fanciful name "Spread" (or "Spred") accompanied by a list of all ingredients individually identified by their common or usual name in order of decreasing predominance is acceptable regardless of the nature and amount of fat(s) and/or oil(s) used.
In 1., 2., and 3.
above, the descriptive product name may include the percent of each fat and/or oil and may include the common or usual name of each fat and/or oil used.
See: Policy Memo 045 dated April 7, 1982 MARENGO: Product must contain at least 35% cooked meat or poultry meat.
It has chicken or veal in a sauce containing tomatoes, mushrooms, onions, and wine, and label must show true product name, e.g., "Chicken Marengo."
MARINATED: To be labeled "marinated," a product must use a marinade that is a mixture in which food is either soaked, massaged, tumbled, or injected in order to improve taste, tenderness, or other sensory attributes, e.g., color or juiciness.
Time allotted in a marinade depends on many factors, e.g., thickness and size of the meat and strength of the marinade.
Marinade should be that amount necessary to affect the finished product, and limited to 10% pickup in red meat, 8% pickup in boneless poultry and 3% in bone-in poultry.
MARINE OIL: Herring oil and other marine species oils found by FDA to be satisfactory may be combined with animal and mixture of animal and vegetable oils processed as meat food products.
Labels will bear statements identifying the presence of substances, e.g., a shortening consisting of 50% herring and the remainder equal amounts of animal and vegetable would be "Shortening, Prepared with Herring Oil, Animal Vegetable Oils."
MARKING:
such oil oils and
Labeling may consist of a combination of printing, stenciling, box dyes, etc. for large true containers and for shipping containers.
Crayons are unacceptable for applying required labeling features except for figures indicating content quantity.
Approval of official marks appearing in newspaper advertisements, billboards, etc. is not necessary; however, such marks may be reviewed locally before publication.
Such markings should conform to the illustrations in the regulations and not be misleading.
MASA: This product is a basic component in foods, e.g., tortillas, tacos, burritos, and tamales.
The basic ingredient is whole corn, usually white, which is processed by soaking or cooking for a short time in hot lime water.
The term "Masa" is acceptable for labeling purposes to identify this material.
"Masa Harina" is a dried masa and may be declared as such.
"MAY CONTAIN" STATEMENTS: The use of "may contain" or "and/or" labeling may be used in the ingredients statement's sublisting of sliced and/or diced products from various sources.
See: "composite ingredients statement."
MEAT: The term meat may be used in the product name to identify the use of pork, beef, lamb, etc., or the species name may be shown.
MEAT BASE: A granular, paste-like product which is shelf-stable primarily because of its high salt content (30-40%).
1.
2.
3.
Beef Base - 15% beef or 10.5% cooked beef.
Pork Base - 15% pork or 10.5% cooked pork.
Ham Base - 18% ham.
MEAT BROTH OR MEAT STOCK: MPR 135:1.
Condensed 67:1
MEAT BYPRODUCTS: Byproducts must be individually declared by species and specific name in the ingredients statement, e.g., Pork Liver, Beef Tripe, and Beef fat.
MEAT CASSEROLES: Product must contain at least 25% meat or 18% cooked meat.
MEAT CURRY: Product must contain at least 50% meat.
MEAT CUTS SPECIFICATIONS: Labels for meat cuts with names plus numbers that specifications in the Meat Buyers' Guide from the Association of Meat Purveyors shall be approved understanding that the product is certified by the Division as meeting the required specification.
MEAT FOLDOVER MIT DRESSING: Product must contain at least 50% meat (chopped and formed).
MEAT FOOD PRODUCTS CONTAINING POULTRY INGREDIENTS - LABELING: Meat food products containing poultry ingredients in amounts that exceed 20% of the total livestock and poultry product portion of the meat food product must have product names that indicate the presence of the poultry ingredients, e.g., "Beef and Chicken Chili" or "Chili made with Beef and Chicken".
Meat food products containing poultry ingredients in amounts at 20 % or less of the total livestock and poultry product portion of the meat food product must have product names that are qualified to indicate the presence of the poultry ingredients, e.g., "Beef Stew - Turkey Added".
However, meat food products that do not meet specified minimum livestock ingredient requirements because poultry ingredients are replacing any part of the required livestock ingredients must have product names that indicate the presence of the poultry ingredients, e.g., "Beef and Turkey Stew" or "Stew Made with Beef and Turkey".
This policy does not apply to: (1) red meat products that are expected to contain poultry ingredients, e.g., "Brunswick Stew and Potted Meat Food Product" (Section 319.761); (2) cooked sausages identified in section 319.180 refer to National with the Livestock
of the meat regulations (Policy Memo 005A); or nonspecific loaves, rolls, logs, etc., e.g., Pickle Pimento Loaf.
See: Policy Memo 030A dated September 13, 1982 MEAT LOAF: Uncooked or cooked pork, beef, veal or ingredients in loaf form, but not canned.
lamb, and
(3) and
other
1.
Ingredients, e.g., cracker meal, oatmeal, bread crumbs, nonfat dry milk, soy ingredients (untextured), milk, and whole eggs are not required in the product name.
2.
Product may contain: a.
Head meat, cheek meat, heart meat, and tongue meat under label declaration in the ingredients statement only. b.
Not more than 12% extenders and binders. c. Partially defatted chopped beef or pork up to 25% and declared as meat in the ingredients statement.
3.
Product must contain at least 65% meat.
4.
Onion, tomato juice, water, and other liquid extenders are not directly controlled.
MEAT LOAF, CANNED (Perishable): Canned perishable products in the loaf category must: 1.
Meet the perishable 317.2(k), labeling requirements.
See:
2.
Be cured with at least 1 ounce nitrate per 100 pounds of product and 1/2% dextrose or 1% sugar.
3.
Have a brine concentration of finished product.
Products starch, or other extenders concentration of at least 6.1%, internal temperature of at least at least 3.5% in the that contain cereal, must have a brine and 4.
Be cooked to an 150o F.
MEAT LOAF, CANNED (Sterile Packed): No head, cheek, heart, or tongue meat permitted.
Other requirements are the same as uncanned cured meat loaf.
Binders and extenders must be shown in the product name, e.g., "Meat Loaf, cereal added."
MEAT LOAF, CURED: This product may contain, in addition to cures and seasonings, up to 3% ice or water.
Extenders or binders are not permitted.
See: 319.261.
MEAT PASTY: Product must contain at least 25% meat.
MEAT PIE FILLING: Product must contain at least 37% meat.
MEAT PIES (OR VEGETABLE MEAT PIES): Product must contain 25% meat; meat in gravy may be counted towards meat content.
MEAT RAVIOLI: Product must contain at least 10% meat in ravioli.
MEAT RAVIOLI IN MEAT SAUCE: Product must contain at least 10% meat in ravioli and at least 50% ravioli in total product, and at least 6% meat in sauce.
MEAT RAVIOLI IN SAUCE: Product must contain at least 10% meat in the ravioli and at least 50% ravioli in the total product.
MEAT SAUCE: Product must contain at least 6% ground meat.
MEAT SPREADS: Product must contain at least 50% meat or 35% cooked meat.
When another major component is considered a significant source of protein such as cheese is added the requirement is
reduced product
to 25% cooked meat.
Product must show name, e.g., "Sausage and Cheese Spread."
a
true
MEAT STICK AND CHEESE COMBINATION PRODUCTS: The following criteria are used for dry meat stick and cheese combination products that need not bear a "keep refrigerated" handling statement.
(1) the dry meat stick portion must have a water activity of less than 0.90, the cheese portion must have a water activity of less than 0.94, and the equilbirium of the water activity of the two components must be no greater than 0.92; (2) the dry meat portion, if fermented, must be fermented by an active fermentation culture (typically to a pH 5.0 or below;and, (3) for products where the meat portion and the cheese portion are packaged together, there must be a heat seal between the dry meat stick and cheese components which separtes the meat stick from the cheese stick by at least 4 mm. (4) Dry meat stick and cheese combination products not meeting these criteria must be labeled with a "keep refrigerated" statement in lieu of compelling data that establish safety.
Products not meeting the criteria stated above can be labeled without a "keep refrigerated" statement if a control program ensuring safety and shelf stablility is established by the established.
MEATBALL STEW: Product should contain at least 25% meat.
MEATBALLS: Uncooked or cooked pork, beef, veal, and lamb, and other ingredients in a ball form.
1.
Product must contain at least 65% meat.
2.
Binders and extenders are limited to 12% of the total product.
6.8% of isolated soy protein is considered the equivalent to 12% of the other binders or extenders.The permitted binders and extenders include, but are not limited to, cereal, bread crumbs, cracker
meal, soy flour, soy protein concentrate, isolated soy protein, and textured vegetable protein.
3.
Cheeks, hearts, and tongues are not allowed, but product may contain head meat, cheek meat, heart meat, and tongue meat when declared in the ingredients statement.
4.
Partially up to 25% identified (See entry defatted chopped (PDC) (species) may be used of the meat block.
PDC (species) can be as (species) in the ingredients statements.
for Partially Defatted Chopped (species).
MEATBALLS IN SAUCE: Requires a 50% minimum of meat-balls, by weight in finished product.
MEATBALLS, SWEDISH STYLE: Product must contain at least 65% fresh meat.
"Swedish Meatballs" or "Swedish Style Meatballs" are small in size and usually contain two or three different varieties of meat, nutmeg and/or allspice, potatoes, and milk.
"Swedish Brand Meatballs Made in USA" means any meatball.
MEATBALLS, TURKEY: Product must contain at least 65% raw turkey meat.
Skin is permitted in natural proportions of meat used; if skin is in excess of natural proportions, it shall be reflected in the product name.
MEATBALLS WITH WATER CHESTNUTS: Water chestnuts are not a common or usual ingredient in formula for meatball products.
Labels for meatball items that contain water chestnuts should bear a true product name, e.g., "Meatballs With Water Chestnuts."
MENUDO: See: Beef Tripe Stew MERGUEZ, MERGUES OR MERGHEZ SAUSAGE: A hot and spicy fresh sausage originating in North Africa and common in France which contains hot pepper and/or paprika.
The meat component must contain beef and may contain lamb or mutton when labeled as "Merguez Sausage."
When pork is used as part of meat component, the product
is labeled as "Merguez Sausage with Pork."
When pork is the only meat ingredient, the product is labeled "Pork Merguez Sausage."
MESQUITE: Mesquite wood or sawdust is classified as "hardwood" and acceptable for smoking in federally inspected meat products.
METAL CONTAINER LABEL SUBMITTALS: Paper take-offs should be submitted for label approval of metal containers bearing lithographed label.
Paper take-offs shall be a complete reproduction of the finished label.
METAL DETECTOR: Statements referring to the use of metal detection equipment to protect product integrity may only be used with limitations.
For example, statements like "Inspected by Metal Detector" are acceptable on labels only when the label also indicates the type and size of metal fragments the equipment is capable of detecting.
The Facilities Equipment and Sanitation Division must approve the use of the metal detection equipment.
A control program must be in place at the plant for the type and size of metal that can be detected by the equipment.
METHYL CELLULOSE: May be used as an ingredient in formulas for meat and vegetable patties and various poultry products (mainly patties) at a level of 0.15 % of the total weight of the product.
which includes batter and breading of these products.
The internal technical effect is to extend and to stabilize products as well as to act as a carrier.
See: 318.7(c)(4) 381.147(f)(4) METTWURST: An uncooked cured smoked sausage in which byproducts and extenders are not permitted.
Beef heart meat is acceptable.
Water is limited to 3% and the fat content shall not exceed 50%.
See: Policy Memo 020A dated March 26, 1981
METTWURST, COOKED: Mettwurst which is cooked must be labeled "Cooked Mettwurst," and may contain up to 10% water based on the finished product.
See: Policy Memo 020A dated March 26, 1981 METZ SAUSAGE: Cured lean beef and pork and bacon are finely chopped, seasoned, and stuffed into beef middles.
It is air-dried for5 days, then given a cool smoke.
It is classed as a semi-dry sausage.
MEXICAN STYLE: Acceptable for products that contain at least four of the following: jalapeno peppers, chili peppers, green chilies, cumin, cayenne peppers, red or green peppers, chili powder, jalapeno powder, Monterey Jack cheese, or cheddar cheese.
This policy applies to a single food and does not supersede Policy Memo 068.
MEXICAN STYLE DINNERS: Products like tamales, enchiladas, and tacos must make up 25% of the dinner or entree to qualify as "Mexican Style."
The individual product standard must also be met.
MEXICAN STYLE SAUCES: A garnish (decoration) of cheese in or on the sauce of Mexican style foods does not require the presence of the cheese to be declared in the product name or qualifying statement.
MILAN OR MILANO SALAMI: A dry sausage with a maximum MPR of 1.9:1.
It is an Italian-type salami, except the meat is finely cut.
It is made with beef, pork fat, spiced with garlic, and has a distinctive cording.
MILK SUGAR: Product must be declared as lactose.
MINCED BEEF: Product must meet the ground beef standard.
MINCE MEAT: Product must contain at least 12% fresh meat or 9% meat.
Heart meat may be substituted.
In addition to Meat," the product name should include kinds of meat, "Mince Meat with Beef" or "Mince Meat with (species) Meat."
cooked "Mince e.g., Heart
When 2% or more cooked meat but less than 9% cooked meat is present in the formula, the product is amenable and the name must state that the product is "Mince Meat Flavored With ____."
A product 2% cooked of animal and is not MIXTURES: Mixtures of nonfat dry milk (NFDM), calcium reduced dry skim milk (CRDSM), or dried whey, reduced lactose whey, reduced minerals whey, and whey protein concentrate with other substances are not allowed, except in batter and gravy mixes and breaders.
Mixtures of cereal, soy preparations and/or sodium caseinate with other substances are permitted to come into the plant for use in batter and gravy mixes, but they must be labeled to show their intended use, e.g., "Patty Mix" or "Gravy Mix."
The labels of the mixtures must show the ingredients in order of their predominance.
MOCK DRUMSTICKS: An imitation product; nonspecific.
MOCK TURTLE SOUP: Product must contain at least 10% beef and may be made with beef and beef byproducts.
MODIFIED FOOD STARCH: See: Starch, Modified Food MOFONGO: Pork skins and plantain type product with at least 20% pork skins in the total formulation.
It must show true product name, e.g., "Pork Skin Filling Wrapped in Plantain." marketed as "Mince Meat" which contains less than meat or contains only beef suet as the ingredient origin, is not considered as a meat food product amenable.
MOISTURE PROTEIN RATIO (MPR): Frizzes-----------1.6:1 Jerky------------0.75:1 Pepperoni---------1.6:1 Dry Sausage-------1.9:1 Tropic Cure Pork-3.25:1 Thuringer---------3.7:1 Dried Meat-------2.04:1 Chipped Beef-----2.04:1
Ukrainian Sausage----2.0:1 Kippered Beef---------2.03:1 Dry Salami-------------1.9:1 Genoa Salami-----------2.3:1 Sicilian Salami--------2.3:1 Italian Salami---------1.9:1 Roast Beef, Canned----2.25:1 Farmer Summer Sausage--1.9:1
MOISTURE PROTEIN RATIO (MPR)-PH: Nonrefrigerated or 3.1:1 or less and sterilized.
This than 3.5% binders MONDONGO: A mixture of one or more of the following: (a) beef tripe, (b) cattle feet with or without hide on, (c) chitterlings, and (d) beef intestines.
See: Beef Tripe Stew MONOSODIUM GLUTAMATE: When monosodium glutamate is used in a product, its presence must be individually shown in the ingredients statement.
MORCELLA BLOOD PUDDING: Nonspecific.
The product is made from pork fat, beef blood and/or pork blood, and may contain meat.
MORTADELLA: Normally a cooked sausage but can be dry or semi-dry.
It is similar to salami and cervelat except that it has large chunks of pork fat.
Red sweet peppers up to 4% and pistachio nuts up to 1% are acceptable as long as they are shown in the true product name.
MORTADELLA (CANNED): Canned items designated "Mortadella" must be labeled with the phrase "Perishable, Keep Under Refrigeration" and must have an MPR of 3.85:1 or less.
See: Manual 18.46 shelf-stable sausages must have an MPR of a pH of 5.0 or less, unless commercially does not apply to products containing more or 2% isolated soy protein.
MORTADELLA - POULTRY: Poultry Mortadella is a dry, semi-dry, or cooked sausage formulated with poultry.
The sausage must contain large chunks of pork fat and may contain extenders and/or binders.
Red sweet peppers are permitted up to 4% and pistachio nuts up to 1% and shown as added in the true product name.
See: Policy Memo 029 If product is canned, the MPR must not exceed 3.85:1, the internal temperature must have reached 160o F and the product labeled "Perishable, Keep Under Refrigeration" or similar wording.
MORTADELLA WITHOUT FAT CUBES OR CHUNKS: Product must meet the standard for Mortadella and the label be qualified to indicate the absence of Fat Cubes or Chunks, e.g., "Mortadella without Fat Cubes" or "Mortadella without Fat Chunks."
MOSTACCIOLI (IT): This is a macaroni product, round in shape, and grooved with the ridges running lengthwise.
It is hollow and the tubes are about the same as the end of a man's little finger.
It may be declared in the ingredients statement as "Mostaccioli A Macaroni Product."
MOUSAKA, MOUSSAKA, MUSAKA (GK): Must contain at least 25% meat.
Mousaka is a casserole containing layers of meat and eggplant made in various ways throughout the Middle East.
A true product name is required, e.g., "Eggplant and Meat Casserole."
MOUSSE: A finely emulsified paste made from meat or poultry which contains eggs, egg yolks, or egg whites and which usually contains milk, cream, or milk products.
Product must show true product name, e.g., "Pork Mousse."
MOZZARELLA CHEESE: See: Cheese
MULLICATAWNY SOUP: Product must contain at least 2% cooked poultry meat and enough curry powder and pepper to characterize the product.
The label must show a true product name, e.g., "Chicken Mullicatawny Soup."
MULLIGAN STEW: Product must contain at least 25% fresh meat or meat and poultry.
Mulligan stew is a mixture of vegetables and meat combined in a gravy or sauce.
The label must have a true product name, e.g., "Chicken and Meat Mulligan Stew."
MUSHROOMS: Ascorbic acid may be used to treat mushrooms used in uncured products.
The mushrooms must be drained after dipping in the ascorbic acid solution before they are added to the product.
MUSTARD BRAN: This is not considered a spice and must be declared as "Mustard Bran."
It is not acceptable in sausage.
MUSTARD FLOUR: It is a spice that is commonly used in sausage products.
MYVACET: (Distilled Acetylated Monoglycerides).
Acceptable for use as a coating on sausage casings.
Sausages coated with Myvacet shall show, adjacent to the product name, a qualifying statement disclosing the presence of the compound, e.g., "Summer Sausage Coated with a Solution of Distilled Acetylated Monoglycerides."
NACHO STYLE, NACHO FLAVOR, AND SIMILAR TERMS: Acceptable terminology for products possessing the commonly expected flavor characteristics associated with "Nachos," a Mexican hors d'oeurve.
The characterizing flavor components generally include, but are not limited to, cheese (Cheddar or Monterey Jack), tomato (tomato solids, tomato powder), spices, or other natural seasonings and flavorings (usually garlic and onion), and chili peppers (mild or hot).
Romano and Parmesan cheese are also often present.
However, these cheeses may not be used to satisfy the above cheese requirement.
NATURAL CLAIMS: The term "natural" may be used on labeling for meat products and poultry products, provided the applicant for such labeling demonstrates that: (1) the product does not contain any artificial flavor or flavoring, coloring ingredient, or chemical preservative (as defined in 21 CFR 101.22), or any other artificial or synthetic ingredient; and (2) the product and its ingredients are not more than minimally processed.
Minimal processing may include: (a) those traditional processes used to make food edible or to preserve it or to make it safe for human consumption, e.g., smoking, roasting, freezing, drying, and fermenting, or (b) those physical processes which do not fundamentally alter the raw product and/or which only separate a whole, intact food into component parts, e.g., grinding meat, separating eggs into albumen and yolk, and pressing fruits to produce juices.
Relatively severe processes, e.g., solvent extraction, acid hydrolysis, and chemical bleaching would clearly be considered more than minimal processing.
Thus, the use of a natural flavor or flavoring in compliance with 21 CFR 101.22 which has undergone more than minimal processing would place a product in which it is used outside the scope of these guidelines.
However, the presence of an ingredient which has been more than minimally processed would not necessarily preclude the product from being promoted as natural.
Exceptions of this type may be granted on a case-by-case basis if it can be demonstrated that the use of such an ingredient would not significantly change the character of the product to the point that it could no longer be considered a natural product.
In such cases, the natural claim must be qualified to clearly and conspicuously identify the ingredient, e.g., contains refined sugar.
All products claiming to be natural or a natural food should be accompanied by a brief statement which explains what is meant by the term natural, i.e., that the product is a natural food because it contains no artificial ingredients and is only minimally processed.
This statement should appear directly beneath or beside all natural claims or, if elsewhere on the principal display panel, an asterisk should be used to tie the explanation to the claim.
The decision to approve or deny the use of a natural claim may be affected by the specific context in which the claim is made.
For example, claims indicating that a product is natural food, e.g., "Natural chili" or "chili - a natural product" would be unacceptable for a product containing beet powder which artificially colors the finished product.
However, "all natural ingredients" might be an acceptable claim for such a product.
See: Policy Memo 055 dated November 22, 1982 NATURAL SMOKED COLOR: Approval can be properly granted to labels with this statement when the products involved are "Smoked" and not artificially colored.
The results of the use of artificial smoke materials can, by means of a number of processing operations, result in a color characteristic being acquired by the frankfurters, bologna, and the like.
The term "Natural Smoked Color" can be used to properly identify this point.
NAVARIN: Navarin is a stew containing lamb or mutton and vegetables and considered a national dish of France.
It must meet the meat stew standard of 25% meat.
Show true product name, e.g., "Navarin-Lamb Stew."
NEGATIVE LABELING: (1) Negative product example, "turkey product labeling is allowed if it is unclear from name that the ingredient is not present.
the use of the term "no beef" on the label pastrami" would further clarify that does not contain beef.
the For of the
(2) Negative labeling is allowed if the statement is beneficial for health, religious preference, or other similar reasons.
For example, highlighting the absence of salt in a product would be helpful to those persons on sodium-restricted diets.
(3) Negative labeling is allowed if the claims are directly linked to the product packaging, as opposed to the product itself.
For example, flexible retortable pouches could bear the statement "no preservatives, refrigeration or freezing needed with this new packaging method."
(4) Negative labeling is allowed if such claims call attention to the absence of ingredients because they are prohibited in a product by regulation or policy.
The statement must clearly and prominently indicate this fact, so as not to mislead or create false impressions.
For example, "USDA regulations prohibit the use of preservatives in this product" would be an acceptable statement for ground beef.
(5) Negative labeling is allowed to indicate that absence of an ingredient when that ingredient is expected or permitted by regulation or policy.
This could also apply to ingredients which are not expected or permitted by regulation or policy if the ingredients could find their way into the product through a component.
For example, the use of "no preservatives" on the label of "spaghetti with meat and sauce" (where regulations do not permit the direct addition of preservatives) would be acceptable if the product contained an ingredient, such as cooking oil, which could contain antioxidants but do not.
These guidelines do not preempt the requirements of the nutrition labeling regulation.
Therefore, negative claims such as "unsalted" would have to comply with the provisions stated in the nutrition labeling regulations.
See Policy Memo 019B dated August 18, 1994 NET QUANTITY OF CONTENTS ON COMBINATION PACKAGES: The guidelines for stating the net quantity of contents on combination packages containing both liquid and solid products are as follows: 3.
The declaration of net quantity of contents for a combination package shall be expressed in terms of fluid measure for individual products that are liquid and in terms of avoirdupois weight for individual products that are solid, semisolid, or viscous, provided the quantity statements for identical packages or units are combined.
For example, the fruit drink would be expressed in fluid
measure and the meat, cheese, crackers, and cookies would be expressed in the combined avoirdupois weight.
2.
The declaration of quantity shall be preceded by one of the following terms, as appropriate: "Net Weight," "Net Wt.," or "Net Contents."
The net quantity of contents declaration may appear in more than one line.
Therefore, both stacked and side-by-side declarations would be considered appropriate.
- Descriptive terms may be used to identify the liquid and solid components of the package, e.g., entree, meal, or drink; however, such terms shall not include brand names.
- Connecting words such as "and" or "plus" are permitted to be used as part of the declaration of contents.
Examples of acceptable net content declarations are as follows: (1) Entree Net Wt. 8 oz, Drink 4 fl oz (120ml) (2) Net Contents: lunch 8 oz plus fruit drink 4 fl oz (3) Net Wt. 8 oz Drink 4 fl oz (120ml) (4) Net Weight 8 oz. and 4 fl oz. Federally inspected meat and poultry products are exempt from the requirements of the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act (FPLA), including the mandatory metric labeling provisions that went into effect February 14, 1994.
However, if metric labeling is included voluntarily, such labeling should comply with the FPLA.
The guidelines contained in this policy memo will be subject to the provisions prescribed in 9 CFR 317.2(h) and 381.121 of the Federal regulations.
See: Policy Memo 124 dated January 17, 1995
NET WEIGHT STATEMENT: Divider Pak: On a product where two cans are taped together, one of which contains the meat or poultry item and the other a vegetable, e.g., "Chicken Chow Mein," the meat or poultry label may include the net weight on the 20% panel.
The vegetable can bears the true name of the product with the total net weight of the other can and the drained weight of the vegetable can.
Double Packing: When a poultry product and a non-poultry product are separately wrapped and placed in a single immediate
container bearing the name of both products, the net weight shown on the immediate container may be the total net weight of the two products or the net weight of the poultry product and the non-poultry product separately.
Additional Net Weight Information: Nonregulatory information of a net weight nature, e.g., 4-3 oz. packages, accompanying a net weight statement is acceptable and need not adhere to the size and spacing restrictions.
Open Net Weights: Open net weights may be presented in pounds and ounces, decimals, decimal fractions, or fractions, e.g., 1 1/2 lbs., 1.6 lbs.
Net Weight Requirements: The statement of net quantity of contents is required on all products intended for sale at retail intact.
In addition, shipping containers must bear a net quantity of contents statement if product inside is not uniform in weight (i.e., random weight).
Piece counts may not be used in lieu of a required net quantity of contents statement on a shipping container but may be used as additional information.
Multi-Unit Retail Packages: Fully labeled packages of more than one of the same meat or poultry product packages in an open (i.e., clear) overwrap do not have to include a net weight statement.
See: 317.2(h) 381.121(b) MPI Bulletin 211 NET WEIGHT STATEMENTS ON PACKAGES WITH HEADER LABELS: The guidelines for determining the size and location of net weight statements on meat food product packages with header labels are as follows: 1.
The entire front of the package is considered the principal display panel of the package and its area is used to determine the size of the net weight statement.
Print size specifications for the net weight statement specified by the regulations must be followed.
2.
The net weight statement should be placed within the lower 30% area of the header label if no other mandatory labeling features are printed on the rest of the principal display panel of the package.
If mandatory features do appear below the header label, the net weight statement must be placed within the lower 30 % of the total area containing any mandatory information.
A "Header Label" is a small label applied across the top of a package usually bearing all of the mandatory labeling information.
The rest of the package is most often a clear film containing a meat or poultry product, e.g., luncheon meat.
This type of packaging is designed to be used on peg board type displays.
See: Policy Memo 047 dated May 3, 1982 "NEW" AND SIMILAR TERMS: Terms like "new," "now," "improved," and similar terms may be used within the following guidelines: 1.
The terms may only be used for a period of 6 months from the date of the initial approval, except as noted in 2., 3., and 4.
below.
2.
Extensions to the 6-month period may be granted if: a.
Processors distribution labeling as time can be can demonstrate that production or delays precluded the use of the approved scheduled.
In such situations, the lost restored.
b.
Processors can demonstrate that labeling inventory needs for the 6-month period were over estimated due to poor sales.
The processors must maintain records which indicate the amount and the date the labeling was originally purchased.
In this situation, up to an additional 6 months can be granted.
No further extension will be considered.
is customary to distribute geographical regions, each sketch approval for 6 months adequate controls over the the products.
3.
In those situations where it "new" products to various geographic area may receive a if the processor can assure segregation and distribution of
4.
In situations where it is customary to test market product in no more than approximately 15% of the intended total marketing area before total distribution begins, labeling for the test market area can receive a sketch approval and also be included in the 6-month sketch approval given to the labeling of the product distributed to the total marketing area.
Processors must be able to assure that only 15 % of the total market is involved in test marketing.
See: Policy Memo 107 dated August 18, 1987
NEW ENGLAND BOILED DINNER: Product must contain at least 25% cooked "Corned Beef."
NO ROLL: The term "No Roll" is permitted on marking devices and labels for single ingredient red meats (carcasses, primal and retail cuts) provided the term is not accompanied with an official grade name (e.g., "No Roll Choice").
NON-DAIRY WHITE SAUCE OR NON-DAIRY SAUCE: A sauce made with a non-dairy creamer.
If this type of a sauce is proposed for use with "Chipped Beef," a suitable name would be "Non-Dairy White Sauce with Chipped Beef" or "Non-Dairy Sauce with Chipped Beef."
The reference to "Cream" or any of its derivations should not appear in the product name.
NONSPECIFIC MEAT FOOD PRODUCTS: Red meat items of this type do not have specific requirements, i.e., they do not possess a standard of identity or composition.
Consequently, these products shall be identified by one of two ways: (1) A descriptive name that identifies characterizing components and/or ingredients, or (2) a fanciful or coined name that is accompanied by an ingredients statement.
The latter approach should be used when the use of a descriptive name is not practical, e.g., when the descriptive name would read like an ingredients statement.
When a fanciful name or coined name is used, the ingredients statement should appear contiguous to the product name on the principal display panel of an immediate container.
NONSTANDARDIZED COOKED SAUSAGE PRODUCTS CONTAINING BOTH LIVESTOCK AND POULTRY INGREDIENTS: This policy does not apply to cooked sausage products which contain poultry ingredients up to 15% of the total ingredients (excluding water).
The labeling of nonstandardized cooked sausage products must comply with 319.180.
Meat food products are those in which more than 50% of the livestock and poultry product portion consists of livestock ingredients.
Such cooked sausage products which contain poultry ingredients at more than 15% of the total ingredients (excluding water) must have product names that indicate the species of livestock and kind(s) of poultry ingredients, e.g.,
"Beef and Turkey Frankfurter" or "Frankfurter Made From Beef and Turkey".
Poultry food products are those in which more than 50% of the livestock and poultry products portion consists of poultry.
Livestock ingredients at more than 20% of the total poultry and livestock ingredients must have product names that indicate the kind(s) of poultry and species of livestock ingredients, e.g., "Turkey and Beef Frankfurter" or "Frankfurter Made From Turkey and Beef".
Such cooked sausage products which contain livestock ingredients at 20% or less of the total poultry and livestock ingredients must have product names that are appropriately qualified to indicate the inclusion of livestock ingredients, e.g., "Turkey Frankfurter - Pork Added or Turkey Frankfurter - With Pork".
(The product names of cooked sausage products which contain no livestock ingredients designate the kind(s) of poultry ingredients, e.g., "Turkey Frankfurter".)
Cooked sausage products containing over 50% meat ingredients would carry the red meat legend while those containing over 50% poultry ingredients would carry the poultry legend.
See: Policy Memo 087A regarding word size in the labeling of product names.
See: Policy Memo 005A dated November 25, 1987 NOODLE: See: Macaroni and Noodle Type Products NOODLE CHICKEN VEGETABLE DINNER OR NOODLE CHICKEN DINNER WITH VEGETABLES: (Canned or in glass jars). cooked chicken.
NUGGET LABELING: Nuggets are irregularly shaped, usually bite-sized meat and/or poultry products which are usually breaded and deep fat fried and intended to be used as finger foods.
There are a number of different types of nuggets, the labeling for which is: (1) Products made from a solid piece of meat or poultry may use the term "Nugget" as part of the product name without further qualification (e.g., "Chicken Nugget," "Beef Nugget").
Products made from chopped and formed meat or poultry may use the term "Nugget" as part of the product name, provided a qualifying statement describing such process Product must contain at least 6%
(2)
is shown contiguous to the product name (e.g., "Chicken Nugget, Chopped and Formed" or "Beef Nugget, Chopped and Formed").
(3) Products made from chopped meat or poultry and containing binders, extenders and/or water may use the term "Nugget" as a fanciful name, provided a descriptive name immediately follows "Species" or "Kind" nugget (e.g., "Breaded Nugget-Shaped Chicken Patties").
Products described in (1), (2), and (3) above which are breaded shall be labeled as "breaded" and shall be limited to 30% breading.
(4)
See: Policy Memo 088 dated May 23, 1985
OAT FIBER: "Oat fiber," should be identified in the ingredients statement as "isolated oat product."
It may be used in non-standardized products and in products, such as, "taco fillings."
OLD FASHION or OLD FASHIONED: The terms "Old Fashion" or "Old Fashioned" are considered subjective in nature and may be used unqualified on labels for meat and/or poultry products with the exception of Old Fashioned loaf.
See: 317.8(b)(9)(iii) OLEO STOCK: See: 317.8(b)(20) OLEOMARGARINE: The Establishment No. may be omitted from the outer container, provided that articles are completely labeled including Establishment No. inside.
See: 317.2(i) OLIVES, STUFFED: Acceptable ingredient declaration for olives stuffed with real pimentos.
OMELET, DENVER OR WESTERN STYLE: Product must contain at least 18% ham with onions and green and/or red peppers.
OMELET, FLORENTINE: Product must contain at least 9% cooked meat and must contain spinach.
OMELETS WITH: Bacon - must contain at least 9% cooked bacon Chicken Livers - must contain at least 12% cooked liver Corned Beef Hash - must contain at least 25% corned beef hash Creamed Beef - must contain at least 25% creamed beef
Ham - must contain at least 18% cooked ham Sausage - must contain at least 12% dry sausage Sausage and Cheese, (omelet with pepperoni, cheese and sauce) must contain at least 9% sausage in the total product.
OPEN DATING: Labels showing further qualifying phrases in addition to the explanatory phrase must submit with the application sufficient documentation to support these additional claims.
See (317.8(b)(32) 
Some local authorities require that packaged foods heated and sold hot from industrial catering vehicles be dated with the day the foods were placed in the warming units (e.g., Tuesday, Friday, etc.).
When assured by the local authorities that the foods are under a rigid local inspection program, the designations may be approved without an explanatory statement as required by the regulations.
To date, only the county of Los Angeles, California, has provided this assurance.
The packing date should be shown on immediate or shipping containers of poultry food products as required by regulations (381.126 and 381.129(c)).
When meat or poultry products are packed and held in freezer storage for later repacking, the explanatory phrase on repacked product should be in terms of "sell by" or "use before."
However, if a "packed on" phrase is desired, the date shown shall be that of the original packing of the product.
ORANGE PRESERVES: It is not necessary to sublist ingredients.
OVEN PREPARED: Defined as fully cooked in an oven and ready to eat, regardless of use on poultry or meat items.
Exceptions are beef cuts, Rib No. 107 (Rib, Oven Prepared), and 108 (Rib, Oven Prepared, Boneless and Tied) as shown in the NAMP Meat Buyers Guide and the USDA Institutional Meat Purchase Specification.
OVEN READY: Defined as ready to cook, regardless of use on poultry or meat items.
PAELLA CON BACALAO (SP): Product must contain at least 35% cooked meat or poultry meat and include seafood and no more than 25% cooked rice.
The label must show true product name, e.g., "Beef and Fish with Rice."
PAN HOUS OR PON HOSS: Product should be labeled, e.g., "Pan Hous with Meat," or "Pon Hoss Prepared with Meat."
PANCETTA: A rolled, cured, spiced pork belly.
Trichinae treatment is required.
However, curing alone is not an acceptable method for trichinae treatment.
PAPAIN: Meat and poultry products that are dipped in a solution containing papain shall show in conjunction with the product name a statement, e.g., "Tenderized with a solution of (list ingredients of solution)."
Carcasses of animals treated with papain by ante-mortem injection shall be roller branded "Tendered with Papain."
Parts not so marked shall be labeled as "Tendered with Papain."
See: 317.8(b)(25) 381.120 Enzymes-Proteolytic PAPRIKA: Generally, paprika and/or oleoresin of paprika are not permitted in or on fresh red meat products, fresh ground poultry, or fresh poultry sausage.
They are permitted under the following conditions: 3.
In both red meat and poultry products where such ingredients are acceptable and expected, including Italian Sausage, Salisica, Chorizo, Longaniza, and Hungarian Style products.
All requests for additional products should be referred to the Product Assessment Division to determine their acceptability.
2.
On red meat products where their use does not the leanness or freshness, e.g., application layer of fat and not to the muscle tissue.
name must be appropriately qualified, e.g., paprika" or "artificially colored". misrepresent to a surface However, the "coated with
3.
In or on products where they are expected and the product name discloses this fact, or the product name refers to a component expected to contain the ingredients.
Examples include: "Beef with Barbecue Sauce," "Beef - Barbecue Flavor," "Chicken Paprikash," "Chicken with Orange Sauce," or similar type products.
4.
In fresh whole muscle poultry products, provided their presence is properly described, e.g., "coated with paprika," or "artificially colored," as appropriate.
PARSLEY: Fresh parsley may be substituted as a seasoning for dehydrated parsley without label change.
PARSLEY, PISTACHIO NUTS, PICKLES: When added to a product, they may not be listed simply as "Flavoring" but must be specifically named in the ingredients statement.
PARTIALLY DEFATTED (BEEF OR PORK) FATTY TISSUE: These are byproducts produced from fatty trimmings containing less than 12% lean meat.
These ingredients may be used in meat products in which byproducts are acceptable.
Products include nonspecific loaves, beef patties, frankfurters with byproducts, bologna with variety meats, imitation sausage, potted meat food product, sauces, or gravies.
See: 319.15(e) 319.29(a) PARTIALLY DEFATTED CHOPPED (Beef or Pork) (PDCB, PDCP): Partially Defatted Chopped Beef is not permitted in hamburger, ground or chopped beef.
The School Lunch Program requires that when PDCB is used in products like taco mix, which later may be used in preparing other products (e.g., tacos or patties), the PDCB or PDCP must always be declared in the ingredients statement on the labeling of the taco mix.
See: MPI Manual 18.55 PARTIALLY DEFATTED COOKED (Beef or Pork) FATTY TISSUE: This product may be used as an ingredient in: Beef patties (cooked and uncooked), Potted meat food product, sauces,
gravies, imitation sausage, and nonspecific loaves.
No limit on quantity is made.
It is believed to be self-limiting.
THE AMOUNT AND LABELING OF PDCB AND PDCP IN FOOD PRODUCTS CLASS FOOD CATEGORY AMOUNT LABELING -----------------------------------------------------Beef or Pork or both I -Beef Patties -Imitation Sausage -Non Specific Loaf -Potted Meat Food Product -Patty Mix No Limit Do Do Do Do do do do do
Always must be declared -----------------------------------------------------II -Chinese Eggroll and up to 12% of Beef or other Chinese Meat Block Pork Specialties -Chopped Beef Steak -Corned Beef Hash -Fabricated Steaks -Pepper Steak -Salisbury Steak -Luncheon Meat (nonspecific) -Pizza Meat Topping -Pizza With Meat -Cooked Sausage (319.180(b)) Do Do Do Do Do
do do do do do
do do Always must be declared ------------------------------------------------------III Chili up to 25% of As beef; Meat block or pork, or larger if larger must be declared -Meat Loaf -MeatBalls -Meat Fillings For Tacos, Burritos, Enchiladas, Tamales and other Mexican Foods Do Do Do do do do
up to 25% of Meat Block Do Do up to 15% of Meat Block
CLASS FOOD CATEGORY AMOUNT LABELING --------------------------------------------------IV -Corned Beef Hash up to 12% of Beef beef product formulation ---------------------------------------------------Note: All percentages as calculated on the basis of the fresh weight of meat content.
PARVEMARGARINE: A nondairy product.
Used in Kosher products as a substitute for margarine, butter, and other such foods which might have a dairy background.
PASTELLES (SP): Product must contain at least 10% fresh meat.
Product is always made with pork in Puerto Rico.
The label must show the true product name, e.g., "Pork Pastelles."
PASTELLILLOS (SP): Puerto Rican Style product containing at least 8% cooked meat.
Species is part of the product name.
The label must show the true product name, e.g., "Pork Pastellillos."
PASTIES: Product must contain at least 25% fresh meat.
The label must show the true product name, e.g., "Beef Pasties."
PASTITSIO: (Greek for casserole).
Product must contain at least 25% fresh meat or 18% cooked meat.
A product containing macaroni, ground beef, tomato paste, wine, white sauce, and Parmesan cheese that may be labeled "Greek Style Pastitsio."
PASTRAMI: Cooked cured beef with spices, generally made from the plate but other cuts can be used.
The product must be smoked or treated with smoke flavoring.
"Pastrami, Water Added" is not permitted, although similar products labeled according to Policy Memo 084A are permitted.
The term "Unsmoked Cooked Pastrami" must be used when the product is not smoked or does not contain smoke flavoring.
PASTRAMI, TURKEY: A cured turkey product that is cooked.
The product must be smoked or treated with smoke flavoring.
The term "Unsmoked Cooked Turkey Pastrami" must be used when the product is not smoked or does not contain smoke flavoring.
PATE DE FOIE: Product must contain at least 30% liver.
foie means liver.
See: Foile Gras Products PATTIE FOLDOVER MIT DRESSING: Product must contain at least 50% pattie.
PATTIES: Chopped and shaped and similar terms not required on products labeled patties.
1.
Paprika not permitted in fresh meat patties.
2.
PDCB or PDCP may be listed as beef or pork, except in patties with mechanically separated (species) product and school lunch labeled products.
3.
PDBFT and PDPFT permitted.
ingredients statement.
4.
Meat from added part patties, with added a source other than (ex., Veal Patties, of the product name, Must show as such in the Pate means paste;
fat up to 20% of the meat block, that shown in the name, show as Beef Fat Added): over 20% to be e.g., "Veal and Beef Fat Patties." water added.
added.
Same
5.
Ground beef patties - no extenders or Hamburger patties - no extenders or water requirement as hamburger.
6.
Pre-broiled beef patties with simulated stripes (patties are deposited on conveyor and pre-broiled).
Parallel stripes are applied with a solution of caramel coloring and water through parallel spigots.
Product name will identify artificial color marks on the label.
7.
Antioxidants are permitted in pork or beef patties both raw and cooked.
8.
Beef Patties: If beef byproducts are added which are not permitted by the standard, the list of ingredients must immediately follow the product name.
See: 319.15(c) 9.
Pork Patties: The standard for beef patties 319.15(c) shall be applied with the exception that the species is pork.
PATTIES (Jamaican Style): See: Jamaican Style Patties PAUPIETTE (FR): Thinly sliced pieces of meat stuffed and rolled.
Same standard as "Beef Roulade," which is at least 50% cooked meat.
PAWS, CHICKEN: An acceptable name for the lower portion of the chicken foot remaining after cutting the chicken leg into two parts just below the spurpoint.
The toenails must be removed.
PEANUT FLOUR: Can only be used in nonspecific products that are not subject to moisture controls.
PECTIN: Can be used at a maximum use level of 3% in nonstandardized meat and poultry food products.
The common and usual name of the ingredient, regardless of its source, is "pectin" (21 CFR 184.1588).
PEPPERED BEEF: An acceptable product name for a product that may be cured, smoked, coated, injected, etc.
The product must be characterized by a peppery flavor imparted by pepper or other suitable spices/flavorings.
PEPPERONI: A dry sausage prepared from pork or pork and beef.
Combinations containing more than 55% beef are called beef and pork pepperoni.
Pepperoni made with beef must be called beef pepperoni.
Pepperoni must be treated for destruction of possible live trichinae and must have an MPR of 1.6:1 or less.
Antioxidants are permitted in pepperoni.
The casing, before stuffing, or the finished product, may be dipped in a potassium
sorbate solution to retard mold growth.
Extenders and binders are not permitted in pepperoni.
Hearts, tongues, and other byproducts are not acceptable ingredients.
PEPPERONI, COOKED: Not an acceptable product name.
PEPPERONI WITH POULTRY: Poultry may be added to pepperoni if properly labeled.
If the meat block contains 20% or less poultry, the product is labeled "Pepperoni with Turkey (kind) Added."
When poultry over 20% of the meat and poultry block product is labeled "Pork and Turkey (kind) Pepperoni," an MPR of 1.6:1 is applied.
If the amount of poultry exceeds that of the meat, the product label reads "Turkey and Pork Pepperoni."
This would carry a poultry legend.
PEPPERS AND COOKED SAUSAGE IN SAUCE: Product must contain formulation.
PERISHABL
